RAILROAD  SAFETY  ENHANCEMENT  ACT  OF  2007 

S.  HRG.  110–1167 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  26,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–738 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  L.  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 26, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Boardman,  Hon.  Joseph  H.,  Administrator,  Federal  Railroad  Administration, 
U.S. Department of Transportation  ....................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hamberger,  Edward  R.,  President  and  CEO,  Association  of  American 
Railroads  ...............................................................................................................
National Rail Safety Action Plan Progress Report 2005–2007  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Solow,  David,  CEO,  Southern  California  Regional  Rail  Authority/Metrolink; 
Vice  Chair—Commuter  and  Intercity  Rail,  American  Public  Transportation 
Association (APTA) 
..............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Tolman,  John  P.,  Vice  President  and  National  Legislative  Representative, 
Brotherhood  of  Locomotive  Engineers  and  Trainmen,  Division  of  the  Rail 
Conference, International Brotherhood of Teamsters  .......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. John F. Kerry to: 

Hon. Joseph H. Boardman  ...............................................................................
.....................................................................................
Edward R. Hamberger 

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
38 
60 
36 
41 
1 
3 
43 

3 
5 

12 
45 
14 

30 
32 

23 
25 

63 
66 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

RAILROAD  SAFETY  ENHANCEMENT  ACT 

OF  2007 

THURSDAY,  JULY  26,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 

MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:34  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Good afternoon, the Committee is brought 
to  order,  and  I  want  to  welcome  everybody  to  the  Subcommittee’s 
second hearing on railroad safety. 

Now,  frankly,  the  statistics  are  surprising.  Although  you  hear 
about  railroad  accidents  individually,  it’s  hard  to  believe  that  841 
people  died  in  railroad  accidents  last  year,  and  thousands  more 
were injured. 

Some  were  employees,  others  were  passengers.  Some  were  resi-
dents  who  lived  in,  or  trespassed  near  the  railroad  tracks,  or  the 
rail yard. 

Last year two people in New Jersey were struck by trains in sep-
arate incidents in one day. The Federal Government is supposed to 
keep  our  railroads  operating  safely,  and  protect  passengers,  work-
ers and people exposed to their operations. But Congress hasn’t au-
thorized America’s rail safety program since 1994. 

Now, it’s time for us to provide direction to our Nation’s rail safe-
ty policies. Based on this Subcommittee’s first hearing on rail safe-
ty in May, Senator Smith—who is the Ranking Member of the Sub-
committee,  and  I,  drafted  legislation  to  authorize  and  improve  the 
U.S. Department of Transportation’s railroad safety programs. The 
bill  is  called  the  Railroad  Safety  Enhancement  Act  of  2007,  and 
we’re introducing it today. 

A draft copy has been shared with the witnesses and staff mem-
bers  of  the  Subcommittee,  and  we  invite  any  Senators  who  want 
to  be  listed  as  original  cosponsors  of  the  bill  to  please  join  us.  We 
know that there is substantial interest among our colleagues. 

One  part  of  our  bill  would  require  railroads  to  complete  safety 
risk  analyses  of  their  operations.  Using  these,  they  would  imple-
ment customized safety programs, targeting problem areas. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

2 

But  there  is  no  substitute  for  following  current  regulation.  It’s 
simply  a  common-sense  way  to  ensure  railroads  address  the  most 
dangerous safety problems first. 

Our  bill  would  address  three  major  areas  of  concern  that  affect 
the  entire  industry:  employee  fatigue,  under  the  hours-of-service 
laws, new train controls, and railroad safety technology and grade- 
crossing  safety.  And,  we  will  start  with  the  employee  fatigue  and 
hours-of-service. 

Under  current  law,  train  crews  can  work  up  to  400  hours  in  30 
days.  One  person  can’t  work  that  much  and  stay  awake,  let  alone 
be  expected  to  keep  anyone  safe.  Our  bill  would  authorize  the  De-
partment  of  Transportation  to  strengthen  the  antiquated  laws  on 
hours-of-service.  It  would  also  reduce  limbo  time,  the  time  spent 
traveling back to an employee’s duty station, after working or wait-
ing for such transportation there. 

Now,  I’m  pleased  to  welcome  Senator  Smith,  and  I  know  he  has 
some concerns over this issue. And we’ll continue to work together 
on this provision to perfect it. 

Second, our bill requires railroads to embrace Positive Train Con-
trol,  another  railroad  safety  technology,  which  will  reduce  train 
crashes,  and  help  save  lives.  For  example,  one  system  already  in 
use will automatically brake a moving train, if the engineer doesn’t 
start  applying  the  brake  in  time  to  stop  before  a  red  stop  signal. 
Putting Positive Train Control technology in place has been on the 
National  Transportation  Safety  Board’s  most  wanted  list  for  the 
rail  industry,  since  1990.  And  I  first  proposed  requiring  this  tech-
nology on the Northeast Corridor in 1987. 

Our  bill  would  create  a  reasonable  deadline  for  railroads  to  im-
plement  this  technology,  in  a  way  that’s  interoperable  throughout 
the  country,  and  provides  grants  to  assist  in  the  development  of 
these tools. 

Third,  our  bill  improves  pedestrian  and  grade  crossing  safety,  to 
help prevent accidents and injuries, and worse, deaths. Ninety-four 
percent  of  all  rail-related  deaths  involve  highway  grade-crossings, 
or  trespassers.  We  need  to  pin  down  the  problem  locations  in  our 
towns  and  cities,  which  will  require  the  cooperation  of  the  states. 
Our bill would require states to report the methods of protection 
at  all  highway  grade-crossings  to  the  Federal  Government,  so  we 
can identify those problem areas. 

States with historically high numbers of crossing accidents must 
also prepare comprehensive plans to increase safety, and to reduce 
accidents and deaths. 

Our  bill  has  many  other  important  provisions,  adding  200  more 
rail  safety  employees,  increasing  civil  penalty  amounts  for  failing 
to  observe  safety  regulations,  and  requiring  that  the  Federal  Rail-
road Administration make public reports on its enforcement activi-
ties. 

Now, I thank my colleague and Ranking Member, Senator Smith, 
for working on this bill with me, and I look forward to hearing from 
today’s witnesses, after we’ve heard from Senator Smith. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It’s  a  pleasure  to 
work  with  you  on  this  bill  as  we  develop  it.  I  appreciate  the  cour-
tesies you’ve extended to me and my staff. 

Let me be clear—this legislation is, by no means, a perfect prod-
uct  yet.  Rather,  it’s  a  work  in  progress,  and  I  think  it’s  important 
to  work  together  to  ultimately  get  a  better  handle  on  this  issue. 
And so I’m confident that the final product will benefit from today’s 
hearing. 

Railroads  are  an  integral  component  of  the  Nation’s  transpor-
tation system, and ensuring the safety of railroads is of critical im-
portance.  As  domestic  and  global  economies  continue  to  grow,  the 
demands  on  all  modes  of  transportation,  including  rail,  will  un-
doubtedly continue to increase. 

While  traffic  volume  on  railroads  has  increased  in  recent  years, 
the  actual  rate  of  accidents  has  decreased.  The  low  rate  of  rail-re-
lated accidents has made rail one of the safest ways to move goods 
throughout the country. 

The  legislation  the  Committee  will  take  up  aims  to  further  im-
prove upon the safety record of our railroads, through a number of 
key  measures,  including  improving  highway-rail  grade-crossing 
safety, developing and implementing new rail technologies, and re-
forming  hours-of-service  laws  to  reduce  fatigue  and  related  acci-
dents. 

So  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  on  these,  and 
other issues surrounding rail safety. And I also look forward to con-
tinuing  to  work  with  my  colleagues  to  improve  this  legislation  to 
get it to a place where it can pass the U.S. Senate. 

I welcome our witnesses and thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Senator Smith. 
And  I  welcome  the  panel,  already  seated  there,  Joe  Boardman, 
Administrator  of  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration;  John 
Tolman, President of the Brotherhood of Locomotive Engineers and 
Trainmen,  Division  of  the  Rail  Conference  of  the  International 
Brotherhood of Teamsters; Mr. Ed Hamberger, President and CEO 
of  the  Association  of  American  Railroads;  and  Mr.  David  Solow, 
CEO of Southern California Regional Rail Authority. 

I want to thank all of you for joining us, and I note the different 
interests represented, or let’s say, the different activities. Interests 
are all the same, the interests are to improve safety. 

And  we  invite  you,  and  Mr.  Boardman,  you’re  first,  and  we’ll 
allow  5  minutes,  please.  And  try  to  give  your  summary,  testimony 
in that time. But the record, of course, is open for your full written 
statement. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, 

ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member 
Smith. I appreciate the opportunity to be here, and I appreciate the 
hard work and thoughtfulness that went into the bill that you just 
introduced, I’ve looked it over. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

4 

I’d like to concentrate today, if I can, on the hours-of-service reg-
ulation  issues.  We  believe  that  train  crew  member  fatigue  has 
played  an  increasing  role  in  railroad  accidents  over  the  past  dec-
ade,  through  poor  judgment,  miscommunication  and  inattentive-
ness, and failure to follow standard operating procedures. The chal-
lenge  before  us  is  to  ensure  that  crew  members  consistently  have 
an  adequate  opportunity  to  rest,  do  not  suffer  from  medical  dis-
orders  that  can  disrupt  sleep,  and  are  fully  engaged  in,  and  com-
mitted to, maintaining alertness. 

However,  the  statutory  provisions  that  govern  the  hours-of-serv-
ice of railroad train crews, dispatchers, and signal maintainers are 
antiquated—essentially, a century old—and woefully inadequate to 
address present realities. 

For  example,  under  those  laws,  train  crews  may  work  on  a 
schedule  of  eight  hours  on-duty,  eight  hours  off-duty,  perpetually. 
Engineers  and  conductors  often  work  60  to  70  hours  a  week—and 
may  be  called  to  work  during  the  day  or  night,  which  may  disrupt 
sleep patterns and reduce their ability to function. 

Moreover,  the  hours-of-service  laws  contain  no  substantive  rule-
making  authority.  The  lack  of  regulatory  authority  over  duty 
hours—has  precluded  FRA  from  making  use  of  scientific  learning 
on  this  issue  of  sleep-wake  cycles—and  fatigue-induced  perform-
ance failures. 

Behavioral  science  has  progressed  to  the  point,  and  computer 
models can accurately predict the likely effect of specific sleep-and- 
rest  patterns  on  employee  performance.  Now,  we  recognize  that 
specific  amendments  to  the  hours-of-service  laws  might  mitigate 
some of the sources of fatigue, and yet we believe that sincere—and 
well-intentioned attempts at providing short-term relief will almost 
certainly  result 
limit 
FRA’s—and the industry’s—ability to consider or provide better so-
lutions downstream. 

in  unintended  consequences  that  may 

Even  if  exceptions  are  provided  for  in  statute,  treating  ‘‘limbo’’ 
time as on-duty time, for instance, may force carriers to reduce the 
length  of  many  assignments  to  avoid  the  possibility  of  violations, 
under  circumstances  where  safety  could  not  be  seriously  com-
promised, and may significantly increase the cost of any further re-
forms. 

Hours-of-service  issues  are  inherently  complex,  and  they  need  to 
be properly considered within the overall context of fatigue preven-
tion  and  management.  FRA  is  committed  to  achieving  significant 
progress in this area, but we require the regulatory authority to do 
so. 

We strongly recommend that existing hours-of-service laws be re-
placed  with  flexible  regulations  based  on  modern  scientific  under-
standing  of  fatigue.  Today  I’m  again  asking  you  for  your  support 
for legislation that will permit us to put into action what has been 
learned. 

In  order  to  apply  this  scientific  knowledge  to  the  problem  of  fa-
tigue,  we  first  propose  to  sunset  the  hours-of-service  laws,  but  re-
tain their protections as interim regulations embodying their provi-
sions. 

And next, we propose to make use of the extensive research find-
ings, in reviewing the issue of fatigue, through the FRA’s Railroad 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

5 

Safety  Advisory  Committee,  and  to  develop,  as  necessary,  new, 
science-based  requirements  that  can  help  us  reduce  the  number 
and severity of human-factor-caused train accidents and casualties. 
We  believe  revised,  benchmark  limits  are  needed  for  work  hours, 
and  requirements  for  rest  periods,  to  provide  simple  guidance  for 
fixed schedules, where that will suffice. 

We  also  propose  to  authorize  FRA—under  certain  circumstan-
ces—to  permit  railroads  to  comply  with  an  improved  fatigue-man-
agement  plan,  as  an  alternative  to  complying  with  the  benchmark 
limits set forth in any proposed regulations. 

With  the  tools  now  available,  we  will  be  able  to  evaluate  pro-
posed fatigue-management approaches, to ensure that they include 
an  objective  evaluation  of  a  wide  variety  of  more  flexible  work 
schedules  by  validated  techniques.  In  fact,  under  such  conditions, 
we  believe  that  the  most  safety-critical  railroad  employees  would 
be  protected  by  performance-based  fatigue-management  programs 
that will enhance safety, while holding down costs. 

For the sake of the public and employee safety, it’s time to make 
a  long-overdue  change,  by  granting  the  Secretary  rulemaking  au-
thority over hours-of-service, so that FRA—as the Secretary’s dele-
gate—is  authorized  to  directly  address  the  major  cause  of  far  too 
many train accidents. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Boardman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  other  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  I  am  very  pleased  to  be  here  today,  on  behalf  of  Secretary  of  Transpor-
tation  Peters,  to  discuss  the  reauthorization  of  the  Federal  Railroad  Administra-
tion’s (FRA) rail safety program. At your May 22 hearing, also on this subject, FRA’s 
witness  Associate  Administrator  for  Safety  Jo  Strang  included  in  her  testimony  an 
overview of FRA’s day-to-day work to reduce the number and the severity of railroad 
accidents, a status report on the agency’s implementation of our National Rail Safe-
ty Action Plan, a summary of our passenger safety rulemakings and other key safe-
ty initiatives, and an analysis of rail safety statistics. Today, for the sake of brevity, 
I  will  provide  an  update  of  these  safety  statistics  (at  Appendix  A)  and,  otherwise, 
focus on rail safety legislation alone. 

In February of this year, the Administration submitted its rail safety reauthoriza-
tion  bill,  the  Federal  Railroad  Safety  Accountability  and  Improvement  Act,  to  the 
Congress. The bill has been introduced, by request, in both the House and the Sen-
ate. I want to thank you again, Chairman Lautenberg, for introducing the Adminis-
tration bill, by request, for yourself and Senator Smith. The Administration bill has 
been  designated  as  H.R.  1516  and  S.  918,  respectively.  In  addition  to  proposing  to 
reauthorize  FRA’s  vital  safety  mission,  this  bill  calls  for  important—and  in  some 
cases historic—substantive changes in the rail safety laws that we expect will mate-
rially improve safety. I look forward to working with you to help secure their enact-
ment. 

The  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  has  also  provided  a  views  letter 
on  H.R.  2095  as  introduced  by  Chairman  Oberstar  and  Chairwoman  Brown.  DOT 
also  plans  to  provide  its  comments  on  major  rail  safety  reauthorization  legislation 
introduced in the Senate. 

The Administration’s Rail Safety Bill (H.R. 1516, S. 918) 

The Administration’s rail safety reauthorization bill would reauthorize appropria-
tions  for  FRA  to  carry  out  its  rail  safety  mission  for  4  years.  FRA  has  made  a  full 
copy of the proposal available on our website at http://www.fra.dot.gov/us/content/ 
48, including the supporting analysis for each section. Let me take this opportunity 
to  discuss  the  major  provisions  of  the  Administration  bill  and  how  we  believe  they 
will further FRA’s safety efforts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

A. Authorizes Safety Risk Reduction Program and Protects Confidentiality 

of Risk Analyses Produced 

6 

In order to enhance the accountability of railroads in assuming full responsibility 
for the safety of their employees and operations, the bill would authorize appropria-
tions  for  the  addition  of  a  safety  risk  reduction  program  to  supplement  FRA’s  cur-
rent safety activities. The bill requests Congressional endorsement of this pilot pro-
gram,  which  FRA  has  already  begun  on  a  voluntary  basis.  Since  rail-related  acci-
dents, injuries, and deaths are already at historically low levels, FRA seeks to aug-
ment  the  agency’s  traditional  behavior-based  and  design-specification-based  regula-
tions  with  a  robust  risk  reduction  program  to  further  drive  down  those  key  indica-
tors and measures of risk at a reasonable cost and in a practical manner before acci-
dents and injuries occur. 

In  the  rail  safety  context,  such  a  risk  reduction  program  is  intended  to  ensure 
that the systems by which railroads operate and maintain their properties are ade-
quate to meet or exceed safety objectives. Our current risk reduction program is in-
tended  to  encourage  an  open  collaboration  with  industry’s  labor  and  management 
so  that  they  will  try,  and  eventually  adopt,  voluntary  risk  reduction  approaches. 
FRA  is  placing  much  greater  emphasis  on  developing  models  of  how  railroads  can 
systematically evaluate safety risks and implement plans to eliminate or reduce the 
chance  for  workers  to  make  mistakes  that  can  lead  to  accidents  or  close  calls.  A 
safety  risk  reduction  program  could  integrate  previous  voluntary  efforts  in  the 
human  factors  area  (such  as  behavior-based  safety  methods  and  close  call  report-
ing), while extending similar risk management techniques to track safety and other 
areas. 

To encourage railroads to produce thorough, as opposed to superficial, risk assess-
ments,  a  companion  provision  in  the  bill  would  bar  public  disclosure  by  DOT  of 
records required under the safety risk reduction program, except for Federal law en-
forcement  purposes.  Also  in  order  to  promote  the  preparation  of  substantive  risk 
analyses  by  railroads,  the  provision  would  forbid  discovery  by  private  litigants  in 
civil  litigation  for  damages  of  any  information  compiled  or  collected  under  the  pro-
gram, and would forbid admission into evidence of the same information in civil liti-
gation  by  private  parties  for  damages.  Here  is  an  example  of  how  this  provision 
would work if enacted. A commuter railroad undertakes, develops, and writes a col-
lision  hazard  analysis  required  by  an  FRA  order  issued  under  the  risk  reduction 
program  and  implements  the  results  of  the  analysis.  In  this  process,  the  railroad 
identifies  a  bridge  abutment  near  a  crossover  as  a  collision  hazard.  It  is  unlikely 
that  the  railroad  would  be  able  to  remove  this  collision  hazard  (a  derailment  could 
send  the  cars  into  the  fixed  structure),  but  the  railroad  could  mitigate  the  risk  by 
reducing operating speeds and by further training its employees on safely transiting 
the  location.  DOT  would  not  be  allowed  to  release  the  railroad’s  written  hazard 
analysis except to enforce Federal law, and the hazard analysis (as well as informa-
tion  compiled  or  collected  under  the  program)  would  also  be  protected  from  dis-
covery in a civil action by private parties for damages. 

FRA  is  mindful  that  any  restriction  of  public  access  to  information  may  be  con-
troversial and requires careful scrutiny. However, to prevent misuse of the data de-
veloped under the risk reduction program, we are convinced that assuring confiden-
tiality  is  essential  to  promote  full,  accurate,  and  timely  disclosure  by  both  the  rail-
roads  and  their  employees,  making  certain  that  such  programs  are  meaningful  and 
more likely to bring about tangible improvements in safety. 
B.  Grants  Rulemaking  Authority  over  Hours-of-Service  to  the  Secretary  of 

Transportation 

Human  factors  are  a  primary  or  contributing  factor  in  more  than  a  third  of  all 
train accidents, constituting the leading cause of train accidents. Fatigue is at least 
a  contributing  factor  in  one  of  every  four  serious  human  factor  train  accidents.  We 
believe that crewmember fatigue has played an increasing role in railroad accidents 
over  the  past  decade  through  poor  judgment,  miscommunication,  inattentiveness, 
and  failure  to  follow  standard  operating  procedures.  The  challenge  before  us  is  to 
ensure  that  crewmembers  consistently  have  adequate  opportunity  to  rest,  do  not 
suffer  from  medical  disorders  that  can  disrupt  sleep,  and  are  fully  engaged  in,  and 
committed to, maintaining alertness. 

However,  the  statutory  provisions  that  govern  the  hours-of-service  of  railroad 
train  crews,  dispatchers,  and  signal  maintainers  are  antiquated—essentially  a  cen-
tury  old—and  woefully  inadequate  to  address  present  realities.  For  example,  under 
those laws, train crews may work on a schedule of 8 hours on-duty, 8 hours off-duty, 
perpetually.  Engineers  and  conductors  often  work  60  to  70  hours  a  week,  and  may 
be  called  to  work  during  the  day  or  night,  which  may  disrupt  sleep  patterns  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

reduce  their  ability  to  function.  Please  see  Appendix  B,  ‘‘Scientific  Learning  Dem-
onstrating the Inadequacy of the Hours-of-Service Laws.’’ 

7 

Moreover,  the  hours-of-service  laws  contain  no  substantive  rulemaking  authority. 
The  lack  of  regulatory  authority  over  duty  hours—authority  that  other  DOT  agen-
cies  have  with  respect  to  their  modes  of  transportation—has  precluded  FRA  from 
making  use  of  scientific  learning  on  this  issue  of  sleep-wake  cycles  and  fatigue-in-
duced  performance  failures.  Behavioral  science  has  progressed  to  the  point  that 
computer  models  can  accurately  predict  the  likely  effect  of  specific  sleep  and  rest 
patterns  on  employee  performance.  The  models  provide  useful  guidance  to  aid  em-
ployee  scheduling  practices,  and  as  discussed  in  FRA’s  May  testimony,  the  agency 
published a validation report of one such model in 2006. Yet, only the Union Pacific 
Railroad  Company  and  the  Canadian  Pacific  Railway  are  making  use  of  a  sleep 
model  to  evaluate  their  own  crew  scheduling  practices.  Most  railroads  have  yet  to 
integrate  use  of  such  models  into  their  operations  and  have  refrained  from  making 
public  commitments  to  use  this  capability  in  the  future.  Further,  over  the  past  15 
years,  the  history  of  attempts  by  rail  labor  and  management  to  cooperatively  im-
prove fatigue management has not experienced steady progress. 

We  recognize  that  specific  amendments  to  the  hours-of-service  laws  might  miti-
gate  some  sources  of  fatigue.  Yet,  we  believe  that  sincere  and  well-intentioned  at-
tempts at providing short-term relief will almost certainly result in unintended con-
sequences that may limit FRA’s and the industry’s ability to consider or provide bet-
ter  solutions  downstream.  Even  if  exceptions  are  provided  for  in  statute,  treating 
limbo  time  as  on-duty  time,  for  instance,  may  force  carriers  to  reduce  the  length  of 
many assignments to avoid the possibility of ‘‘violations’’ under circumstances where 
safety  could  not  be  seriously  compromised,  and  may  significantly  increase  the  cost 
of  any  further  reforms.  Hours-of-service  issues  are  inherently  complex,  and  they 
need  to  be  properly  considered  within  the  overall  context  of  fatigue  prevention  and 
management.  FRA  is  committed  to  achieving  significant  progress  in  this  area,  but 
we require the regulatory authority to do so. 

We  strongly  recommend  that  the  existing  hours-of-service  laws  be  replaced  with 
flexible  regulations  based  on  a  modern,  scientific  understanding  of  fatigue.  Today, 
I  am  again  asking  for  your  support  for  legislation  that  will  permit  us  to  put  into 
action  what  has  been  learned.  In  order  to  apply  this  scientific  knowledge  to  the 
problem of fatigue, the Administration bill first proposes to sunset the hours-of-serv-
ice  laws,  but  retain  their  protections  as  interim  regulations  embodying  their  sub-
stantive provisions. Next, the proposal calls for FRA, as the Secretary’s delegate, to 
make  use  of  the  extensive  research  findings  in  reviewing  the  issue  of  fatigue 
through  FRA’s  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Committee,  and  to  develop  as  necessary 
new,  science-based  requirements  that  can  help  us  reduce  the  number  and  severity 
of  human  factor-caused  train  accidents  and  casualties.  We  believe  revised  ‘‘bench-
mark’’  limits  are  needed  on  work  hours,  and  requirements  for  rest  periods,  to  pro-
vide simple guidance for fixed schedules, where that will suffice. 

The  bill  would  also  authorize  FRA  under  certain  circumstances  to  permit  rail-
roads  to  comply  with  an  approved  fatigue  management  plan  as  an  alternative  to 
complying  with  the  ‘‘benchmark’’  limits  set  forth  in  any  prospective  regulations. 
With  the  tools  now  available,  we  will  be  able  to  evaluate  proposed  fatigue  manage-
ment approaches to ensure that they include an objective evaluation of a wide vari-
ety of more flexible work schedules by validated techniques. In fact, under such con-
ditions,  we  believe  that  most  safety-critical  railroad  employees  would  be  protected 
by performance-based fatigue management programs that will enhance safety while 
holding down costs. 

For  the  sake  of  public  and  employee  safety,  it  is  time  to  make  a  long-overdue 
change by granting the Secretary rulemaking authority over hours-of-service so that 
FRA  as  the  Secretary’s  delegate  is  authorized  to  directly  address  the  major  cause 
of far too many train accidents. 
C. Promotes Crossing Safety 

Accidents  at  highway-rail  crossings  and  dedicated  pedestrian  crossings  over  rail-
road tracks account for more than a third of all fatalities arising from railroad oper-
ations. In 2006 alone, according to FRA’s preliminary figures, 368 people were killed 
at  crossings.  The  bill  seeks  to  prevent  accidents,  injuries,  and  deaths  at  crossings 
and to make crossings safer through two main provisions. 
1.  Requires  Reports  by  Railroads  and  States  to  DOT  on  the  Characteristics  of 

Crossings 

Currently, reporting to the DOT National Crossing Inventory is strictly voluntary. 
FRA  is  the  custodian  of  the  inventory,  and  the  quality  of  the  data  is  only  as  good 
as what states and railroads have historically reported. Some information is missing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

8 

from  the  Inventory  altogether.  Too  much  information  that  is  in  the  Inventory  has 
become  outdated,  rendering  its  use  at  least  problematic.  The  bill  would  remedy 
these  information  deficits  by  requiring  that  railroads  and  states  provide  the  Sec-
retary  with  current  information  regarding  the  country’s  approximately  277,000  at- 
grade  and  grade-separated  highway-rail  crossings  and  dedicated  pedestrian  cross-
ings  over  railroad  tracks.  Mandatory  reporting  would  make  this  unique  national 
database  more  current  and  complete,  which  would  help  (i)  States  better  rank  their 
crossings  by  risk  and  channel  resources  to  the  most  dangerous  crossings  first,  and 
(ii) DOT and transportation researchers identify the most promising ways to reduce 
crossing casualties. The bill would, therefore, require initial reports on all previously 
unreported crossings and then periodic updates on all crossings. 
2. Fosters Introduction of New Technology to Improve Safety at Public Highway-Rail 

Grade-Crossings 

Only about 40 percent of the Nation’s 144,000 public highway-rail grade-crossings 
are  equipped  with  an  active  device  to  give  warning  to  motorists  and  pedestrians  at 
the  crossing.  Many  crossings  have  only  crossbucks.  Active  warning  devices  are  ex-
pensive  to  install  and  maintain,  and,  perversely,  safety  engineering  improvements 
at one crossing are often cited in tort actions to prove or insinuate the relative inad-
equacy  of  warning  signs  or  devices  at  another  crossing.  Under  the  Administration 
bill,  if  the  Secretary  has  approved  a  new  technology  to  provide  advance  warning  to 
highway  users  at  a  grade  crossing,  the  Secretary’s  determination  preempts  any 
State law concerning the adequacy of the technology in providing the warning. FRA 
believes  that  this  proposal  would  help  encourage  the  creation  and  deployment  of 
new,  cost-effective  technology  at  the  Nation’s  approximately  80,000  public  grade 
crossings that still lack active warning devices. Let me provide an example of inno-
vative  crossing  safety  technology.  Under  an  FRA  waiver  the  Twin  Cities  and  West-
ern  Railroad  Company  and  a  supplier  successfully  demonstrated  a  warning  system 
designed for lower-volume roadways and rail lines using dedicated locomotives. The 
system  uses  the  Global  Positioning  System  and  a  data  radio  link  between  the  loco-
motive and each crossing. This product is now being commercialized by a major sig-
nal supplier. 
D.  Expands  the  Secretary’s  Authority  to  Disqualify  Individuals  Unfit  for 

Safety-Sensitive Service 

Another provision of the bill would expand the Secretary’s existing disqualification 
authority  to  cover  individuals  who,  after  opportunity  for  a  hearing,  are  deemed  to 
be  unfit  for  safety-sensitive  service  in  the  railroad  industry  because  of  a  violation 
of  the  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations  related  to  transporting  hazardous  material 
by  rail.  Currently,  FRA,  as  the  Secretary’s  delegate,  may  disqualify  an  individual 
only  for  a  violation  of  the  rail  safety  laws  or  regulations,  not  the  Hazardous  Mate-
rials  Regulations,  even  though  violation  of  the  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations 
may involve a greater potential accident risk or consequence (in the event of an acci-
dent).  This  proposal  would  logically  extend  our  disqualification  authority  over  rail-
road employees and complement current initiatives to strengthen FRA’s safety com-
pliance program. 
E.  Protects  Rail  Safety  Regulations  from  Legal  Attack  on  the  Ground  that 
They  Affect  Security  and  Repeals  the  Statutory  Requirement  for  the 
Secretary  of  Homeland  Security  to  Consult  with  the  Secretary  of 
Transportation when Issuing Security Rules that Affect Rail Safety 

The  bill  would  also  bar  legal  challenges  to  DOT  safety  regulations  on  the  basis 
that  they  affect  rail  security.  In  many  cases,  rail  safety  and  security  are  inter-
twined, if not linked inextricably, and part of the justification for certain DOT regu-
lations is that they enhance rail security. The bill would clarify the scope of the Sec-
retary’s safety jurisdiction and help deter or quickly rebuff any legal challenge that 
asserts  that  DOT  has  exceeded  its  statutory  authority  in  issuing  such  regulations. 
Of  course,  the  U.S.  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  would  continue  to 
exercise  primary  responsibility  for  the  promulgation  of  rail  security  regulations.  In 
this regard, the bill would repeal the statutory provision that, when issuing security 
rules  that  affect  rail  safety,  DHS  must  consult  with  DOT.  We  believe  the  provision 
is unnecessary and confusing in light of other statutes, Executive Orders, and exist-
ing  inter-Departmental  cooperation  formalized  under  the  DOT–DHS  Memorandum 
of Understanding and its related annexes on rail security. 
F.  Clarifies  the  Secretary’s  Authority  to  Issue  Temporary  Waivers  of  Rail 

Safety Regulations Related to Emergencies 

The  bill  would  clarify  that  FRA,  as  the  Secretary’s  delegate,  may  grant  a  tem-
porary waiver without prior notice and an opportunity for public comment and hear-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

9 

ing, if the waiver is directly related to an emergency event or needed to aid in recov-
ery efforts and the waiver is also in the public interest and consistent with railroad 
safety. Although FRA’s normal practice is to set aside time for public comment and 
hearing on waiver petitions, this process appreciably slows down issuance of waivers 
necessary for emergency response and recovery efforts. Yet granting a waiver with-
out  such  procedures  risks  legal  challenge.  The  provision  would  free  FRA  from  this 
dilemma  and  allow  the  agency  to  support  emergency  response  and  recovery  efforts 
by  dispensing  with  prior  notice  and  an  opportunity  for  comment  and  hearing,  and 
by otherwise expediting the process for granting waivers. Further, the relief granted 
would  be  temporary  (a  maximum  of  9  months),  and  the  normal  waiver  procedures 
would  have  to  be  followed  to  extend  the  temporary  relief  granted  should  doing  so 
be necessary. 
G. Authorizes the Monitoring of Railroad Radio Communications 

Currently, FRA is permitted to monitor railroad radio communications only in the 
presence of an authorized sender or receiver, such as a railroad employee. Yet, when 
railroad  employees  know  that  FRA  is  present,  they  tend  to  be  on  their  best  safety 
behavior.  Therefore,  FRA  cannot  be  sure  whether  the  level  of  compliance  observed 
is normal, and we are less able to identify what are, under ordinary circumstances, 
the most frequent and serious instances of noncompliance. Access to candid commu-
nications offsite would yield a truer picture of compliance levels. 

The bill would address this concern by letting FRA safety inspectors monitor and 
record  railroads’  radio  communications  over  their  dedicated  frequencies  outside  of 
the  presence  of  railroad  personnel  for  the  purpose  of  accident  prevention  (including 
accident investigation) and, with certain exceptions, to use the information received. 
As FRA’s objective of accident prevention is ordinarily fulfilled daily by conducting 
safety  inspections  of  railroad  operations  and  enforcing  the  rail  safety  laws,  moni-
toring  of  radio  communications  would  not  only  help  achieve  that  objective,  but 
would greatly improve the efficiency of those inspections, the accuracy of the results, 
and  the  effective  deployment  of  FRA’s  limited  inspection  resources  based  on  those 
more accurate results. 
H.  Clarifies  and  Relaxes  the  Existing  Statutory  Provision  on  Moving 

Certain Defective Equipment for Repair 

Finally, I would like to mention that the bill would amend a complicated statutory 
provision  that  states  the  conditions  for  hauling  a  railroad  car  or  locomotive  with  a 
safety  appliance  or  power  brake  defect  for  repair  without  civil  penalty  liability,  in-
cluding the requirement that equipment be back-hauled to the nearest available re-
pair  point.  Back  hauls  required  by  statute  can  be  both  unsafe  (because  of  the  haz-
ards  related  to  switching  a  car  out  of  one  train  and  into  another  train),  and  ineffi-
cient  (because  the  car  is  stopped  from  moving  toward  its  destination  and  forced  to 
go  to  a  different  place  that  is  physically  closer  than  the  next  forward  point  for  re-
pair).  The  proposal  would  allow  the  equipment  to  be  moved  to  the  next  forward 
point  of  repair  under  clear  regulatory  safeguards  for  moving  defective  equipment 
that are more consistent with the movement-for-repair provisions applicable to vehi-
cles with other types of defects, such as Freight Car Safety Standards defects. 

Further,  the  bill  would  also  define  some  key  statutory  terms  and  then  provide 
FRA,  as  the  Secretary’s  delegate,  with  rulemaking  authority  to  define  others.  Cur-
rently, FRA may provide only guidance on the meaning of these terms, and this has 
contributed  to  an  atmosphere  of  uncertainty  about  the  requirements  of  the  statute 
in day-to-day application. For example, FRA has received many complaints over the 
years  that  cars  have  been  hauled  past  a  repair  point  that  FRA  does  not  consider 
to  be  a  repair  point.  This  proposal  would,  therefore,  help  dispel  such  uncertainty 
and  promote  understanding  and  compliance  with  the  provisions  governing  the  safe 
movement of equipment with a safety appliance or power brake defect. 

I  would  like  to  emphasize  that,  while  all  of  the  provisions  I  have  discussed  are 
among the major provisions of the bill, there are other significant provisions I have 
not mentioned today that will also enhance rail safety. These include providing FRA 
rail security officers with greater access to Federal, State, and local law enforcement 
databases,  officer-protection  warning  systems,  and  communications  for  the  purpose 
of performing the Administrator’s civil and administrative duties to promote safety, 
including security, and for other purposes authorized by law. All of these provisions 
are  set  forth  in  the  bill  the  Secretary  presented  in  February,  and  I  would  be  glad 
to discuss each of them in detail with you. 
Legislation  Proposing  Amendments  to  the  Rail  Safety  and  Security 

Preemption Provision at 49 U.S.C. 20106 

The  Administration’s  bill  does  not  include  a  provision  that  would  revise  the  pre-
emption  provision  at  49  U.S.C.  § 20106  (Section  20106).  Section  3  of  H.R.  1401,  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

10 

passed  by  the  House  provides  that  causes  of  action  for  damages  under  State  law 
are  not  preempted  under  Section  20106  unless  compliance  with  the  State  standard 
makes compliance with the Federal standard impossible. It further provides that the 
Secretaries  of  Transportation  and  Homeland  Security  may  preempt  positive  State 
law  and  regulations  only  by  covering  the  subject  matter.  Common  law  tort  claims 
related  to  the  same  subject  matter  would  not  be  preempted.  The  effect  of  this  pro-
posal would be that an ever-changing myriad of State and local standards would be 
established  through  tort  litigation,  based  on  the  findings  of  individual  judges  and 
juries, who will undoubtedly have limited exposure to and understanding of the Fed-
eral  standards  at  issue,  and  even  less  understanding  of  the  consequences  of  their 
decisions  beyond  the  implications  for  the  immediate  plaintiffs.  The  result  of  this 
amendment  would  be  to  eviscerate  national  uniformity,  as  the  existence  of  Federal 
requirements and the railroad’s compliance with them would have no bearing on the 
potential  for  liability  in  the  event  of  an  accident  or  terrorist  incident.  The  effective 
standard  would  be  the  latest  tort  judgment  in  each  State,  without  any  assurance 
whatsoever  that  compliance  with  that  standard  would  save  a  railroad  from  future 
liability.  Faced  with  limitless  tort  liability  and  the  need  to  meet  these  changing 
standards  all  around  the  country,  nationally  uniform  standards  would  lose  their 
meaning and effectiveness, and safety and security would be compromised. For this 
reason, the Administration’s views letter on H.R. 1401 threatens a Presidential veto 
if section 3 remains in the bill. 

Another  proposed  amendment  to  Section  20106,  the  provision  at  Section  616  of 
H.R.  2095  as  passed  by  the  House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Committee, 
provides a State cause of action for damages for personal injury, death, or property 
damage resulting from a violation of Federal railroad safety and security standards. 
However,  the  amendment  goes  too  far  by  providing  that  a  State  cause  of  action  is 
also created for a railroad’s failure to ‘‘adequately comply’’ with any Federal regula-
tion  or  order  and  ‘‘adequately  comply’’  with  its  plan  or  standard  created  pursuant 
to a Federal regulation or order; this provision will generate needless litigation and 
undercut  the  national  uniformity  that  section  20106  aims  to  achieve.  If  the  Com-
mittee  needs  further  information  to  address  this  important  issue,  FRA  staff  would 
be glad to provide assistance. 
Conclusion 

The  Administration’s  rail  safety  reauthorization  bill  would  enable  FRA  to  con-
tinue  its  existing  rail  safety  initiatives  and  to  enhance  rail  safety  systematically  in 
many  ways.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Subcommittee  to  bring  about  the 
enactment  of  the  Administration’s  bill,  and  to  help  make  our  Nation’s  railroad  sys-
tem even safer. Thank you. 

The Railroad Industry’s Safety Record 

APPENDIX A 

The  railroad  industry’s  overall  safety  record  is  very  positive,  and  most  safety 
trends  are  moving  in  the  right  direction.  While  not  even  a  single  death  or  injury 
is  acceptable,  progress  is  continually  being  made  in  the  effort  to  improve  railroad 
safety. This improvement is demonstrated by an analysis of FRA’s database of rail-
road reports of accidents and incidents that have occurred over the nearly three dec-
ades from 1978 through 2006. See 49 CFR Part 225. (The period 1978 through 2006 
is  chosen  for  analysis  because  the  worst  year  for  rail  safety  in  recent  decades  was 
1978,  and  2006  is  the  last  complete  year  for  which  preliminary  data  are  available.) 
Between 1978 and 2006, the total number of rail-related accidents and incidents has 
fallen from 90,653 to 13,139, an all-time low since FRA’s existing database was first 
established  in  1975,  representing  a  decline  of  86  percent.  Between  1978  and  2006, 
total  rail-related  fatalities  have  declined  from  1,646  to  912,  a  reduction  of  45  per-
cent.  From  1978  to  2006,  total  employee  cases  (fatal  and  nonfatal)  have  dropped 
from 65,193 to 5,165, the record low; this represents a decline of 92 percent. In the 
same  period,  total  employee  deaths  have  fallen  from  122  in  1978  to  16  in  2006,  a 
decrease of 87 percent. 

Contributing  to  this  generally  improving  safety  record  has  been  a  74-percent  de-
cline  in  train  accidents  since  1978  (a  total  of  2,891  train  accidents  in  2006,  com-
pared  to  10,991  in  1978),  even  though  rail  traffic  has  increased.  (Total  train-miles 
were  up  by  7.8  percent  from  1978  to  2006.)  In  addition,  the  year  2006  saw  only  28 
train  accidents,  out  of  the  2,891  reported,  in  which  a  hazardous  material  was  re-
leased,  with  a  total  of  only  69  hazardous  material  cars  releasing  some  amount  of 
product, despite about 1.7 million movements of hazardous materials by rail. 

In  other  words,  over  the  last  almost  three  decades,  the  number  and  rate  of  train 
accidents, total deaths arising from rail operations, employee fatalities and injuries, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

11 

and  hazardous  materials  releases  all  have  fallen  dramatically.  In  most  categories, 
these improvements have been most rapid in the 1980s, and tapered off in the late 
1990s. Causes of the improvements have included a much more profitable economic 
climate  for  freight  railroads  following  deregulation  in  1980  under  the  Staggers  Act 
(which  led  to  substantially  greater  investment  in  plant  and  equipment),  enhanced 
safety  awareness  and  safety  program  implementation  on  the  part  of  railroads  and 
their  employees,  and  FRA’s  safety  monitoring  and  standard  setting.  (Most  of  FRA’s 
safety  rules  were  issued  during  this  period.)  In  addition,  rail  remains  an  extremely 
safe  mode  of  transportation  for  passengers.  Since  1978,  more  than  11.2  billion  pas-
sengers  have  traveled  by  rail,  based  on  reports  filed  with  FRA  each  month.  The 
number of rail passengers has steadily increased over the years, and since 2000 has 
averaged more than 500 million per year. Although 12 rail passengers died in train 
collisions  and  derailments  in  2005,  none  did  in  2006.  On  a  passenger-mile  basis, 
with an average about 15.5 billion passenger-miles per year since the year 2000, rail 
travel  is  about  as  safe  as  scheduled  airlines  and  intercity  bus  transportation  and 
is  far  safer  than  private  motor  vehicle  travel.  Rail  passenger  accidents—while  al-
ways to be avoided—have a very high passenger survival rate. 

As indicated previously, not all of the major safety indicators are positive. Grade- 
crossing  and  rail  trespasser  incidents  continue  to  cause  a  large  proportion  of  the 
deaths  associated  with  railroading.  Grade-crossing  and  rail  trespassing  deaths  ac-
counted  for  97  percent  of  the  912  total  rail-related  deaths  in  2006.  In  recent  years, 
rail trespasser deaths have replaced grade crossing fatalities as the largest category 
of rail-related deaths. In 2006, 521 persons died while on railroad property without 
authorization, and 368 persons lost their lives in grade crossing accidents. Further, 
significant train accidents continue to occur, and the train accident rate per million 
train-miles  has  not  declined  at  an  acceptable  pace  in  recent  years.  It  actually  rose 
slightly  in  2003  and  2004  (to  4.05  and  4.39,  respectively)  compared  to  that  in  2002 
(3.76),  although  it  dropped  in  2005  (to  4.11)  and  in  2006  (to  3.57),  close  to  the  all- 
time low of 3.54 achieved in 1997. 

The  causes  of  train  accidents  are  generally  grouped  into  five  categories:  human 
factors;  track  and  structures;  equipment;  signal  and  train  control;  and  miscella-
neous. The great majority of train accidents are caused by human factors and track. 
In  recent  years,  most  of  the  serious  events  involving  train  collisions  or  derailments 
resulting in release of hazardous material, or harm to rail passengers, have resulted 
from  human  factor  or  track  causes.  Accordingly,  the  National  Rail  Safety  Action 
Plan makes human factors and track the major target areas for improving the train 
accident rate. 

Scientific  Learning  Demonstrating  the  Inadequacy  of  the  Hours-of-Service 

Laws 

APPENDIX B 

The  following  four  examples  illustrate  some  of  the  ways  in  which  the  existing 
hours-of-service statutory regime fails to reflect the latest scholarship on the subject 
of fatigue. 

First,  current  scientific  information  indicates  that  to  feel  well  rested  most  people 
need approximately 8 hours of sleep per night. The current hours-of-service laws re-
quire a minimum off-duty period of only 10 hours if an employee in train and engine 
service  has  worked  12  consecutive  hours  in  the  previous  24-hour  period.  If  an  em-
ployee  works  11  hours  and  59  minutes  or  less,  the  laws  require  a  minimum  rest 
period  of  only  8  hours.  Very  few  employees  work  12  consecutive  hours;  therefore, 
most may legally be called back to duty with only 8 hours off-duty. During that off- 
duty time, the employee must travel to and from work and attend to personal needs 
such  as  bathing  and  eating.  Crew-calling  practices  allow  the  employee  to  be  called 
as  little  as  2  hours  prior  to  the  beginning  of  the  next  duty  period.  Given  these  cir-
cumstances,  it  is  certain  that  the  current  law  permits  employees  to  work  with  less 
than 8 hours of sleep per night. 

An  FRA  study  of  locomotive  engineers’  sleep  and  work  patterns  found  that  the 
average  locomotive  engineer  obtained  7.13  hours  of  sleep  per  night.1 Another  FRA 
study of train handling performance conducted on a highly realistic locomotive simu-
lator  by  locomotive  engineers  working  under  schedules  that  conformed  with  the 

1 Pollard,  J.K.  1996.  Locomotive  engineer’s  activity  diary.  Report  Number  DOT/FRA/RRP–96/ 

02. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

12 

hours-of-service laws 2 found that engineers who worked 10 hours and had 12 hours 
off-duty,  slept  an  average  of  only  6.1  hours.  A  similar  group  of  engineers  who  also 
worked 10 hours, but had only 9.3 hours off-duty, slept an average of only 4.6 hours. 
Again, most people need about 8 hours of sleep per night; therefore, for most people, 
the  amount  of  sleep  these  engineers  received  was  insufficient  even  though  their 
schedules fully conformed with the hours-of-service laws. 

Second,  scientific  information  also  shows  that  the  quantity  and  quality  of  sleep 
vary  with  the  time  of  day.  Most  people  sleep  best  at  night;  however,  the  current 
hours-of-service laws do not take the time of day when sleep can occur into account. 
Under  those  laws,  engineers  who  quit  work  at  dawn  and  have  to  sleep  during  the 
daytime,  when  it  is  harder  to  sleep,  get  the  same  minimum  eight  or  10  hours  off 
as engineers who quit work in the evening and have the relative luxury of sleeping 
at  night.  The  study  by  Pollard  referenced  earlier  found  that  engineers,  in  fact,  ob-
tain the least sleep if their on-duty period ends between 5 a.m. and noon. 

Third,  most  mammals,  including  human  beings,  have  an  approximately  24-hour 
sleep-wake  cycle  known  as  a  ‘‘circadian  rhythm.’’  Rapid  changes  in  the  circadian 
pattern of sleep and wakefulness disrupt many physiological functions such as hor-
mone  releases,  digestion,  and  temperature  regulation.  Human  function  can  be  af-
fected,  performance  may  be  impaired,  and  a  general  feeling  of  debility  may  occur 
until  realignment  is  achieved.  The  maximum  work  periods  and  minimum  off-duty 
periods  specified  in  the  current  hours-of-service  laws  force  sleep-wake  cycles  into  a 
less-than-24-hour pattern that is highly unnatural and very difficult to adapt to. Jet 
lag when flying east is the most commonly experienced syndrome similar to the ex-
perience of consistently working on a less-than-24-hour cycle. 

Fourth,  recent  studies  ‘‘suggest  that  sleep  loss  (less  than  7  hours  per  night)  may 
have  wide-ranging  effects  on  the  cardiovascular,  endocrine,  immune,  and  nervous 
systems, including the following: 

• Obesity in adults . . . 
• Diabetes and impaired glucose tolerance 
• Cardiovascular disease and hypertension 
• Anxiety symptoms 
• Depressed mood 
• Alcohol use[.]’’ 3 
In other words, sleep loss, which the current hours-of-service regime permits rail-
road operating employees to suffer, contributes not only to the safety risk of fatigue, 
but  also  to  a  gamut  of  health  risks,  including  the  risk  of  serious  health  problems 
such as diabetes, cardiovascular disease, and hypertension. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Hamberger? 

STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT AND 

CEO, ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Smith.  On 
behalf  of  the  members  of  the  AAR,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to address rail safety. I’d like to associate myself with the remarks 
of  Administrator  Boardman  in  thanking  both  of  you,  and  your 
staffs,  for  the  open-door  policy  you’ve  had,  and  the  thoughtful  way 
in which you’ve addressed this very complex subject matter. 

You  astutely  observed,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  94  percent  of  the  fa-
talities  are  as  a  result  of  grade-crossing  accidents,  or  trespassing 
accidents.  And  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  effort  in  this  bill,  but 
also  in  your  capacity  as  a  member  of  Environment  and  Public 
Works Committee, in fully funding the Section 130 Grade-Crossing 
Safety Program. Over the years, this program has saved thousands 

2 Thomas,  G.R.,  Raslear,  T.G.,  and  Kuehn,  G.I.  1997.  The  effects  of  work  schedule  on  train 
handling  performance  and  sleep  of  locomotive  engineers:  A  simulator  study.  Report  Number 
DOT/FRA/ORD–97–09. 

3 Institute  of  Medicine  of  the  National  Academies.  Sleep  Disorders  and  Sleep  Deprivation:  an 

Unmet Public Health Problem (2006), p. 59. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

13 

of  lives,  and,  in  fact,  last  year  was  the  safest  in  history,  in  terms 
of grade-crossing collision rates. 

And, that’s really just one of the safety milestones established in 
the industry in 2006. Our employee injury rate was also the lowest 
in  history  last  year,  and  the  train  accident  rate  was  just  fraction-
ally higher than the record low set a few years ago. 

Progress  is  continuing  this  year,  with  preliminary  FRA  data  for 
the  first  4  months  of  2007  showing  a  14  percent  improvement  in 
the  train  accident  rate,  as  well  as  further  reductions  in  both  the 
employee injury, and grade-crossing accident rates. 

Turning to the draft legislation, I particularly want to thank the 
Chairman  and  the  Committee  for  their  support  of  funding  for  de-
sign and construction of a tunnel at the Transportation Technology 
Center,  in  Pueblo,  Colorado.  This  facility  will  be  used  to  improve 
safety  and  security  in  tunnels,  and  to  provide  training  for  emer-
gency responders. 

There  are  a  few  other  provisions  I’d  also  like  to  address,  one  of 
these  concerns  limbo  time.  As  I  testified  on  May  22nd,  our  pre-
ferred option would be to make three changes to the current hours- 
of-service  regulations  that  we  believe  would  address  the  fatigue 
issues surrounding limbo time. 

First,  any  employee  who  works  12  consecutive  hours  on-duty, 
and  then  1  hour  or  more  of  limbo  time,  should  receive  14  consecu-
tive  hours  of  off-duty  time,  to  make  sure  that  there  is  no  rest  def-
icit. 

Second,  train  and  engine  service  employees  should  be  subject  to 

a new monthly maximum on-duty time of 276 hours. 

And third, even though limbo time is not on-duty time, it should 

be included in that new monthly maximum of 276 hours. 

We  believe  these  measure  strike  a  balance  between  fatigue  con-

cerns, and the 24/7 reality of railroad operations. 

bill. 

Although that is our preferred approach, I notice it’s not in your 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. HAMBERGER. So, let me comment on the draft bill’s approach. 
We appreciate your recognition that limbo time cannot be banned 
altogether,  and  that  you  provide  for  certain  exceptions.  We  would 
like  to  work  with  you  and  your  staff  to  clarify  and  refine  that  list. 
For  example,  we  believe  seasonal  congestion—as  opposed  to  sys-
temic  congestion—should  be  considered  as  an  exception.  Another 
provision  mandates  that  train  and  engine  employees  cannot  work 
unless they have had at least 24 consecutive hours off-duty during 
the  previous  7  days.  This  limit  is  particularly  difficult  for  our  24/ 
7 operating environment, and could make weekend staffing particu-
larly  difficult.  We  would  like  to  change  that  to  either  7  on  and  1 
off,  or  perhaps  even  7  on  and  2  off,  as  a  way  to  resolve  that  prob-
lem. 

The  legislation  prescribes  advanced  train  control  systems  that 
can  help  prevent  accidents  by  automatically  stopping  or  slowing 
trains, before they encounter a dangerous situation. Those systems 
are  very  complex,  and  must  include  reliable  technology  to  inform 
dispatchers of a train’s precise location, a means to warn operators 
of actual—or potential—problems, and, independent of the train op-
erator, take action to prevent an accident from occurring. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

14 

They  must  also  be  interoperable  across  the  entire  120,000-mile 

network, and over the 600 railroads that operate in the country. 

We are committed to implementing train control systems, but be-
cause  of  the  complexities  I’ve  just  referenced,  we’re  uncomfortable 
with  establishing  a  rigid  deadline  for  deployment  at  this  time.  As 
an alternative to a specific date, we would ask you to consider hav-
ing  each  railroad  present  to  the  FRA—12  months  after  enactment 
of  this  bill—their  plan  to  implement  train  control  technology.  The 
FRA  would  then  report  to  you  and  the  Transportation  Committee 
on the House side on those plans, and perhaps at that time, a more 
firm implementation timetable could be established. 

Finally,  the  legislation  proposes  significant  increases  in  max-
imum  fines  for  safety  violations.  I  would  suggest  that  the  max-
imum  penalty  of  $25,000  is  disproportionate,  especially  given  the 
fact that the railroad industry’s safety record is dramatically better 
than  that  of  the  motor  carrier  industry,  where  the  maximum  fine 
is $5,000, and of course they are our primary competitor in fighting 
to move freight around the country. 

Let  me  just  reiterate,  safety  is  our  top  priority,  and  we  believe 
that  shows  through  our  ever-improving  safety  record.  We’re  com-
mitted to working with you, others in Congress, our employees and 
our customers, to ensure that rail safety continues to improve. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hamberger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

On behalf of the members of the Association of American Railroads (AAR), thank 
you for the opportunity to address rail safety in general and the Railroad Safety En-
hancement  Act  of  2007  in  particular.  AAR  members  account  for  the  vast  majority 
of  freight  railroad  mileage,  employees,  and  traffic  in  Canada,  Mexico,  and  the 
United States. 
Overview of Rail Safety 

For  railroads,  pursuing  safe  operations  is  not  an  option,  it  is  an  imperative.  It 
makes  business  sense  and  it’s  the  right  thing  to  do.  Through  massive  investments 
in  safety-enhancing  infrastructure,  equipment,  and  technology;  extensive  employee 
training;  cooperation  with  rail  labor,  suppliers,  customers,  communities,  and  the 
Federal Railroad Administration (FRA); cutting-edge research and development; and 
steadfast  commitment  to  applicable  laws  and  regulations,  railroads  are  at  the  fore-
front of advancing safety. 

The  overall  U.S.  rail  industry  safety  record  is  excellent.  As  an  FRA  official  noted 
in February 2007 testimony to Congress, ‘‘The railroads have an outstanding record 
in  moving  all  goods  safely.’’  Rail  safety  continues  to  improve.  In  fact,  in  aggregate 
2006  was  the  safest  year  for  railroads  ever.  According  to  FRA  data,  the  rail  em-
ployee  casualty  rate  in  2006  was  the  lowest  in  history,  having  fallen  81  percent 
since  1980.  Likewise,  the  grade  crossing  collision  rate  in  2006  was  the  lowest  ever, 
having fallen 76 percent since 1980. And from 1980 to 2006, railroads reduced their 
overall  train  accident  rate  by  69  percent.  The  train  accident  rate  in  2006  was  just 
fractionally higher than the record low. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

15 

Preliminary  FRA  data  for  the  first  4  months  of  2007  show  a  14  percent  improve-
ment  in  the  train  accident  rate  compared  with  the  same  period  in  2006,  as  well  as 
improvements in the employee injury rate and the grade crossing collision rate. 

Moreover, according to U.S. Department of Labor data, railroads today have lower 
employee  injury  rates  than  other  modes  of  transportation  and  most  other  major  in-
dustry  groups,  including  agriculture,  construction,  manufacturing,  and  private  in-
dustry  as  a  whole.  Available  data  also  indicate  that  U.S.  railroads  have  employee 
injury rates well below those of most major foreign railroads. 

Railroads  are  proud  of  their  safety  record,  which  results  from  railroads’  recogni-
tion  of  their  responsibilities  regarding  safety  and  the  enormous  resources  they  de-
vote  to  its  advancement.  At  the  same  time,  railroads  want  rail  safety  to  continue 
to  improve,  and  they  agree  that  safety  should  be  the  FRA’s  highest  priority.  Rail-
roads  are  always  willing  to  work  cooperatively  with  you,  other  policymakers,  the 
FRA,  rail  employees,  and  others  to  find  practical,  effective  ways  to  make  this  hap-
pen. 

A  commitment  to  safety  that  permeates  the  workplace  is  critical  to  promoting 
safety.  Railroads  have  that  commitment.  But  a  healthy  balance  sheet  is  important 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
B
M
A
H
6
2
7

s
p
e
.
1
B
M
A
H
6
2
7

16 

to  safety  as  well.  A  financially-viable  railroad  will  be  in  a  much  better  position  to 
invest in safety enhancements than a financially-weak carrier. 

The  record  investments  that  railroads  have  made  in  their  infrastructure,  equip-
ment, and technology in recent years have made railroads much safer. These invest-
ments  were  made  possible  by  the  moderate  improvements  in  profitability  that  rail-
roads  have  enjoyed  since  passage  of  the  Staggers  Rail  Act  of  1980.  Consequently, 
legislative or regulatory actions that created significant new spending requirements, 
and/or  unduly  restricted  rail  earnings,  could  have  unintended  negative  safety  con-
sequences  in  addition  to  negative  capacity,  efficiency,  and  service  reliability  con-
sequences. 

Of course, no budget is unlimited, even for something as important as safety and 
even  for  railroads  that  have  experienced  financial  improvement  in  recent  years. 
Safety will not be advanced if resources are spent on programs or requirements that 
do  little  to  improve  safety,  or  if  unfunded  mandates  lock  up  resources  that  would 
have  a  more  pronounced  impact  on  safety  if  spent  elsewhere.  Unnecessary  and  un-
funded  mandates  would  increase  the  cost  of  rail  service  and  drive  more  traffic  to 
the  highways,  where  the  safety  record  is  far  less  favorable  than  it  is  on  the  rails. 
Below  I  will  discuss  several  important  topics  associated  with  rail  safety,  discuss 
ways that railroads are working to advance safety in those areas, and discuss steps 
that we believe policymakers should take (or not take) to promote rail safety, espe-
cially  as  they  relate  to  the  Railroad  Safety  Enhancement  Act  of  2007.  For  the  sake 
of  brevity,  at  times  I  refer  back  to  my  testimony  on  rail  safety  to  this  committee 
on May 22 of this year. 
Role of Technology 

Technology  plays  a  crucial  role  in  rail  safety.  Much  of  this  technology  has  been, 
and is being, developed and/or refined at the Transportation Technology Center, Inc. 
(TTCI)  in  Pueblo,  Colorado,  a  wholly-owned  subsidiary  of  the  AAR  and  the  world’s 
finest  rail  research  facility.  Its  48  miles  of  test  tracks,  highly-sophisticated  testing 
equipment,  metallurgy  labs,  simulators,  and  other  diagnostic  tools  are  used  to  test 
track structure, evaluate freight car and locomotive performance, assess component 
reliability, and much more. The facility is owned by the FRA but has been operated 
(under  a  competitively-bid  contract  with  the  FRA)  by  TTCI  since  1984.  TTCI  is  re-
sponsible for all the facility’s operating costs and some capital costs. 

The  rail  industry  is  pleased  that  some  members  of  this  committee  have  had  the 
opportunity to see TTCI in person, and I extend an open invitation to others in Con-
gress, including members of this committee, to visit the facility when they can. 

In  my  testimony  to  this  committee  on  May  22,  I  listed  many  of  the  technological 
advances  that  are  contributing  to  improved  rail  safety,  including  advanced  wayside 
detectors  that  identify  defects  on  passing  rail  cars;  ground-penetrating  radar  that 
helps  identify  problems  below  the  ground  (such  as  excessive  water  penetration  and 
deteriorated  ballast)  that  hinder  track  stability;  advanced  track  geometry  cars  that 
use sophisticated electronic and optical instruments to inspect track conditions; and 
much more. 
Train Control Technology 

Among the most important new railroad technologies under development are train 
control  systems  that,  in  certain  circumstances,  can  help  prevent  accidents  by  auto-
matically  stopping  or  slowing  trains  before  they  encounter  a  dangerous  situation. 
Through predictive enforcement, train control technologies could significantly reduce 
the  incidence  of  train  accidents  caused  by  human  error,  especially  train  collisions, 
derailments due to excessive speed, and incursions onto unauthorized trackage. 

Train  control  systems  are  extremely  complex.  At  a  minimum,  they  must  include 
reliable technology to inform dispatchers and operators of a train’s precise location; 
a  means  to  warn  operators  of  actual  or  potential  problems  (e.g.,  excessive  speed); 
and  a  means  to  take  action,  if  necessary,  independent  of  the  train  operator  (e.g., 
stop a train before it reaches the physical limits of its operating authority or allowed 
speed).  Some  systems  will  also  include  additional  features,  such  as  expanding  the 
ability  to  monitor  the  position  of  hand-operated  switches.  Perhaps  the  most  critical 
element  of  these  systems  is  sophisticated  software  capable  of  accommodating  all  of 
the variables associated with rail operations. When successfully implemented, these 
enhanced  train  control  capabilities  will  promote  and  enhance  safe  train  operations. 
Major  railroads  are  engaged  in  various  ongoing  projects  to  test  elements  of  this 
new  technology.  For  example,  BNSF  has  performed  extensive  and  successful  pilot 
testing of its version of train control (Electronic Train Management System) in Illi-
nois  and  elsewhere.  BNSF  recently  received  final  approval  from  the  FRA  to  imple-
ment  the  technology  on  lines  elsewhere  on  its  system.  Other  train  control  projects 
in  progress  on  major  freight  railroads  include  CSX’s  Communications-Based  Train 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

17 

Management  (CBTM)  system,  Norfolk  Southern’s  Optimized  Train  Control  (OTC) 
system,  and  Union  Pacific’s  Communications-Based  Train  Control  (CBTC)  system. 
Implementing advanced train control technology will require major capital invest-
ments in wireless networks; sophisticated location-determination systems; highly-re-
liable  software;  and  digital  processors  onboard  locomotives,  in  dispatching  offices 
and, for some systems, along tracks. 

Railroads  are  committed  to  the  development  and  implementation  of  advanced 
train  control  technology  where  it  makes  sense  to  do  so  (e.g,  on  high-density  main 
lines, rather than low-density branch lines or yards), and at a pace that can be justi-
fied by available funds. Because there are so many variables involved, and because 
railroads  are  still  investigating  different  train  control  systems  and  the  advantages 
and  disadvantages  they  offer,  railroads  believe  that  a  rigid  deadline  is  not  appro-
priate. Railroads recognize that 2018 (the year mentioned in the legislation, though 
it allows the Secretary of Transportation to set an earlier date) is some years away, 
but  the  tremendous  costs  and  complexities  involved  in  train  control  systems  argue 
for  flexibility,  not  rigidity,  both  in  time  and  operational  functionality.  As  an  alter-
native  to  a  specific  date,  railroads  favor  a  commitment  to  provide  the  FRA  with  an 
implementation  plan  regarding  train  control  within  12  months,  with  the  FRA  then 
reporting  to  Congress.  Perhaps  at  that  point  a  firmer  implementation  timetable 
could be established. 

Just  one  of  the  many  complexities  involved  concerns  radio  spectrum  issues.  Rail-
roads  use  the  radio  spectrum  in  a  wide  variety  of  safety-critical  settings,  including 
yard  operations,  maintenance  of  way,  police,  equipment  identification,  end-of-train 
units,  defect  detectors,  distributed  power,  and  train  control.  Only  radio  can  provide 
immediate  information  on  the  speed,  location,  and  direction  of  the  hundreds  of 
trains that might be operating at the same time on a single railroad. Thus, safe and 
reliable  railroad  operation  depends  on  immediate  and  reliable  access  to  the  radio 
spectrum,  as  well  as  protection  against  interference  and  encroachment  on  railroad 
frequencies by others. 

However,  there  is  concern  that  widespread  use  of  train  control  technology  could 
be  inhibited  because  of  ‘‘spectrum  congestion’’—i.e.,  the  lack  of  sufficient  and  avail-
able spectrum frequencies within the portion of the spectrum used by railroads. This 
problem  takes  on  even  greater  urgency  in  light  of  efforts  by  the  Federal  Commu-
nications  Commission  to  narrow  (or  ‘‘refarm’’)  the  bandwidth  for  existing  channels. 
Suitable  spectrum  alternatives  for  nationwide  usage  for  train  control  are  few.  The 
rail industry continues to investigate this issue, but may need Federal Government 
assistance in finding suitable alternatives. 
Fatigue Management in the Rail Industry 

It  is  not  in  a  railroad’s  best  interest  to  have  employees  who  are  too  tired  to  per-
form  their  duties  properly.  That’s  why  railroads  have  long  partnered  with  labor  to 
gain  a  better  understanding  of  fatigue-related  issues  and  find  effective,  innovative 
solutions to fatigue-related problems. 

Combating  fatigue  is  a  shared  responsibility.  Employers  need  to  provide  an  envi-
ronment that allows their employees to obtain necessary rest during off-duty hours, 
and  employees  must  set  aside  time  when  off-duty  to  obtain  the  rest  they  need.  It 
is  also  clear  that  factors  that  can  result  in  fatigue  are  multiple,  complex,  and  fre-
quently  intertwined.  Therefore,  efforts  to  combat  fatigue  should  be  based  on  sound 
scientific research, not on anecdotes or isolated events. There is no single, easy solu-
tion  to  fatigue-related  problems,  especially  in  an  industry  that  must  operate  24 
hours per day every day of the year. 

Individual  railroads  are  pursuing  a  variety  of  fatigue  countermeasures,  based  on 
what  they’ve  found  to  be  most  effective  for  their  particular  circumstances  and  the 
provisions of their collective bargaining agreements. I discussed many of these coun-
termeasures  in  my  May  2007  testimony.  Not  every  countermeasure  is  appropriate 
for every railroad, or even for different parts of the same railroad, because the effec-
tiveness  of  various  fatigue  countermeasures  depends  on  the  circumstances  unique 
to each railroad. 
Background on Railroad Hours-of-Service 

The  on-duty  time  of  rail  employees  involved  in  operating,  dispatching,  and  sig-

naling trains is governed by the Hours of Service Act (HSA). 

Under the HSA, rail employees who operate trains (i.e., conductors and engineers) 
must go off-duty after 12 consecutive hours on the job, and then must have at least 
10  consecutive  hours  off-duty.  If  they  go  off-duty  after  less  than  12  hours  on  the 
job,  they  must  have  at  least  8  consecutive  hours  off-duty.  On-duty  time  starts  the 
minute the employee reports for duty and includes any work that involves engaging 
in the movement of a train and deadhead transportation (see p. 9) to a duty assign-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

18 

ment.  Off-duty  time  starts  when  the  employee  is  released  from  duty,  generally  at 
a designated terminal or place of lodging. 

For  dispatchers,  a  workday  is  limited  to  9  hours  in  a  24-hour  period  where  two 

shifts are used, or 12 hours over the same period when there is only one shift. 

Finally,  signal  employees  can  work  a  maximum  of  12  consecutive  hours  on-duty, 

followed by at least 10 consecutive hours off-duty. 

Railroads  must  keep  detailed  records  specifying  when  each  covered  employee  is 
on-duty  or  off-duty.  Violations  of  the  HSA  can  result  in  fines  of  between  $500  and 
$10,000 per violation, with each employee considered a separate violation. 

To  comply  with  the  HSA  and  still  operate  as  a  highly-competitive  24-hours  per 
day,  7  days  per  week  industry,  freight  railroads  try  to  schedule  crew  assignments 
with  as  much  precision  as  possible.  Unfortunately,  the  nature  of  rail  operations 
makes precision extremely difficult to achieve. 

Most people are familiar with passenger modes of transportation, and that famili-
arity  at  times  slants  our  thinking  about  how  freight  railroads  do  and  should  oper-
ate. A single flight crew, for example, will typically fly a plane from, say, Los Ange-
les  to  Washington.  Occasionally,  weather  or  other  problems  might  impact  airline 
schedules,  but  by  and  large  passenger  airlines  are  able  to  offer  predictable,  regu-
larly-scheduled  service.  The  fact  that  airlines  can  often  ‘‘reset  the  clock’’  each  day 
(because  operations  are  greatly  reduced  at  night)  helps  them  maintain  scheduled 
service. 

Generally  speaking,  freight  railroads  are  quite  different.  Unlike  airlines,  freight 
railroads  require  multiple  crew  changes  to  move  commodities  across  the  country. 
Railroads must use multiple local and yard assignments to gather freight at the be-
ginning  of  a  trip,  then  use  multiple  crews  to  move  it  across  the  country,  and  then 
use more local crews to deliver the freight to its final destination. 

Where  appropriate  and  practical,  train  scheduling  is  being  implemented  and  can 
have  positive  impacts  on  fatigue.  However,  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  including  the 
variability  in  demand  for  rail  transportation,  weather,  track  conditions,  provisions 
in  collective  bargaining  agreements,  and  countless  other  factors,  trains  in  many 
cases cannot run on a precise schedule. 
Limbo Time 

The  HSA  limits  the  number  of  hours  that  train  crew  employees  can  remain  on- 
duty.  At  times,  though,  because  of  unforeseen  events,  a  train  may  be  unable  to 
reach its scheduled (or even a convenient) crew change point within its crew’s allot-
ted 12 hours. 

When this happens, the crew becomes ‘‘outlawed’’ and must immediately stop the 
train and wait for a new crew to replace it. Transportation of the replacement crew 
to the train, and of the outlawed crew from the train to a designated location where 
it  is  released  from  duty,  is  called  ‘‘deadhead’’  transportation.  Deadhead  transpor-
tation  is  typically  provided  by  other  rail  personnel  or  by  private  contractors  hired 
by  railroads  for  this  purpose.  Deadhead  time  is  not  counted  as  on-duty  time  in  ei-
ther the airline or motor carrier industries. 

Under existing hours-of-service limitations, the time a railroad crew spends wait-
ing  to  be  taken  to  a  duty  assignment,  and  the  time  it  spends  being  transported  to 
the duty assignment, count as time on-duty. 

However,  time  that  outlawed  crews  spend  waiting  for  deadhead  transportation, 
and  the  time  they  spend  being  transported  to  where  they  are  released  from  duty, 
currently count as neither time on-duty nor time off-duty. Instead, this time is con-
sidered  ‘‘limbo  time.’’  During  limbo  time,  the  train  crew  has  been  relieved  of,  and 
will  not  perform,  safety-sensitive  duties.  Employees’  off-duty  rest  time  begins  only 
after they are released from duty (for example, to a terminal or a place of lodging). 
Hours-of-Service Reform 

Railroads  support  continued  research  on  ways  to  fight  fatigue  and  will  continue 
to work with rail labor to find effective solutions to fatigue issues. To that end, rail-
roads  are  amenable  to  a  careful  reexamination  of  the  HSA’s  statutory  limitations. 
Generally speaking, railroads do not object to the provision in the Railroad Safety 
Enhancement Act of 2007 that prohibits train and engine and signal employees from 
working  unless  they  have  had  at  least  10  consecutive  hours  off-duty  (up  from  8 
hours  under  current  law)  during  the  prior  24  hours,  unless  collective  bargaining 
agreements  between  the  railroad  and  affected  employees  provide  otherwise.  Rail-
roads also do not object to a requirement that those 10 hours should be free of non- 
emergency communications from railroads. 

Railroads  disagree,  though,  that  time  spent  deadheading  from  a  duty  site  should 

count as on-duty time, rather than as limbo time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

19 

If time spent deadheading from a duty site were counted as on-duty time, as pro-
posed in the Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2007, railroads would have to cal-
culate  the  approximate  deadheading  time  and  stop  the  train  early  enough  to  take 
account of that interval in order to avoid a violation of the HSA. But because limbo 
time  generally  results  from  unforeseen  circumstances,  this  is  not  a  realistic  option. 
Countless  actions  as  varied  (and  from  a  railroad’s  point  of  view,  virtually  unavoid-
able)  as  a  grade  crossing  accident  that  delayed  a  train,  a  blown  tire  on  a  van  car-
rying  a  train  crew  back  to  its  release-from-duty  site,  or  a  sudden  track  washout 
would mean an almost certain violation of the HSA. 

Railroads  are  aware  of  the  provision  in  the  proposed  legislation  that  preserves 
limbo  time  if  delays  are  the  result  of  certain  specified  unforeseen  causes,  including 
an  accident,  a  track  obstruction,  an  act  of  God,  severe  weather  events,  a  landslide, 
washouts, a major equipment failure, and other ‘‘unknown or unforeseeable’’ events. 
Railroads  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  develop  a  more  comprehensive  and 
better-defined  list  of  causes  of  delays  that  should  be  added  to  this  existing  list. 
Delays  caused  by  congestion  on  the  network  are  an  example  of  delays  that  should 
be exempted from the bill’s limbo-time requirements. 

Although  limbo  time  does  not  contribute  to  employee  fatigue  during  the  imme-
diate  work  assignment,  railroads  are  aware  of  concerns  that  it  could  play  a  role  in 
creating  a  cumulative  sleep  deficit.  To  guard  against  this  possibility,  railroads  sup-
port  three  changes  to  current  hours-of-service  regulations  as  an  alternative  to 
changes offered in the legislation. 

First,  any  employee  who  works  12  consecutive  hours  on-duty,  and  then  at  least 
1  hour  of  limbo  time,  would  receive  at  least  14  hours  of  off-duty  time  once  he  or 
she  is  released  from  duty.  Second,  railroad  train  and  engine  employees  would  be 
subject to a new monthly maximum of 276 hours on-duty. Third, even though limbo 
time  is  not  on-duty  time,  it  would  be  included  in  those  276  hours.1 Hours  beyond 
this  new  maximum,  which  is  consistent  with  permissible  hours  for  other  modes  of 
transportation, would be a violation of the HSA. (Today rail employees can theoreti-
cally work 432 hours per month and still comply with the HSA.) 2 

Together, these measures not only significantly reduce the maximum on-duty time 
for  train  and  engine  employees  under  current  law,  but  they  also  strike  a  balance 
between the concerns that limbo time contributes to fatigue and the realities of the 
unpredictability of railroad operations. 

The  above  proposal  is  the  railroad  industry’s  preferred  approach.  Failing  use  of 
this  approach,  railroads  would  support  a  transfer  of  the  hours-of-service  authority 
to the FRA, with reliance on FRA’s professional judgment. 

Another provision in the Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2007 mandates that 
train  and  engine  employees  cannot  work  unless  they  have  had  at  least  24  consecu-
tive  hours  off-duty  during  the  previous  7  days.  This  limit  is  arbitrary  and  incon-
sistent  with  railroad  work  schedules,  particularly  for  employees  assigned  short 
hauls  and  who  work  in  terminals.  Generally  speaking,  the  limit  would  be  appro-
priate if extended one more day, to require 24 consecutive hours off-duty in a period 
of  eight  consecutive  days.  Railroads  do  support  a  provision  in  the  bill  that  allows 
exemptions  from  the  legislation’s  requirements  for  train  employees  in  cases  where 
a collective bargaining agreement provides a different arrangement. 

Although  modified  work  schedules  are  permitted  by  the  HSA,  they  are  not  per-
mitted  by  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA)  hours-of-service 
regulations,  which  apply  to  the  many  railroad  signal  employees  who  drive  commer-
cial  vehicles  to  perform  their  duties.  Several  years  ago,  railroads  and  rail  labor 
(through  the  Brotherhood  of  Railroad  Signalmen)  petitioned  FMCSA  to  allow  the 
HSA  to  take  precedence  over  FMCSA’s  hours-of-service  requirements.  To  date, 
FMCSA has refused. Railroads strongly endorse the provision in the Railroad Safety 
Enhancement  Act  of  2007  that  clarifies  that  railroad  signal  employees  who  operate 
motor vehicles are subject only to hours-of-service requirements promulgated by the 
FRA, and not by those issued by any other government agency (including FMCSA). 
Another provision in the proposed legislation prohibits railroads from invoking the 
emergency work provision for signal employees for ‘‘routine repairs, maintenance, or 
inspection.’’ (Under the HSA, signal workers are permitted to work more hours dur-
ing  emergencies  than  they  can  during  non-emergencies.)  Presumably,  the  purpose 
of  this  provision  is  to  prevent  railroads  from  ‘‘gaming  the  system’’  by  invoking  the 

1 Kansas  City  Southern  and  Canadian  National  do  not  agree  with  this  position,  and  Amtrak 

abstains on the issue. 

2 In  fact,  though,  railroads  know  of  no  cases  where  this  has  occurred.  The  vast  majority  of 
railroad  workers  are  on-duty  each  month  for  periods  comparable  to  most  other  U.S.  workers. 
Some  83  percent  of  these  rail  workers  are  on-duty  less  than  200  hours  per  month  and  more 
than 95 percent are on-duty less than 250 hours per month. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

20 

emergency  work  provision  when  an  emergency  does  not  exist.  The  railroads  do  not 
object  to  statutory  language  ensuring  the  provision  is  only  invoked  when  appro-
priate. 

Finally,  railroads  do  not  oppose  the  imposition  of  hours-of-service  regulations  on 
contractor  employees  doing  work  which,  if  done  by  a  railroad  employee,  would  be 
subject  to  hours-of-service  regulation.  However,  the  contractor—not  the  railroad— 
should  be  responsible  for  compliance.  Railroads  can  make  contractor  employees  fol-
low  railroad  rules  while  working  on  railroad  projects,  but  railroads  lack  the  ability 
to police contractors’ overall labor policies and employee hours. 

If  policymakers  determine  that  any  group  of  non-railroad  employees  should  be 
subject  to  hours-of-service  limitations,  policymakers  should  address  the  issue  with 
those  groups  directly,  not  indirectly  through  railroads.  As  written,  the  Railroad 
Safety  Enhancement  Act  of  2007  would  apply  hours-of-service  restrictions  to  con-
tractor signal employees and would hold a railroad responsible for compliance by its 
contractor employees. 
Highway-Rail Grade-Crossings and Trespassers 

Collisions  at  grade  crossings,  along  with  incidents  involving  trespassers  on  rail-
road  rights-of-way,  are  critical  safety  problems.  In  2006,  these  two  categories  ac-
counted  for  97  percent  of  rail-related  fatalities.  Although  these  incidents  usually 
arise  from  factors  that  are  largely  outside  of  railroad  control,3 and  even  though 
highway-rail  crossing  warning  devices  are  properly  considered  motor  vehicle  warn-
ing devices there for the benefit of motorists, not trains, railroads are committed to 
efforts aimed at further reducing the frequency of crossing and trespasser incidents. 
Much  success  has  already  been  achieved.  In  1980,  according  to  FRA  data,  10,611 
grade  crossing  collisions  resulted  in  833  fatalities  and  3,890  injuries.  According  to 
the  most  recent  available  FRA  data,  2,918  collisions  in  2006  (down  73  percent)  in-
volved  368  fatalities  (down  56  percent)  and  1,010  injuries  (down  74  percent).  The 
rate  of  grade-crossing  collisions  per  million  train-miles  fell  76  percent  from  1980 
through  2006,  and  has  fallen  every  year  since  1980.  And  because  total  exposure 
(train-miles  multiplied  by  motor  vehicle-miles)  has  risen  sharply  over  time,  the  re-
duction  in  crossing  incidents  and  casualties  per  unit  of  exposure  has  been  even 
higher. 

The Section 130 program, a national highway safety program created by the High-
way  Safety  Act  of  1973  and  expanded  most  recently  in  SAFETEA–LU,  is  a  major 
reason for the impressive grade crossing safety gains. Under the program, funds are 
apportioned  to  states  each  year  for  the  installation  of  new  active  warning  devices 

3 A June 2004 report by the U.S. DOT’s Office of Inspector General (OIG) confirmed that mo-
torist behavior causes the vast majority of grade crossing accidents. According to the OIG report, 
‘‘Risky  driver  behavior  or  poor  judgment  accounted  for  31,035  or  94  percent  of  public  grade 
crossing accidents’’ from 1994–2003. The remaining accidents included such circumstances as ve-
hicles stuck, stalled, or abandoned at crossings. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
B
M
A
H
6
2
7

21 

such  as  lights  and  gates,  upgrading  existing  devices,  and  replacing  or  improving 
grade  crossing  surfaces.  The  rail  industry  commends  and  thanks  the  members  of 
this committee and others in Congress for their support of this critical program. 

Railroads  continue  to  work  hard  to  improve  grade-crossing  safety,  including  co-
operating with state agencies to install and upgrade grade crossing warning devices 
and signals (and bearing the cost of maintaining those devices); helping to fund the 
closure  of  unneeded  or  redundant  crossings;  and  supporting  the  national  Operation 
Lifesaver grade crossing and pedestrian safety program. Railroads spend more than 
$250 million annually to improve, operate, and maintain grade crossings. 

A recent initiative that will result in improved safety is the use of ‘‘stop’’ or ‘‘yield’’ 
signs along with crossbucks at grade crossings. The National Committee on Uniform 
Traffic  Control  Devices  has  recommended  revising  the  Manual  of  Uniform  Traffic 
Control  Devices  (MUTCD)  to  require  the  use  of  stop  or  yield  signs  in  conjunction 
with  crossbucks  to  make  it  clear  what  is  expected  of  motorists  at  crossings.  The 
AAR  strongly  supports  amending  the  MUTCD  as  recommended  by  the  committee 
and  follow  through  on  sign  installation.  The  AAR  also  supports  the  FRA’s  rec-
ommendation,  included  in  its  May  2006  report  to  Congress  on  emergency  notifica-
tion  systems  for  grade  crossings,  that  signs  comply  with  the  MUTCD  recommenda-
tions. 

The AAR’s testimony to this committee on May 22 noted a number of other engi-
neering, education, and enforcement actions that should be implemented so that fur-
ther  improvement  in  crossing  safety  can  be  achieved,  such  as  adopting  a  uniform 
national  grade  crossing  closure  process;  continuing  to  fund  the  national  Operation 
Lifesaver  grade  crossing  and  pedestrian  safety  program  (addressed  in  Section  206 
of the Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2006); increasing Federal liability insur-
ance  requirements  for  contractors  whose  funded  projects  interface  with  or  impact  a 
railroad;  and  enhancing  grade  crossing  traffic  law  enforcement  by  requiring  grade 
crossing  safety  as  part  of  commercial  driver’s  license  educational  curricula  and  by 
maintaining tough grade crossing traffic violation penalties. 

Class I railroads support (and, in fact, are already engaged in) a program to pro-
vide the public with telephone numbers, posted at public grade crossings and at pri-
vate crossings open to unrestricted public access (as declared in writing to the rail-
road  by  the  holder  of  the  crossing  right),  that  can  be  called  in  the  event  of  grade- 
crossing  emergencies.  Railroads  also  support  a  requirement  for  the  development  of 
model  legislation  that  provides  for  penalties  for  violations  of  grade  crossing  laws, 
which  occurs  far  too  often—and  often  with  tragic  results.  Both  of  these  issues  are 
addressed in the Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2007. 

Railroads  have  programs  in  place  to  control  vegetation  on  their  property  near 
crossings because they agree that motorists’ sight lines should not be obstructed. If 
Congress decides that there should be a Federal requirement for clearing vegetation 
for  this  purpose,  then  the  Federal  requirement  should  preempt  state  or  local  laws 
so  that  there  is  national  uniformity.  FRA  implementing  regulations  should  also 
specify a required clearance distance, rather than simply call for ‘‘reasonable’’ clear-
ance. Of course, railroads have limited ability to address vegetation at private cross-
ings and on private land adjacent to railroad rights-of-way. 
Trespassers 

Since 1997, significantly more fatalities on railroad property have been associated 
with  trespassers  than  with  highway-rail  grade  crossing  accidents.  It  is  an  unfortu-
nate  reality  that  too  many  people  inappropriately  use  railroad  property  for  short 
cuts,  recreation,  or  other  purposes,  sometimes  with  terrible  results.  Railroads  are 
engaged  in  ongoing  efforts  to  educate  the  public  that,  for  their  own  safety,  they 
should stay off rail property. 

Each year, scores of people tragically choose to end their life by stepping or lying 
in front of a train. To help prevent the tragedy of suicide, railroads support the Sui-
cide  Prevention  Action  Network  (SPAN  USA),  a  charitable  organization  dedicated 
to  preventing  suicide  through  public  education  and  awareness;  community  action; 
and  Federal,  state,  and  local  grassroots  advocacy.  In  addition,  through  its  Railroad 
Research  Foundation,  the  AAR  is  researching  the  prevalence  of,  and  underlying 
causal factors for, rail-related suicides. Such understanding could facilitate counter-
measures to reduce suicides on railroad rights-of-way. 
Other Provisions in the Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2007 

Railroads have comments regarding various other provisions of the Railroad Safe-

ty Enhancement Act of 2007: 

• Railroads strongly support the provision that authorizes funding for the design, 
development,  and  construction  of  a  Facility  for  Underground  Rail  Station  and 
Tunnel  at  the  Transportation  Technology  Center  in  Pueblo,  Colorado.  As  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

22 

legislation  notes,  this  facility  would  be  used  to  test  and  evaluate  the 
vulnerabilities of rail tunnels, to mitigate and remediate the consequences of ac-
cidents and incidents in tunnels, and to provide a realistic scenario for training 
emergency responders. 
• Section  401  requires  railroads  and  railroad  contractors  to  develop  training  pro-
grams,  approved  by  the  FRA,  for  classes  of  employees  that  the  Department  of 
Transportation  deems  appropriate.  Railroads  agree  that  a  well-trained  work-
force is essential to safe and efficient railroad operations. After all, ‘‘human fac-
tors’’ (i.e., human error) is the cause of more rail accidents than any other single 
factor, and in most (if not all) of these accidents, the employee(s) involved broke 
a rule or set of rules. 
A  new  rigid  Federal  program  would  be  redundant  and  is  unnecessary,  since 
railroads already have procedures in place, including ongoing training programs 
overseen by the FRA, to ensure that their workforce is adequately trained. New 
locomotive  engineers,  for  example,  receive  at  least  15  to  20  weeks  of  classroom 
and on-the-job training as a conductor before beginning work. Locomotive engi-
neer  training  will  add  an  additional  20–25  weeks  before  they  are  certified  and 
ready to work. Total costs to train a conductor and later an engineer range from 
$52,000 to more than $70,000 per individual. 
• Section  402  requires  the  Department  of  Transportation  to  report  on  whether 
certification of certain classes of employees is ‘‘necessary’’ to improve safety. Lo-
comotive  engineers  require  certification.  Certification  requirements  for  other 
classes of rail employees (e.g., conductors) would be burdensome without accom-
plishing  any  safety  objective.  Certification  is  not  necessary  to  ensure  that  rail 
employees are appropriately trained. 
• Section 302 significantly increases (from $10,000 to $25,000) the maximum fine 
for  railroad  safety  violations.  This  proposed  higher  fine  is  disproportionate.  By 
comparison,  the  maximum  penalty  for  a  violation  of  safety  requirements  by 
motor carriers (railroads’ primary competitors) is $5,000. 
• Sections 406 and 407 provide for railroad safety technology grants and railroad 
safety  infrastructure  improvement  grants,  respectively.  Improved  rail  safety 
benefits  the  public,  not  just  railroads,  making  financing  partnerships  appro-
priate. 
• Camp  cars,  house  trailers  on  wheels,  and  emergency  trailers  have  been  a  vital 
part  of  the  railroad  industry  for  many  years.  They  serve  as  safe,  dependable 
places for railroad workers to eat and sleep in many isolated, undeveloped areas 
where  motels  and  restaurants  are  not  easily  accessible.  Any  notion  that  they 
have  a  negative  impact  on  employee  quality  of  life  is  misplaced.  One  Class  I 
railroad which relies on camp cars in the remote locations it serves is currently 
modernizing  its  cars  and  converting  them  from  eight-person  to  four-person 
sleepers,  with  two  full  baths,  desks,  and  modern  HVAC  systems.  Employee  re-
action  on  that  railroad  has  been  extremely  positive.  This  same  railroad  has  a 
44-car  ‘‘emergency  fleet’’  that  is  critical  to  its  ability  to  respond  to  emergencies 
and natural disasters such as Hurricane Katrina. These cars stand at the ready 
to be deployed to handle emergency situations at a moments notice. 
The FRA already has formal guidelines governing the location and sanitary con-
ditions  of  railroad  camp  cars.  The  imposition  of  any  restrictions  on  the  future 
use of camp cars is not only unwarranted but would force employees to venture 
long  distances  in  unfamiliar  environments  to  seek  lodging  and  dining  facilities 
that are likely to be inadequate. Again, such travel does not enhance employee 
health and safety. 

Performance Standards 

There  are  two  general  approaches  to  workplace  safety  regulation:  design-based 

standards and performance standards. 

Design-based standards specify the precise characteristics of facilities, equipment, 
and processes a firm must use in the manufacture or delivery of its product or serv-
ice.  The  FRA  relies  overwhelmingly  on  design-based  standards  in  regulating  rail 
safety. Design-based standards are costly for both railroads and the FRA to admin-
ister and maintain. They also tend to impede innovation by ‘‘locking in’’ existing de-
signs, technology, and ways of thinking. 

The  discolored  wheel  rule  provides  a  classic  example  of  a  design-based  standard 
that discourages new technology. This FRA rule required railroads to remove freight 
car  wheels  that  showed  four  or  more  inches  of  discoloration,  on  the  grounds  that 
such discoloration could portend wheel failure. However, research demonstrated con-
clusively that discoloration in new heat-treated, curved-plate wheels did not portend 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

23 

failure.  Despite  this  evidence,  the  FRA  took  more  than  a  decade  to  exempt  such 
wheels  from  the  requirement.  During  this  period,  railroads  had  to  discard  perfectly 
safe wheels at a cost that reached $100 million per year. 

In contrast to design-based standards, performance-based standards define the de-
sired result, rather than mandate the precise characteristics that a workplace must 
exhibit.  Performance-based  goals  focus  attention  and  effort  on  the  outcome,  not  the 
method. 

Under  one  type  of  safety  regime  based  on  performance  standards,  each  railroad 
would  have  goals  for  train  safety  (e.g.,  accidents  per  million  train-miles)  and  em-
ployee safety (e.g., injuries per 100 employees) as part of a comprehensive risk man-
agement  plan,  based  on  targets  established  by  the  industry  and  approved  by  the 
FRA.  If  a  railroad  failed  to  meet  these  goals,  it  would  come  under  increased  FRA 
scrutiny, be required to specify how it planned to correct the problems, and eventu-
ally  be  subject  to  monetary  penalties  or  even  a  return  to  design-based  regulation. 
While  some  (but  not  all)  of  the  old  regulations  would  be  suspended  under  a  per-
formance-standard regime, the FRA would retain the power to conduct safety audits 
and to impose emergency directives at any time to protect public safety. 

Under  safety  performance  standards,  railroads  would  have  the  opportunity  and 
incentive  to  achieve  safer  operations  as  efficiently  as  possible.  Performance  stand-
ards  would  rely  on  the  superior  knowledge  of  railroads  and  their  employees  and 
would  give  railroads  the  discretion  to  experiment  with  new  technologies  and  proc-
esses to improve safety. The result would be superior safety performance at a lower 
cost to railroads and their customers. 

Risk-based  performance  standards  represent  a  reform,  not  an  abandonment,  of 
safety  regulation.  Except  in  emergencies  or  after  continued  failure  to  meet  targets, 
the  FRA  would  no  longer  specify  how  a  railroad  would  achieve  its  safety  goals.  In-
stead,  the  FRA  would  oversee  and  validate  the  goal-setting  process,  ensure  that 
measures and data are accurate, and impose any necessary sanctions. 

Railroads respectfully suggest that the Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2007 
should incorporate performance standards as much as possible in place of rigid and 
unresponsive design-based rules to regulate safety in the railroad industry. 
Conclusion 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify on this critical topic. The railroad indus-
try  is  committed  to  working  with  its  employees,  Congress,  the  FRA,  its  customers, 
and others to ensure that rail safety continues to improve. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Hamberger. 
Mr. Tolman? 

STATEMENT  OF  JOHN  P.  TOLMAN,  VICE  PRESIDENT  AND 
NATIONAL  LEGISLATIVE  REPRESENTATIVE,  BROTHERHOOD 
OF  LOCOMOTIVE  ENGINEERS  AND  TRAINMEN,  DIVISION  OF 
THE  RAIL  CONFERENCE,  INTERNATIONAL  BROTHERHOOD 
OF TEAMSTERS 
Mr. TOLMAN. Thank you, and good afternoon, Chairman Lauten-
berg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee. 
My name is John Tolman, I’m a Vice President of the Brotherhood 
of  Locomotive  Engineers  and  Trainmen,  which  is  a  division  of  the 
Teamsters Rail Conference. 

On behalf of the 12,000 BLET members, and nearly 100,000 Rail 
Conference  members,  I  want  to  express  my  thanks  for  the  oppor-
tunity to testify here concerning rail safety. 

My written testimony presents a comprehensive view of this leg-
islation,  but  in  my  limited  time  this  afternoon,  I’d  like  to  con-
centrate  on  the  portion  of  the  legislation  that  addresses  hours-of- 
service reform. 

There is a common understanding among government, labor and 
management,  that  fatigue  poses  a  significant  safety  concern,  or  at 
least  an  underlining  factor  in  far  too  many  accidents.  However, 
that  common  understanding  has  yet  to  produce  a  consensus  on 
what forms fatigue abatement should take. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

24 

The most contentious hours-of-service issue is the limbo time, the 
time after the crew’s 12 hours have expired, and before they arrive 
at the point of final release, which is neither on-duty time, nor off- 
duty. And for now, I’d like to raise some of the other consequences 
of limbo time that have not been discussed here. 

When a crew is abandoned on a train for 4, 8, 12, and 20 hours, 
all  freight  being  carried  by  the  train  is  also  left  in  limbo.  Limbo 
time  severely  disrupts  delivery  of  just-in-time  parts  and  supplies. 
It  also  wastes  countless  gallons  of  diesel  fuel,  because  locomotives 
must  be  kept  running,  wasting  an  increasingly  expensive,  scarce 
resource—not to mention the pollution. 

Not  only  is  limbo  time  bad  for  business  for  America,  it’s  bad  for 
business for the railroad industry itself. Every hour a crew and its 
train  spends  in  limbo,  reduces  velocity.  Increasing  velocity  means 
freeing  up  locomotives,  cars,  and  crews,  for  more  productivity.  A 
dramatic reduction in limbo time is good for the railroads, workers, 
the economy, consumers, and the environment. 

Unfortunately, limbo time is one of the issues where stakeholders 
have widely varying opinions. The industry insists that limbo time 
is  not  a  factor  in  fatigue.  The  FRA  believes  that  it  should  be  part 
of  the  regulatory  process.  We,  on  the  other  hand,  believe  that  the 
Supreme Court got it wrong in 1996, when it ruled that limbo time 
is  neither  time  on,  nor  time  off,  duty,  and  that  Congress  needs  to 
set the record straight. 

We  further  believe  that  there  is,  there  should  be  no  limbo  time, 
except  in  narrow  circumstances,  provided  currently  under  the 
Hours of Service Act. 

Regarding  statutory  time  off-duty,  we  generally  support  the  ap-
proach  you  are  proposing,  but  there  are  some  unintended  con-
sequences.  And  I  want  to  bring  to  your  attention,  because  they 
need to be addressed in this process. 

One  is  that  the  requirement  that  an  employee  be  off-duty  for  at 
least a 24-hour period every 7 days. We would respectfully request 
that  you  consider  amending  this  requirement,  so  that  the  24-hour 
period is taken at the employee’s home terminal. Because the stud-
ies  have  shown  that  the  quality  of  rest  taken  at  away-from-home 
terminal, is inferior to the rest taken at a home terminal. 

We  also  believe,  and  applaud,  the  10-hour  call.  We  believe  it  is 
a  key  component  to  fatigue  mitigation,  because  it  eliminates  the 
possibility of someone who is not rested being required to work un-
expectedly.  Accordingly,  we  strongly  support  the  pilot  project  for 
the 10-hour call, however, we would like to see all railroads imple-
ment  a  10-hour  call,  and  believe  that  the  proposed  2-year  limit  is 
longer than necessary to develop a program. 

I’d  also  like  to  commend  you  on  two  non-fatigue  related  topics: 

training, and elimination of the camp cars. 

First,  with  respect  to  training—we  can  think  of  no  craft  or  class 
of  a  railroad  worker  not  impacted  or  governed  in  some  manner  by 
the  Federal  railroad  safety  statutes  or  regulations,  and  we  believe 
training  should  be  afforded  across  the  board.  At  least,  as  to  those 
statutes and regulations. 

And second, Section 410, which would amend the Federal law by 
getting our Rail Conference brothers and sisters in the Brotherhood 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

25 

of  Maintenance  of  Way  Employees  Division  out  of  the  barbaric 
camp cars, something that is long, long overdue. 

In closing, we appreciate the steps you’ve already taken, and look 
forward  to  working  with  you  to  produce  a  meaningful  legislation. 

And thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Tolman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN P.  TOLMAN,  VICE PRESIDENT AND NATIONAL 
LEGISLATIVE REPRESENTATIVE,  BROTHERHOOD OF LOCOMOTIVE ENGINEERS AND 
TRAINMEN, DIVISION OF THE RAIL CONFERENCE, INTERNATIONAL BROTHERHOOD OF 
TEAMSTERS 
Thank  you,  and  good  afternoon  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith, 

and Members of the Subcommittee. 

My  name  is  John  Tolman,  and  I’m  Vice  President  and  National  Legislative  Rep-
resentative  of  the  Brotherhood  of  Locomotive  Engineers  and  Trainmen  (BLET), 
which is a Division of the Teamsters Rail Conference. On behalf of more than 33,000 
active BLET members and over 70,000 Rail Conference members, I want to express 
my  thanks  for  the  opportunity  to  inform  you  of  our  position  concerning  rail  safety, 
in general, and the Rail Safety Enhancement Act of 2007, in particular. 

As  you  may  know,  the  BLET  has  a  long  and  proud  history  of  helping  lead  the 
fight to improve safety in the railroad industry. We are charter members of the Fed-
eral  Railroad  Administration’s  (FRA)  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Committee  (SAC) 
and have actively participated in every aspect of rail safety regulation for more than 
a  decade.  Since  June  of  last  year,  we  have  testified  before  House  Committees  and 
Subcommittees  of  jurisdiction  more  than  a  half  dozen  times  concerning  rail  safety, 
generally, as well as on specific issues. 

Rail  safety  has  improved  significantly  in  recent  years.  The  industry  has  set 
records  for  the  number  of  train-miles  operated  each  of  the  past  2  years.  In  2006, 
the  rate  for  human  factor  accidents  on  main  track  was  the  lowest  recorded  since 
FRA  began  keeping  data  in  1975.  Similarly,  last  year’s  rate  for  human  factor  acci-
dents on yard track was the lowest it has been since 1997. Nonetheless, as tragedies 
in Minot, North Dakota; Macdona, Texas; and Graniteville, South Carolina, remind 
us, even a single accident can have catastrophic consequences. 

The need for heightened safety in the railroad industry is underscored by unique 
factors in these times in which we live. The attacks of September 11, 2001, remind 
us  of  the  importance  of  tight  security  in  our  transportation  infrastructure  and  in 
the  storage  and  carriage  of  hazardous  materials.  Deterioration  of  our  highway  sys-
tems  and  steadily  increasing  importation  of  foreign-manufactured  goods  have  com-
bined to stretch the industry to capacity in many places, and neither of these trends 
are likely to reverse any time soon. 

We  stand  on  the  threshold  of  broad  application  of  signal  and  train  control  tech-
nologies throughout the industry. While these technologies have the potential to sig-
nificantly enhance safety, they also bring different and, perhaps, unanticipated safe-
ty challenges. Concurrent with all these factors is the retirement of the Baby Boom-
er  generation  of  railroad  workers,  and  the  test  posed  by  training  and  introducing 
over 80,000 new workers into the industry. 

Fortunately,  the  industry  is  well  poised  to  face  and  successfully  deal  with  these 
challenges. Nearly every major railroad has set a profit record in the past few years. 
The  Class  I  carriers,  as  a  whole,  have  enjoyed  roughly  $25  billion  in  profits  over 
the past 6 years, and recently have expended much capital buying back stock. 

The  attractiveness  of  investment  in  railroads  is,  perhaps,  best  evidenced  by  the 
significant  stake  in  three  Class  I  railroads  purchased  by  Berkshire  Hathaway  ear-
lier  this  year,  and  by  the  more  recent  reports  of  a  possible  leveraged  buyout  of  Ca-
nadian Pacific by a consortium led by Brookfield Asset Management. Consequently, 
we  are  in  a  far  different  period  than  the  industry  was,  for  example,  in  the  late 
1970s,  when  even  the  most  routine  track  maintenance  was  deferred  for  dangerous 
lengths of time because of the industry’s financial shape. 

Within  this  context,  I  want  to  congratulate  you  on  the  work  you  have  done  in 
drafting  the  Railroad  Safety  Enhancement  Act  of  2007.  This  comprehensive  bill  re-
flects an understanding of where the industry is, and where it needs to go over the 
next decade. It addresses many of the issues we have brought to the Hill, and dove-
tails nicely with the work undertaken by the House. While I will not comment today 
on  every  aspect  of  the  legislation,  I  do  want  to  discuss  several  issues  that  are  of 
vital importance to BLET and Rail Conference members. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

26 

With regard to Section 101, I want to point out that the companion portion of the 
legislation  being  considered  by  the  House  would  require  that  the  Federal  Railroad 
Administrator ‘‘be an individual with professional experience in railroad safety, haz-
ardous  materials  safety,  or  other  transportation  safety.’’  It  has  been  our  experience 
that  FRA  fulfills  its  safety  mission  much  more  effectively  when  such  a  person  is 
serving  as  Administrator.  Indeed,  the  qualifications  brought  to  the  position  by  the 
current  Administrator—Joe  Boardman—provide,  perhaps,  the  best  evidence  of  the 
advantage having such a requirement means in terms of safety, and I strongly urge 
you to consider a similar requirement. 

We  strongly  support  the  railroad  safety  and  risk  reduction  strategies  set  forth  in 
Sections  102–104.  The  BLET  has  participated,  at  every  level,  in  several  different 
types  of  risk  reduction  pilot  programs  in  recent  years  and  I  can  tell  you  that  they 
can have a significant positive impact on safety. Further, while we understand and 
support  the  need  for  protection  of  information  developed  in  risk  analyses,  which  is 
addressed  in  Section  107  of  the  bill,  we  would  caution  that  such  protections  not  be 
perverted to allow a railroad to ‘‘hide’’ information that currently is properly discov-
erable through alternative methods or means. 

We  also  support  Section  105,  dealing  with  implementation  of  Positive  Train  Con-
trol (PTC) technology. In our view, an appropriate timetable for implementation will 
assist the industry in dealing with important issues such as interoperability among 
technology and equipment, and a consistency in operational philosophy. 

I  also  want  to  commend  you  on  the  proposals  for  reforming  the  Hours  of  Service 
Act.  Section  106  reflects  many  of  the  conclusions  reached  by  the  House  T&I  Com-
mittee, and also proposes a number of novel enhancements. There is common under-
standing  among  government,  labor,  and  management  that  fatigue  poses  a  signifi-
cant  safety  concern,  and  is  at  least  an  underlying  factor  in  far  too  many  accidents. 
However,  that  common  understanding  has  yet  to  produce  consensus  on  what  forms 
fatigue abatement should take. 

For  example,  it  is  my  opinion  that  introduction  of  a  10-hour  call  for  duty,  with 
no  disruption  thereafter,  is  one  of  two  key  elements  in  combating  fatigue.  Every 
crew  member  who  knows  at  least  10  hours  in  advance  that  he  or  she  will  be  re-
quired to report for duty at a time certain would have ample opportunity to ensure 
they  are  rested.  The  current  problem  experienced  by  crews  receiving  unexpected 
calls  for  duty  and  not  having  an  opportunity  for  rest  after  the  call  is  completely 
eliminated. I will address this subject again later in my testimony. 

To  be  sure,  the  most  contentious  Hours-of-Service  issue  is  so-called  ‘‘limbo  time,’’ 
which  is  time  after  a  crew’s  12  hours  have  expired  and  before  they  arrive  at  their 
point of final release, which is neither on-duty nor off-duty time.1 As you may know, 
we presented the House Railroad Subcommittee with a multitude of data concerning 
excessive limbo time, including identifying nearly 335,000 cases of limbo time in ex-
cess  of  2  hours  on  just  one  Class  I  railroad  from  2001  through  2006.  I  will  not 
present  a  detailed  recitation  of  the  data  here  today,  although  we  would  be  pleased 
to provide any supporting information you request. Rather than focusing on the as-
pect  of  limbo  time  that  increases  fatigue  among  operating  crews,  I  would,  instead, 
like  to  point  out  some  of  the  other  consequences  of  limbo  time  that  have  been  lost 
in the debate on this issue. 

When  a  crew  is  abandoned  on  a  train  for  4,  or  8,  or  12—or  20—hours,  all  of  the 
freight  being  carried  by  that  train  also  is  left  in  ‘‘limbo.’’  Manufacturing  that  relies 
on ‘‘just-in-time’’ delivery of parts and supplies is severely disrupted, and the deliv-

1 In this regard, it is both appropriate and necessary for us to respond to the Administration’s 
proposal concerning Hours-of-Service. Essentially, the Administration seeks to have current law 
repealed  after  it  is  promulgated  as  a  regulation.  Thereafter,  amendments  would  be  considered 
by SAC; if no consensus is reached within 24 months, the Secretary would be authorized to pro-
mulgate  amendments  in  a  traditional  rulemaking  process.  We  believe  it  is  inappropriate  to  ad-
dress  limbo  time  in  this  manner  at  this  time.  The  present  controversy  over  limbo  time  stems 
from  the  holding  of  the  U.S.  Supreme  Court  in  Brotherhood  of  Locomotive  Engineers,  et  al.,  v. 
Atchison, Topeka & Santa Fe Railroad Co., et al., 516 U.S. 152 (1996), in which the Court con-
strued  the  49  U.S.C.  Section  21103(b)(4)  clause  stating  that  ‘‘time  spent  in  deadhead  transpor-
tation from a duty assignment to the place of final release is neither time on-duty nor time off- 
duty.’’ Specifically, the Court held that the ‘‘text, structure, and purposes of the statute persuade 
us that Congress intended that time spent waiting for deadhead transportation from a duty site 
should  be  limbo  time.  516  U.S.  at  162  (emphasis  added).  Since  the  Court’s  1996  ruling,  the 
amount of limbo time crews have been forced to endure has skyrocketed, reaching crisis propor-
tions  in  recent  years.  We  simply  do  not  believe  that  Congress  intended  work  tours—albeit  not 
duty tours—in excess of 20 hours to occur dozens of times every year, nor work tours in excess 
of 14 hours that number in the hundreds of thousands. Congressional intent must be discerned 
from Acts of Congress, not actions of RSAC and/or FRA. Accordingly, we believe it is necessary 
that Congress act, first, to correct the Court’s erroneous construction of the statute, out of fidel-
ity  to  the  1969  amendments,  the  judicial  interpretation  of  which  created  the  current  problem. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

27 

ery  of  finished  goods  and  products  also  is  left  in  ‘‘limbo,’’  adversely  impacting  both 
retailers  and  consumers.  Moreover,  because  the  locomotives  on  the  train  must  be 
kept  running  so  that  the  train’s  braking  system  remains  operational,  gallon  upon 
gallon  of  diesel  fuel  literally  goes  up  in  smoke  without  the  train  moving  an  inch, 
wasting an increasingly expensive and scarce resource and polluting the area where 
the train idles. 

Not  only  is  limbo  time  bad  business  for  America,  it  is  bad  business  for  the  rail-
road  industry  itself.  As  I  said  earlier,  much  of  the  railroad  industry  is  operating  at 
or near full capacity. Record-high fuel prices make fuel-efficient rail freight and rail 
passenger  transportation  more  attractive,  placing  additional  pressure  on  capacity. 
Average freight train velocity industry-wide hovers around 20 miles per hour. Every 
hour  a  crew—and  its  train—spends  in  ‘‘limbo’’  reduces  velocity.  Increasing  velocity 
means  freeing  up  locomotives,  cars,  and  crews  for  more  frequent  use.  An  increase 
in  velocity  of  just  two  miles  per  hour  is  the  equivalent  of  increasing  capacity  by  10 
percent.  If  all  that  capacity  was  filled  by  demand  the  industry  currently  cannot 
meet,  industry  revenues  also  would  rise  significantly.  Consequently,  a  dramatic  re-
duction  in  limbo  time  is  good  for  railroads,  railroad  workers,  the  economy,  con-
sumers, and the environment. 

Limbo time is one of the issues where stakeholders have widely varying opinions. 
The industry insists the limbo time is not a factor in fatigue. We, on the other hand, 
believe  the  Supreme  Court  got  it  wrong  in  1996,  and  further  believe  that  there 
should  be  no  limbo  time,  except  in  the  narrow  circumstances  provided  currently  in 
49 U.S.C. Section 21102(a). That being said, we believe the House has laid a founda-
tion  for  further  efforts  to  resolve  this  issue,  and  we  look  forward  to  working  with 
you on this matter. 

With  respect  to  statutory  time  off-duty,  we  generally  support  the  approach  you 
have  proposed.  However,  there  are  some  unintended  consequences  I  want  to  bring 
to  your  attention,  because  they  need  to  be  addressed  in  this  process.  One  issue  is 
the requirement that an employee have at least one period of at least 24 hours off- 
duty every 7 days, unless the Secretary provides a waiver because there is a collec-
tive  bargaining  agreement  in  place  with  a  different  arrangement  that  provides  an 
equivalent level of safety and protection against fatigue. 

We  would  respectfully  request  that  you  consider  amending  this  requirement  so 
that the 24-hour period is taken at the employee’s home terminal. A sufficient body 
of  study  exists  establishing  that  rest  taken  at  the  away-from-home  terminal—in  a 
hotel where meal options are severely limited—is qualitatively inferior to rest taken 
at  the  home  terminal.  This  is  not  only  a  quality  of  life  issue  for  our  members:  it 
clearly has safety implications. 

The  other  issue  involves  the  impact  of  the  proposed  minimum  10  consecutive 
hours  off-duty  every  24  hours.  It  has  come  to  our  attention  that  the  proposed  lan-
guage may have some unintended consequences on commuter railroads, where their 
heaviest  service  is  during  the  morning  and  evening  rush  hours,  and  a  number  of 
assignments  work  a  few  hours  in  the  morning,  then  are  released  for  periods  in  ex-
cess of 4 hours before working a few more hours in the afternoon and early evening. 
We continue to study this issue and look forward to working with you on addressing 
this situation. 

One other difference between the Senate and the House versions pertains to com-
munication  to  a  train  employee  during  his/her  off-duty  period.  Your  bill  would  per-
mit  the  Secretary  to  waive  the  prohibition  against  communications  ‘‘for  commuter 
or  intercity  passenger  railroads  if  the  Secretary  determines  that  it  is  necessary  to 
maintain  that  railroad’s  efficient  operations  and  on-time  performance  of  its  trains.’’ 
Such  communication—which  we  call  a  ‘‘set-back’’  or  a  ‘‘respite’’  in  railroad  par-
lance—would  be  necessary  in  order  to  maximize  a  train  employee’s  hours-of-service 
in situations involving a delay to the train they are scheduled to operate. 

Such  an  accommodation  makes  operational  and  economic  sense.  Furthermore, 
many  of  our  collective  bargaining  agreements  historically  have  contained  similar 
provisions.  Nevertheless,  and  despite  the  fact  that  a  ‘‘set-back’’  provides  increased 
time  off-duty  between  trips,  repeated  occurrences  severely  disrupt  a  crew’s  ability 
to  manage  its  sleep  and  meal  requirements,  and  would  defeat  the  safety  purpose 
undisturbed  rest  is  intended  to  serve.  For  this  reason,  we  believe  the  legislation 
should limit the waiver to one ‘‘set-back’’ per trip. 

Section 106(d) of the bill would authorize the Secretary to regulate Hours-of-Serv-
ice in a way that is broader than the companion provision of the House bill. Specifi-
cally, the Secretary would be authorized to issue regulations ‘‘to make other changes 
to  the  maximum  hours  or  minimum  hours  an  employee  or  class  of  employees  may 
be  allowed  to  go  or  remain  on-duty,  or  may  be  required  to  rest,  that  will  signifi-
cantly increase safety.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

28 

Read  in  context,  this  provision  appears  to  empower  the  Secretary  to  authorize 
duty tours in excess of 12 hours, or to authorize rest periods shorter than those pro-
vided  in  the  statute.  We  would  be  hard  pressed  to  identify  a  situation—other  than 
a  bona  fide  emergency—where  crews  should  be  on-duty  longer  than  12  hours.  Fur-
ther,  other  than  the  limited  changes  to  off-duty  periods  listed  above,  we  can  think 
of few situations in which shorter off-duty periods would be appropriate. We believe 
that  proposed  Section  21109(a)(3)  runs  counter  to  the  intent  of  the  preceding  two 
subsections. 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  we  believe  a  10-hour  call  is  a  key  component  in  fatigue 
mitigation.  Accordingly,  we  strongly  support  the  pilot  project  for  a  ‘‘10-hour  call’’ 
that would be enacted as 49 U.S.C. Section 21109(e)(1)(A). Indeed, it is our position 
that  Sections  21103(a)(1)–(a)(2)  could  remain  as  currently  written  if  a  10-hour  call 
was  instituted  industry-wide.  Furthermore—and  singular  to  the  10-hour  call  con-
cept—the  contribution  to  fatigue  of  unexpected  calls  for  work  would  be  eliminated. 
We  would  prefer  to  see  more  than  one  10-hour  call  pilot,  and  believe  that  the  pro-
posed 2 year deadline provides more time than is necessary to develop the program. 
We  also  strongly  support  the  ‘‘calling  window’’  pilot  project  that  would  be  enacted 
as 49 U.S.C. Section 21109(e)(1)(B), because similar pilots that have been attempted 
in the past have proven successful in fatigue mitigation. 

With  regard  to  highway-rail  grade  and  pedestrian  crossing  safety,  which  is  ad-
dressed  in  Title  II  of  the  bill,  we  support  your  goals  and  applaud  your  leadership 
in  addressing  this  important  issue.  We  will  follow  Title  II  with  keen  interest,  be-
cause grade crossing and pedestrian accidents take a heavy toll on our membership, 
both  physically  and  emotionally.  In  that  light,  we  also  would  ask  that  you  consider 
an amendment to: (1) require the Secretary to issue regulations requiring railroads 
to implement an approved critical incident stress debriefing plan that includes coun-
seling,  guidance,  and  appropriate  support  services,  (2)  provide  that  an  operating 
crew involved in a critical incident be relieved of duties immediately, and (3) provide 
that an employee witnessing a critical incident be relieved of duties as soon as fea-
sible, and upon request. 

Concerning  Title  III,  dealing  with  the  FRA,  we  note  that  Section  301  is  less  ag-
gressive—in numbers and implementation schedule—than the House bill, which we 
support.  We  are  confident  that  conference  will  produce  authorization  for  enhance-
ment of FRA’s enforcement capabilities. Equally important is that the authorization 
be supported by the appropriations necessary to realize the legislation’s goals. 

We  are  pleased  to  see  that,  by  proposing  Section  303,  the  Senate  favors  greater 
transparency  for  FRA  activities.  With  regard  to  enforcement  actions,  however,  I 
would  urge  you  to  consider  the  proposal  by  the  House  in  Section  505  of  H.R.  2095, 
which  would  mandate  that  reporting  be  on  a  monthly,  rather  than  annual,  basis. 
We also very strongly support proposed 49 U.S.C. Section 21020(a)(4), requiring an-
nual  reporting  that  quantifies  locomotive  engineer  certification  cases  appealed  to, 
and the average length of time required for decisions by, each of the three appellate 
levels established in 49 CFR Part 240.2 

I  also  want  to  congratulate  you,  and  express  our  appreciation,  for  the  railroad 
safety enhancement initiatives proposed in Title IV. With respect to training, which 
is addressed in Section 401, we can think of no craft or class of railroad worker not 
impacted or governed in some manner by Federal rail safety statutes or regulations, 
and  believe  training  should  be  afforded  across  the  board,  at  least  as  to  those  stat-
utes and regulations. Moreover, while we have no desire to require that the industry 
‘‘reinvent  the  wheel’’  or  develop  duplicative  training  programs  along  side  of  those 
currently  in  place,  we  urge  you  to  ensure  that  the  proposed  49  U.S.C.  Section 
20162(d) exemption not be applied in a way that would permit current training pro-
grams to fall below the standards established by the Secretary in promulgating the 
regulations required by Section 20162(a). 

Regarding  Section  402,  pertaining  to  certification  of  certain  crafts  or  classes  of 
employees, we appreciate your acknowledgement of the increasingly complex nature 
of  the  railroad  workplace.  Having  said  that,  however,  we  believe  that  at  least  four 
crafts  or  classes  of  railroad  workers  should  be  certified  without  the  necessity  of  a 
study and report: 

• Train Dispatchers are at the very center of railroad operations, and are respon-
sible for coordinating train movements and track maintenance. The need to cer-

2 We  similarly  support  Section  308,  pertaining  to  the  updating  of  FRA’s  website.  The  website 
is  of  inestimable  value  to  us  for  research  purposes,  and  FRA  is  to  be  lauded  for  the  scope  and 
volume of information and data that is made publicly available. Unfortunately, the website’s de-
sign is not particularly user-friendly, and we hope Section 308 provides an impetus to overhaul 
the  website’s  design.  We  would  support  a  special  appropriation,  if  one  is  necessary,  to  achieve 
this purpose. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

29 

tify  Train  Dispatchers  will  be  heightened  as  development  and  implementation 
of PTC technology continues to move forward. 
• Conductors  are  co-responsible  with  certified  locomotive  engineers  for  the  safe 
movement  of  trains  and  for  compliance  with  a  wide  variety  of  Federal  safety 
statutes and regulations, including those governing movement of hazardous ma-
terials. The federalizing of an additional three operating procedures, which cur-
rently is in rulemaking, exposes Conductors to even greater potential individual 
liability for civil penalties than they currently are. 
• Signalmen are responsible for the installation, inspection, maintenance, and re-
pair  of  railroad  industry  signaling  systems,  including  active  grade  crossing 
warning devices. They perform safety-critical work each and every day and are 
exposed to potential civil liability for violation of FRA regulations similar to the 
exposure  of  Locomotive  Engineers  and  Conductors.  As  with  Train  Dispatchers, 
the need to certify Signalmen will only increase as PTC technology matures. 
• Carmen, who are subject to FRA regulations governing, and are responsible for, 
inspection,  testing,  maintenance,  and  repair  of  train  brake  systems.  In  recent 
years the minimum distance between major brake inspections and tests has in-
creased,  and  the  implementation  of  electronically  controlled  pneumatic  braking 
systems  will  increase  these  distances  further,  making  each  inspection  and  test 
even more critical than before. 

We  appreciate  your  most  serious  consideration  of  our  position  on  the  subject  of 

certification. 

Section 408 proposes to amend current 49 U.S.C. Section 20303 requirements lim-
iting movement of defective and insecure vehicles, and is patterned after the Admin-
istration’s  proposal  on  this  subject.  Presently,  such  movement  is  authorized  only  to 
the  nearest  available  place  at  which  repairs  can  be  made.  The  crux  of  Section  408 
is that ‘‘nearest’’ would be redefined as meaning ‘‘the closest in the forward direction 
of travel.’’ Thus the bill proposes that a car with a defect that is discovered one mile 
after  a  train  has  passed  a  repair  facility  be  continued  in  service  to  the  next  such 
facility, even it is 200 miles away or more. 

The defects covered by this statute are so serious that the car no longer complies 
with the requirements of Federal law; mere garden-variety defects are not included. 
We are disappointed that the Federal agency responsible for safety oversight of the 
railroad  industry  would  propose  a  change  that  would  diminish  safety  for  the  sake 
of a railroad’s operational convenience, and we do not support this section. 

We are pleased to see that ‘‘dark territory’’ switch position detection is among the 
technologies  addressed  in  your  bill.  As  you  know,  dark  territory  has  posed  a  par-
ticular  problem  and  is  the  subject  of  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  rec-
ommendations.  However,  we  prefer  the  approach  proposed  in  H.R.  2095,  which 
would  require  protection  or  an  operational  alternative.  Switch  position  detection 
technology  already  is  developed  to  the  point  where  it  is  available  off  the  shelf,  and 
will  be  a  component  of  PTC  systems  being  designed  and  tested.  For  the  reasons  I 
stated at the beginning of my testimony, there is no valid financial reason why the 
Nation’s  railroads  should  be  permitted  to  further  delay  in  adding  this  vital  safety 
enhancement. 

At  the  same  time,  I  want  to  congratulate  you  on  the  proposals  in  Section  410  to 
amend Federal law in connection with employee sleeping quarters. Specifically, get-
ting  our  Rail  Conference  Brothers  and  Sisters  in  the  Brotherhood  of  Maintenance 
of Way Employees Division out of barbaric camp cars is something that is long over-
due.  We  respectfully  request  that  you  also  take  one  more  step,  and  eliminate  the 
49  U.S.C.  Section  21106(2)  clause  grandfathering  pre-1976  constructed  sleeping 
quarters located in switching or humping yards. 

We  also  support  Title  V,  which  would  establish  a  system  to  provide  assistance  to 
families  of  those  involved  in  a  rail  passenger  disaster.  With  regard  to  the  jurisdic-
tion  of  the  Surface  Transportation  Board  over  solid  waste  facilities,  we  agree  with 
the position of the Association of American Railroads. 

Before  closing,  I  also  want  to  briefly  touch  on  a  few  items  that  are  not  presently 
in the draft legislation you are considering. Section 606 of H.R. 2095 would prohibit 
a railroad from denying, delaying, or interfering with medical or first aid treatment 
needed by a railroad worker who is injured on the job. In addition, the injured work-
er  would  have  the  right  to  be  promptly  transported  to  the  nearest  medical  facility 
equipped to render the necessary care, and workers would be protected from retalia-
tory action triggered by the exercise of these rights. Harassment of injured workers 
is  a  serious  problem  on  some  railroads,  and  current  FRA  regulations  covering  the 
subject are wholly inadequate. 

Section 608 of H.R. 2095 requires the Secretary to submit a report to the commit-
tees of Congress having jurisdiction on the effects of the locomotive cab environment 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

30 

on  the  safety,  health,  and  performance  of  train  crews.  Cab  conditions  vary  widely 
throughout  the  industry,  despite  the  establishment  of  FRA  standards  governing 
many aspects of this issue. Conditions that negatively impact a crew’s physical well- 
being or ability to focus attention diminish safety, and they should be identified for 
consideration of reasonable additional remediation. 

We also support the requirement to document inspection and maintenance activi-
ties,  and  other  pertinent  safety  and  security  information,  concerning  tunnels  which 
are  longer  than  1,000  feet  and  located  under  a  city  with  a  population  of  400,000 
or greater, or carry five or more scheduled passenger trains per day, or 500 or more 
carloads  of  toxic-by-inhalation  hazardous  materials  per  year,  as  proposed  by  H.R. 
2095 Section 609. And we strongly support Section 616 of H.R. 2095, which provides 
clarification  regarding  state  law  causes  of  action.  This  is  necessary,  in  our  view,  to 
correct  an  injustice  resulting  from  a  misapplication  of  the  preemption  provisions 
contained in 49 U.S.C. Section 20106. 

Finally, there are three additional items I want to mention briefly that presently 
are  not  included  in  any  draft  legislation.  First,  49  U.S.C.  Section  20103  should  be 
amended  to  provide  that  whenever  the  Secretary  issues  a  regulation  which  incor-
porates  a  standard  of  a  nongovernmental  entity,  such  as  the  Association  of  Amer-
ican  Railroads,  any  subsequent  changes  to  such  standards  shall  be  subject  to  rule-
making.  Second,  45  U.S.C.  Section  797j,  which  pertained  to  regulation  of  Conrail 
prior  to  the  1996  transaction  involving  CSX  and  NS,  should  be  repealed  because  it 
no  longer  has  relevance.  Third,  a  section  should  be  added  to  Title  49  requiring  the 
Secretary to prohibit crews reporting for duty in Mexico from operating trains with-
in  the  United  States,  and  crews  originating  in  the  United  States  from  operating 
trains into Mexico. 

Before  closing,  I  again  want  to  highlight  the  importance  of  making  significant 
progress  in  fatigue  abatement,  with  resolving  the  limbo  time  crisis  and  providing 
crews with notice to report for work in a manner that allows them to optimize avail-
able  rest  time.  We  appreciate  the  steps  you  have  already  taken,  and  look  forward 
to working with you to produce meaningful legislation that will appreciably enhance 
rail safety. 

Once again, I thank you for the opportunity to testify today, and would be pleased 

to respond to any questions you may have at the appropriate time. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much, Mr. Tolman. 
Mr. Solow? 

STATEMENT  OF  DAVID  SOLOW,  CEO,  SOUTHERN  CALIFORNIA 
REGIONAL  RAIL  AUTHORITY/METROLINK;  VICE  CHAIR— 
COMMUTER  AND  INTERCITY  RAIL,  AMERICAN  PUBLIC 
TRANSPORTATION ASSOCIATION (APTA) 
Mr.  SOLOW.  Chairman  Lautenberg  and  members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  on  behalf  of  the  American  Public  Transportation  Asso-
ciation,  its  more  than  1,500  member  organizations,  we’d  like  to 
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  Rail  Safety  En-
hancement Act of 2007. 

I  am  the  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  the  Southern  California  Re-
gional Rail Authority, which provides commuter rail service in Los 
Angeles  area.  I  also  serve  as  acting  Vice  Chairman  for  Commuter 
Intercity Rail, and might add, Mr. Chairman, I learned everything 
I  know  about  commuter  rail  from  working  in  New  Jersey  Transit 
from 1981 to 1990. 

Metrolink  began  service  in  1992,  we  operate  service  over  a  500- 
mile network over 7 lines. We serve more 43,000 passengers daily, 
from 54 stations. 

Ridership  continues  to  grow  at  all  the  commuter  rail  systems, 
and new service is part of the picture. Passengers took 435 million 
trips  on  commuter  railroads  last  year,  a  3.2  percent  increase  over 
2005.  My  service—the  Metrolink  Service—grew  by  5.25  percent. 
Just  in  comparison,  Amtrak  has  about  25  million  passenger  trips. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

31 

So, we have vastly more ridership than Amtrak provides on a daily 
basis. 

Let  me  state  for  the  record  that  rail  safety  is  a  priority  for  all 
commuter  rail  systems  who  are  carrying  people.  Accidents  in  the 
railroad  industry  have  declined  in  8  out  of  the  last  10  years,  and 
the safety of rail passengers far exceeds those who drive. 

Commuter rail systems are different from freight railroads. Com-
muter  rail  employees  almost  always  return  to  their  homes  each 
night,  and  they  generally  report  for  duty  in  an  assigned  place  and 
time  each  day.  The  peak-period  nature  of  commuter  rail  service, 
means  employees  often  work  split  shifts  during  the  day.  Hours-of- 
service laws and limbo time are a consideration in the work sched-
ules  of  commuter  rail  employees,  and  any  collective  bargaining 
agreements. 

Changing  the  hours-of-service  laws  that  reduce  limbo  time  and 
limit  duty  time,  may  force  commuter  rail  services  to  hire  more 
crews who will work fewer hours each week, and have fewer oppor-
tunities to work overtime. Rather than mandate specific changes in 
hours-of-service  laws,  APTA  asks  that  you  consider  directing  the 
FRA—as  Administrator  Boardman  suggested—to  study  fatigue  in 
commuter  rail  operations,  and  use  the  Railroad  Safety  Advisory 
Committee process for the development of any changes. 

Commuter rail systems are public agencies, that will pass on in-
creased  costs  of  such  changes  to  riders,  and/or  the  taxpayers  who 
help us in supporting our service. Fare increases are likely to drive 
riders  back  to  commuting  by  automobile,  undermining  national 
goals  related  to  conserving  energy,  and  reducing  air  pollution  and 
congestion. 

While  the  bill  does  not  directly  address  Federal  preemption  of 
rail  safety  law,  APTA  strongly  supports  preservation  of  Federal 
preemption  in  the  case  of  rail  safety  laws,  APTA  generally  agrees 
with  the  American  Association  of  Railroads  on  preemption,  as  this 
issue affects all railroads equally. 

While we understand the bill makes statutory changes in hours- 
of-service  laws,  APTA  urges  you  to  consider  grandfathering  com-
muter  rail  systems  under  existing  law,  subject  to  FRA  review  of 
hours-of-service laws, as they relate to commuter systems, with any 
changes based on FRA recommendations developed under the Rail-
road Safety Advisory Committee process, that provides for both in-
dustry  and  labor  input  and  collaboration.  APTA  believes  that  the 
increase in off-duty time from 8 hours to 10 hours during the prior 
24  hours,  is  unnecessary  for  commuter  rail  employees,  and  urges 
the  Committee  to  retain  the  8  hours  off-duty,  which  has  worked 
well in the past. 

We appreciate the bill that permits the Secretary to waive prohi-
bitions on communicating with employees during off-duty times for 
commuter  railroads  under  certain  conditions,  because  that  would 
help  us  when  we  call  in  replacement  crews  for  employees  who  call 
in sick. 

We  do  have  concerns  about  reductions  in  use  of  limbo  time.  Use 
of limbo time for commuter rail employees returning from duty as-
signments  can  have  a  significant  impact  on  railroad  operations— 
some  of  the  commuter  railroads  have  estimated  the  elimination  of 
limbo  time  will  increase  operating  costs  by  as  much  as  10  to  15 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

32 

percent. Again, we believe that the potential of waiver authority by 
the  Secretary  or  a  careful  review  of  the  use  of  limbo  time  by  com-
muter rail systems by the FRA will conclude that current law pro-
tects against fatigue. 

We  also  note  the  bill  initially  permits  up  to  30  hours  of  limbo 
time,  per  employee,  per  month  in  certain  circumstances,  and  au-
thority  to  retain  up  to  20  hours  of  limbo  time  per  employee,  per 
month. 

While  we  appreciate  the  bill’s  specific  exceptions  for  limbo  time, 
and  limited  use  of  limbo  time  each  month,  we  suggest  that  pre-
serving  at  least  30  to  40  hours  of  limbo  time  per  employee,  per 
month—subject  to  the  FRA  Rail  Safety  Advisory  Committee  proc-
ess—will be useful to commuter rail systems. 

We  appreciate  the  potential  waiver  authority  in  the  case  of  24 
consecutive hours off in the past consecutive 7 days. We also appre-
ciate  that  the  bill  permits  the  Secretary  to  waive  this  requirement 
if  a  collective  bargaining  agreement  provides  the  equivalent  level 
of protection against fatigue. 

If  significant  changes  in  hours-of-service  laws  for  commuter  rail 
employees are required, we ask the Committee to consider a 2-year 
phase-in  period  to  give  the  industry  sufficient  time  to  hire,  train, 
and  qualify  new  employees.  In  today’s  tight  job  market,  we  need 
time to hire a trained workforce. 

While  commuter  rail  systems  are  supportive  of  Positive  Train 
Control,  and  other  systems  that  improve  safety  and  efficiency,  in 
the  environment  where  freight  and  commuter  trains  run  together, 
we  urge  the  Congress  to  provide  as  much  flexibility  in  the  imple-
mentation  of  these  systems.  Many  concerns  are  about  the  inter-
operability of such systems and their cost, we welcome Federal as-
sistance for implementation costs. 

We applaud the Committee for inclusion of prohibitions on public 
disclosure  of  required  rail  safety  analysis  records.  We  want  to  be 
sure  that  such  provisions  adequately  protect  commuter  railroads 
from increased liability. 

APTA  urges  Congress  to  involve  the  commuter  rail  industry  in 
any  effort  to  develop  regulations,  and  development  of  training  pro-
grams to certification for rail system employees or crafts. 

We thank the Committee for the opportunity to testify today, we 
want to work with the Committee and the Congress to develop rail 
safety  legislation  that  affects  commuter  rail  systems  in  the  United 
States. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Solow follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID SOLOW,  CEO,  SOUTHERN CALIFORNIA REGIONAL 
RAIL AUTHORITY/METROLINK;  VICE CHAIR—COMMUTER AND INTERCITY RAIL, 
AMERICAN PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION ASSOCIATION (APTA) 

Introduction 

Chairman  Lautenberg  and  Members  of  the  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transpor-
tation  Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastruc-
ture, Safety, and Security, on behalf of the American Public Transportation Associa-
tion  (APTA),  I  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  Railroad  Safety  En-
hancement Act of 2007. 

Mr. Chairman, my name is David Solow. I am the Chief Executive Officer for the 
Southern  California  Regional  Rail  Authority  (SCRRA)  or  Metrolink,  which  provides 
commuter rail service in the Los Angeles, California area. I also serve as Vice Chair 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

33 

for Commuter and Intercity Rail on APTA’s Executive Committee, which is the asso-
ciation’s  policy  board.  Metrolink  began  service  in  1992.  We  operate  service  over  a 
500 mile network, over 7 lines, three of which are in conjunction with two different 
Class  1  freight  railroads.  We  provide  service  to  over  43,000  passengers  daily  at  54 
stations.  On  a  daily  basis,  Metrolink  dispatches  145  of  its  trains,  26  Amtrak  Inter-
city trains and 50 to 70 freight trains. With the extent of our operation, we regularly 
deal  with  challenges  similar  to  those  faced  by  commuter  rail  operators  in  commu-
nities across the Nation. 

APTA  member  organizations  include  all  of  the  commuter  rail  systems  which  pro-
vide  passenger  service  in  communities  throughout  the  Nation.  All  of  these  systems 
are regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration (FRA) and all will be affected 
by changes in Federal rail safety laws. 

Ridership  grew  at  almost  every  commuter  rail  system  in  the  Nation  in  2006  and 
many  communities  are  expanding  or  initiating  new  service.  Passengers  took  435 
million trips on commuter railroads last year, an increase of 3.2 percent over 2005. 
At  Metrolink,  ridership  grew  by  5.25  percent  in  2006.  New  commuter  rail  service 
recently  started  in  Nashville  and  Albuquerque,  and  more  new  systems  are  in  ad-
vanced  stages  of  development  in  Minneapolis,  Salt  Lake  City,  Portland,  Charlotte, 
and Denver. Still more communities are considering commuter rail as a way to help 
reduce  congestion,  provide  mobility,  and  help  people  beat  the  high  cost  of  gasoline. 
Overview 

First  and  foremost,  let  me  state  for  the  record  that  rail  safety  is  a  priority  for 
APTA  commuter  rail  systems.  Overall,  accidents  in  the  railroad  industry  have  de-
clined in eight of the last 10 years and the safety of rail passengers is 20 times bet-
ter  than  for  those  who  drive  automobiles.  Second,  commuter  rail  systems  are  sub-
stantially  different  from  freight  rail  operations.  Commuter  rail  employees,  unlike 
employees on freight railroads, almost always return to their homes each night, and 
they  generally  report  for  duty  at  an  assigned  place  and  time  each  day.  The  peak- 
period nature of commuter rail service means that many employees often work split 
shifts during a day. Limbo time is an important consideration in the work schedules 
of  commuter  rail  employees  and  since  current  law  regarding  hours-of-service  and 
limbo time are important considerations in collective bargaining agreements it may 
make sense to phase in any changes in the law as such agreements are renegotiated 
and renewed. 

Major  changes  in  current  Hours-of-Service  (HOS)  laws  that  substantially  reduce 
limbo  time  and  limit  duty  time  are  likely  to  force  commuter  rail  systems  to  hire 
more  crews,  particularly  relief  crews  that  fill  in  for  sick  employees,  and  reduce  the 
number of hours employees can work each week. They may also result in employees 
having  fewer  opportunities  to  volunteer  for  overtime  on  days  off.  Changes  in  HOS 
laws based on efforts to address fatigue in freight rail operations may unnecessarily 
impact commuter rail employees and the taxpayers who support commuter rail serv-
ice. 

Rather  than  mandate  specific  changes  in  current  HOS  laws,  APTA  urges  Con-
gress  to  direct  the  FRA  to  study  fatigue  as  it  specifically  relates  to  commuter  rail 
service, utilize the Rail Safety Advisory Committee (RSAC) process for development 
of any proposed changes to HOS laws, and make recommendations on any proposed 
changes that come from that process. 

Commuter rail systems are public agencies that will necessarily pass on increased 
costs  associated  with  HOS  changes  to  their  riders  and/or  state  and  local  taxpayers. 
If  fare  increases  are  required,  those  increases  will  drive  riders  back  to  commuting 
by  automobile,  thereby  undermining  national  goals  related  to  conserving  energy, 
and  reducing  air  pollution  and  congestion  on  our  highways.  Commuter  rail  opera-
tors  have  an  excellent  safety  record  and  current  HOS  law  related  to  fatigue  have 
ensured the safe operation of commuter rail systems around the country. 

Among  the  bill’s  provisions  that  most  affect  commuter  rail  systems  are  changes 
in  the  Hours-of-Service  (HOS)  laws,  including  the  substantial  limitations  on  limbo 
time,  requirements  for  Positive  Train  Control,  the  potential  new  certification  of 
workers,  and  increases  in  civil  penalties.  We  appreciate  that  the  bill  limits  the  dis-
closure  of  official  information  submitted  by  commuter  rail  systems  to  the  Federal 
Government  as  part  of  risk  analysis  and  reduction  programs,  but  want  to  be  sure 
that  these  limits  effectively  eliminate  liability  based  on  a  commuter  system’s  good 
faith  efforts  to  cooperate  with  Federal  authorities  and  improve  safety  and  security. 
While this bill does not directly address current Federal pre-emption of rail safety 
laws, APTA strongly supports preservation of Federal pre-emption in the case of rail 
safety laws. We believe that Federal pre-emption provides necessary consistency and 
prevents  the  application  of  inconsistent  standards  at  the  state  or  local  level  that 
would  produce  an  unworkable  regulatory  patchwork  for  commuter  rail  systems. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

34 

APTA supports the position of the Association of American Railroads on pre-emption 
since this issue affects all railroads equally. 
Hours-of-Service Laws 

The  bill  makes  several  important  changes  in  Hours-of-Service  (HOS)  laws  and 
limbo  time  that  may  adversely  impact  commuter  rail  systems  without  reducing  fa-
tigue  or  improving  safety.  In  general,  APTA  believes  that  commuter  rail  systems 
should  be  grandfathered  under  existing  law  subject  to  FRA  review  of  HOS  laws  as 
they  specifically  relate  to  commuter  rail  systems,  with  any  changes  in  HOS  laws 
based  on  FRA  recommendations  developed  under  the  Rail  Safety  Advisory  Com-
mittee (RSAC) process that provides for industry and labor input and collaboration. 
APTA believes that the increase in off-duty time from 8 hours to 10 hours during 
the prior 24 hours is unnecessary for commuter rail employees. We believe that our 
excellent  safety  record  proves  that  the  current  requirement  that  a  commuter  rail 
employee  has  had  at  least  8  consecutive  hours  off-duty  during  the  prior  24  hours 
ensures that fatigue does not affect safety, especially since commuter rail employees 
can almost always spend their off-duty hours in their own homes. The fact that com-
muter rail employees are generally scheduled to work regular daily shifts, and that 
they  often  have  the  opportunity  for  an  interim  rest  period  of  at  least  4  hours  be-
tween shifts, at rest facilities, should all be factors considered before any change in 
the minimum daily off-duty period is contemplated for commuter rail employees, ei-
ther by legislation or regulations. 

The change in the draft Senate bill that would prohibit communications with em-
ployees  during  their  daily  off-duty  time  would  also  make  it  more  difficult  to  call  in 
on-call  employees  to  cover  for  employees  who  call  in  sick  or  do  not  report  for  work, 
but we appreciate that the bill permits the Secretary to waive prohibitions on com-
munications  for  commuter  and  intercity  passenger  railroads  under  certain  condi-
tions.  We  urge  the  committee  to  consider  a  specific  waiver  of  these  prohibitions  on 
communications  for  commuter  railroads,  subject  to  an  FRA  study,  with  any  rec-
ommendations developed under the RSAC process. 

APTA also has concerns about provisions in the draft bill that significantly reduce 
the permissible use of limbo time. The bill changes current law which now considers 
time spent in deadhead transportation from a duty assignment to the place of final 
release  to  be  neither  time  on-duty  nor  time  off-duty—so-called  limbo  time.  The  use 
of  limbo  time  for  commuter  rail  employees  returning  from  duty  assignments,  espe-
cially  those  employees  filling  in  for  sick  employees,  and  the  impact  of  this  limbo 
time on fatigue, should be studied by the FRA and considered in the RSAC process 
before  any  changes  are  made.  Once  again,  the  fact  that  commuter  rail  employees 
have  rest  time  during  the  day,  off-duty  time  at  home,  and  working  conditions  dif-
ferent  from  freight  rail  employees  should  be  considered  and  fully  reviewed  before 
any changes are made. We also note that the bill essentially permits up to 30 hours 
of limbo time per employee per month in certain circumstances during the year after 
the  bill’s  enactment,  and  authority  for  the  Secretary  to  issues  regulations  allowing 
a  maximum  of  20  hours  of  limbo  time  per  employee  per  month  under  such  condi-
tions within 2 years of the bill’s enactment. 

We also recognize that the bill provides a number of exceptions, based on weather, 
accidents,  major  equipment  failures,  and  other  specific  conditions,  when  deadhead 
time returning from a duty assignment to a place of final release may be considered 
limbo time. While we appreciate these specific exceptions and a limited use of limbo 
time  each  month,  we  suggest  that  the  bill  at  least  preserve  the  full  30  hours  of 
limbo  time  per  employee  per  month  subject  to  an  FRA/RSAC  process  to  review  the 
use of limbo time by commuter rail systems. 

We  note  that  the  bill  changes  HOS  laws  by  requiring  that  an  employee  has  had 
at least 24 consecutive hours off in the past consecutive 7 days. We also appreciate 
that  the  bill  permits  the  Secretary  to  waive  this  requirement  if  a  collective  bar-
gaining  agreement  provides  a  different  arrangement  which  provides  an  equivalent 
level of safety and protection against fatigue for affected employees. We believe that 
employees  will  want  to  take  advantage  of  this  ability  to  have  this  issue  considered 
in  collective  bargaining  agreements  and  we  hope  that  an  efficient  process  for  such 
waivers can be established. 

Finally,  if  significant  changes  to  HOS  laws  for  commuter  rail  employees  remain 
in this legislation, we urge the Committee to allow a 2 year phase-in period to give 
the  industry  sufficient  time  to  hire,  train,  and  qualify  new  employees.  In  today’s 
very tight job market, we need time to build up the required workforce. 
Positive Train Control 

We note that the bill requires each Class 1 railroad, railroads with an inadequate 
safety record, and intercity and commuter rail systems to develop safety risk reduc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

35 

tion  programs,  and  that  these  programs  must  include  as  part  of  the  required  tech-
nology implementation plan a schedule for implementation of a Positive Train Con-
trol  system  by  December  31,  2018.  While  APTA’s  commuter  railroad  system  mem-
bers  want  to  consider  the  implementation  of  Positive  Train  Control  systems  and 
other signal systems that improve safety and enhance the efficiency of running com-
muter rail trains and freight trains in mixed operational environments, we urge the 
Congress to provide as much flexibility in the type of systems used and their imple-
mentation.  We  also  remain  very  concerned  about  the  interoperability  of  such  sys-
tems  with  various  freight  and  commuter  rail  systems  sharing  multiple  railroad 
trackage such as is the case in Washington, D.C., Chicago, and Los Angeles. As pub-
lic agencies, while supportive of PTC generally, we remain concerned about the sub-
stantial  cost  and  support  Federal  assistance  for  implementation  costs.  In  addition 
to  cost  concerns,  we  want  to  be  sure  that  different  trains  from  different  railroads 
are able to respond to signal systems on different railroads in a consistent and pre-
dictable manner. 
Prohibition on Public Disclosure of Required Records 

APTA  commuter  rail  systems  applaud  the  committee  for  the  inclusion  of  prohibi-
tions  on  the  public  disclosure  of  required  railroad  safety  analyses  records,  but  we 
want  to  be  sure  that  such  provisions  adequately  protect  commuter  railroads  which 
submit such information from increased liability as a result of their cooperation. For 
instance,  we  hope  that  the  prohibitions  on  the  disclosure  of  such  information  also 
prevent the release of information collected under Title II of the bill, which requires 
the  submission  of  certain  information  on  grade  crossings  for  the  development  of  a 
national grade crossing inventory. 
Grade Crossing Safety and Trespasser Protection 

We  appreciate  the  Committee’s  efforts  to  improve  safety  at  highway-rail  grade- 
crossings. We also appreciate the bill’s directive that the Secretary evaluate and re-
view  current  local,  state,  and  Federal  laws  regarding  trespassing  on  railroad  prop-
erty,  vandalisms  affecting  safety,  and  violations  of  warning  signs  for  development 
of  model  prevention  strategies  and  laws  at  the  state  and  local  level.  As  noted  ear-
lier, we hope that any information on grade crossings and related safety reviews col-
lected  under  this  title  is  subject  to  prohibitions  on  the  public  disclosure  of  required 
safety information included under Title I. We have also been supportive of the $220 
million  in  Federal  Highway  Administration  funding  that  is  authorized  annually 
under SAFETEA–LU for grade crossing safety and support efforts to see that those 
funds are fully used to improve safety at highway railroad grade crossings. 
Railroad Safety Enhancements 

The bill directs the Secretary to issue regulations within 1 year of the bill’s enact-
ment requiring railroads, railroad carrier contractors, and subcontractors to develop 
training  plans  for  crafts  and  classes  of  employees.  It  also  directs  the  Secretary  to 
submit  recommendations  to  Congress  on  whether  certification  of  certain  crafts  or 
classes of railroad employees, contractor employees, and subcontractor employees is 
necessary  to  reduce  accidents  and  improve  safety.  APTA  urges  Congress  to  involve 
the commuter rail industry in the process used to develop regulations for the devel-
opment of training plans and in the process used to determine whether certification 
is beneficial. 

We  also  appreciate  that  the  bill  directs  DOT  to  study  and  report  on  the  safest, 
most  efficient  and  cost  effective  way  to  deal  with  efforts  to  minimize  safety  risks 
associated  with  platform  gaps  as  required  under  the  Americans  with  Disabilities 
Act.  We  urge  Congress  to  ensure  that  the  commuter  rail  industry  has  an  oppor-
tunity  to  participate  in  the  study  and  to  make  comments  on  any  proposed  rec-
ommendations. 

Finally,  while  we  note  that  this  issue  is  not  covered  by  the  bill,  we  would  like 
to  be  sure  that  transit  police  have  the  same  flexibility  as  railroad  police  to  cross 
state lines to protect commuter rail equipment, facilities, and operations. In the case 
of  New  Jersey  Transit,  their  railroad  police  are  part  of  the  agency’s  transit  police, 
with  jurisdiction  over  bus,  light  rail,  and  commuter  railroads,  and  as  a  result  are 
not classified as railroad police with such authority. 
Conclusion 

We thank the Committee for this opportunity to testify on the draft version of the 
Railroad  Safety  Enhancement  Act  of  2007.  We  want  to  express  our  willingness,  on 
behalf  of  the  American  Public  Transportation  Association  (APTA),  and  particularly 
its  commuter  railroad  systems,  to  work  with  the  Committee,  and  the  Congress,  as 
it  develops  rail  safety  legislation  that  affects  commuter  rail  systems  in  the  United 
States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

36 

We  strongly  believe,  as  reflected  by  the  development  and  expansion  of  commuter 
rail  systems  in  communities  across  the  Nation,  that  the  public  wants  and  supports 
commuter  rail  service.  Commuter  rail  systems  offer  an  attractive  alternative  for 
commuters  who  want  an  alternative  to  driving  to  and  from  work  on  a  daily  basis. 
These  commuters  help  to  reduce  traffic  congestion  and  energy  consumption,  they 
help  make  our  highways  work  more  efficiently  for  those  who  must  drive,  they  re-
duce  their  own  commuting  costs,  and  they  often  experience  a  better  quality  of  life. 
We are happy to try and answer any questions that members of the Committee may 
have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes? 
Senator  SMITH.  With  your  indulgence,  I  have  to  go  to  a  Finance 
Committee  markup,  and  I  will  submit  to  the  witnesses  my  ques-
tions.  And  I  thank  you  very  much,  I  appreciate  all  of  your  testi-
mony. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  We  will  keep  the  record  open,  and  thanks 

very much, Senator, for your comments. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Chairman, I thank you. I apologize, because, 
likewise I’m late, and I have to go, also, to the Finance Committee 
markup.  But  I  wanted  to  come  and  just  welcome  John  Tolman, 
here, as a witness, I’ve known him for a long time, I know his fam-
ily, and I know what an expert he is on rail policy. 

And I want to congratulate you and Senator Smith for this initia-
tive, and this effort. I know there’s some dispute over the question 
of,  what  constitutes  duty  hours,  and  how  that  works.  And  there’s 
a  little  difference  among  some  of  the  witnesses,  and  I  understand 
that.  And  I’ll  look  forward  to  following  up  with  staff  and  figuring 
it out. 

But the bottom line to me is, you want to have rail workers who 
are  not  excessively  fatigued,  you  want  to  reduce  accident  possibili-
ties,  you  want  also  to  treat  workers  thoughtfully  and  intelligently. 
And  I  think  that  this  bill  seeks  to  do  that,  and  I  look  forward  to, 
working  out  the  details  with  you,  and  I  thank  you  for  that.  I  cer-
tainly welcome all of the witnesses, but you know, forgive me a lit-
tle chauvinism—if you don’t mind—and personal privilege. 

Thank you. 
Mr. TOLMAN. Good to be here. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much, Senator Kerry. 
Senator KERRY. Again, if we can submit some written questions? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Absolutely. And I know that your relation-
ship  to  Mr.  Tolman  is  totally  understood.  Though  he  lives,  I  be-
lieve, now in Ohio. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I’ve  got  strong  feelings  about  Ohio,  too,  I 

want you to know. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  didn’t  mean  to  bring  up  a  sore  subject. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator KERRY. Well, he was on the right side of Ohio, you know. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Tolman  has  an  accent  that  suggests 
that maybe he comes from another part of the country. We kind of 
like it, and we’re good friends. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

37 

Thanks very much, Senator Kerry. 
And I’m joined also by two other colleagues, and we’ll try to move 

things along, we’ll take 5 minutes each for questions. 

Mr.  Boardman—if  we  authorize  funding  for  the  Safety  Risk  Re-
duction  Program—what  kind  of  benefits  might  we  expect  from 
that? 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Our  expectation,  Senator,  is  that  the  entire  rea-
son  why  we  were  looking  at  a  Safety  Risk  Reduction  Program  is 
to  build  a  stronger  safety  culture,  and,  in  the  next  five  years,  re-
duce overall accidents by 50 percent. And we’ve already begun that 
in some of the actions that we’re already working with, some of the 
railroads:  on  close-call  reporting;  track  joint  bar  inspection;  a  total 
quality  index  on  track.  What  we’re  really  doing  is  looking  for  the 
ability to use precursor data: things that would indicate to us that 
there  is  a  risk  out  there.  There  needs  to  be  a  commitment,  there 
needs to be a systematic and objective look at the data itself (some 
problem solving, corrective activities), and then there is a—we have 
to  have  some  kind  of  sustaining  mechanism.  But  our  goal  is  a  50- 
percent reduction in five years. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Hamberger,  would  the  railroads  sup-

port this kind of safety regimen? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Absolutely, Mr. Chairman, in fact, I think from 
our  standpoint,  we  are  in  fact  moving,  and  have  moved  in  that  di-
rection  from  the  standpoint  of  predictive  maintenance.  And  as  I 
testified  before  this  Committee  on  May  22,  the  new  technologies 
that  we  are  employing  at  the  roadside,  as  the  trains  go  by  trying 
to  keep  track  of  out-of-shape  wheels,  they’re  trying  to  determine 
what  is  the  thickness  of  the  brake  pad,  and  using  sonar  and  laser 
technologies to try to stop something from happening, and not just 
react  to  it  after  it  happens.  And  so,  this  holistic  approach  that  is 
in the bill, we support very much, thank you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  it’s  interesting  to  see  the  relative 
unanimity here of interests in getting the bill underway, and safety 
rules  underway,  and  adjusting  the  hours-of-service  so  that  people 
aren’t asked to do tasks that are unreasonably taxing when fatigue 
could be a terrible factor in the operation of the railroad. 

But,  this  week  a  Federal  court  struck  down  a  DOT  proposal  on 
reforming  hours-of-service  rules  for  truckers.  This  is  the  second 
time  that  a  court  stopped  the  Administration’s  attempt  to  allow 
more  consecutive  hours  on  the  job.  Now,  after  two  failures  to  get 
this right in the trucking industry, don’t you think it’s risky to give 
blanket  authority  to  the  Department  to  set  this  standard  for  rail-
road employees? Who wants to comment? 

Mr. Tolman? 
Mr. TOLMAN. Senator, I believe you’re right on point. And frankly 
that’s—some  things  belong  in  the  RSAC  process,  and  can  work 
well,  but  I  sincerely  think  that  Congress—or  I  should  say,  the  Su-
preme  Court  created  this  quagmire  of  limbo  issue,  and  Congress 
has  to  set  that,  that  particular  issue  straight.  I  don’t  believe  that 
it  belongs  in  an  RSAC  process,  there  are  only  two  stakeholders  in 
the  RSAC  process—or  three,  stakeholders—the  signalmen—four, 
I’m  sorry—signalmen,  dispatchers,  United  Transportation  Union, 
Brotherhood of Locomotive Engineers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

38 

That’s  why  it  doesn’t  belong  in  an  RSAC  process.  I  think  that 
Congress  has  to  create  a  parameter.  I  think  you  did  in  this  bill,  I 
applaud  you  for  doing  that,  but  I  just  don’t  think  the  limbo  issue 
needs  to  go  down  that  road.  Other  issues,  fatigue-related,  can  go 
down  that  road,  and  maybe  should  go  down  that  road  if—and  you 
have  it  correct—with  restrictions,  with  time  parameters.  If  you 
don’t do A, then you go to B. And, I applaud you for that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Do you believe our bill provides FRA with 
enough  latitude  to  update  the  hours-of-service  in  a  way  that  will 
not jeopardize safety? 

Mr. Boardman? 
Mr. BOARDMAN. I was going to go back to the other question, but 

that’s fine. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. If you can do it in a hurry. 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Let  me  just  go  back  to  the  other  question;  this 
is a place that John and I don’t agree with each other. I think that 
when  the  Supreme  Court  looked  at  one  of  my  sister  agencies 
(FMCSA) what they said was, one of the things they said was, that 
there  wasn’t  enough  discussion  with  stakeholders,  with  folks  that 
really had an opportunity to say what the issues were. 

I think one of the things that I’ve noticed and I compliment—and 
John’s been around a lot longer than I have in the RSAC process— 
is  that  you  really  do  get  into  the  nitty-gritty  of  those  kinds  of  dis-
cussions  in  the  RSAC  process.  So,  I  see  that  as  an  important  ele-
ment  of  what  is  needed  is  to  make  sure  that  whatever  comes  out 
of  this  is  the  appropriate  thing.  RSAC  gives  us  the  flexibility,  be-
cause we can discuss those things. 

To  your  question  right  this  minute—just  looking  very  quickly  at 
it,  and  your  bill  for  today—we  see  a  lot  of  very  serious  and  good 
thought  in  this  process  of  hours-of-service.  And  we  want  to  con-
tinue  to  work  with  the  Committee  to  come  together  to  a  solution. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks  very  much.  Just  an,  an  ad  lib  to 
what  you’ve  said—very  few  people  have  been  around  here  longer 
than I have, so—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Tolman, has been around long—— 
Senator  Carper,  a  Senator  from  a  State  that,  though  small,  has 
a very active interest in railroads, both passenger and freight, and 
we’re happy to have him here with us. 

Senator Carper? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Gentlemen, welcome, thank you for your presence today, for your 
testimony,  and  for  responding  to  our  questions.  Particularly  your 
insights on this proposal from Senator Lautenberg. 

My first question is to Administrator Boardman—I almost called 
you  Admiral  Boardman,  I  saw  ‘‘ADM’’—I’m  an  old  Navy  guy,  I  al-
most promoted you here. 

But, in your testimony I think you discussed permitting railroads 
to comply with an improved fatigue-management plan, as an alter-
native  to  complying  with  benchmark  limits  set  forth  in  any  per-
spective regulations, in fact, I think those are your words. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

39 

And  I  would  just  ask,  what  minimum  standards,  or  factors, 
would  the  FRA  expect  to  see  in  those  management  plans  that 
you’re alluding to? 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  I  think,  Senator,  that  one  of  the  things  that  we 
really want to do, and it actually ties in to the answers to the last 
questions,  is  to  discuss  those  principles  that  we  think  are  the  sci-
entific results that we’ve really found in fatigue management. 

For  example,  there  are  four  of  them  that  I’d  like  to  really  talk 
about for just 1 second. And that is, that we know at this point in 
time that it really takes 8 hours to feel rested. And, in the law that 
currently  exists  (recognizing  that  there  are  some  changes  pro-
posed), but in the current law, if you worked 11 hours and 59 min-
utes,  you’d  get  8  hours  off.  And  the  call  practice  right  now,  is  to 
be  called  as  much  as  two  hours  beforehand.  That  in  and  of  itself, 
we know immediately, can’t give the kind of rest that an employee 
really needs. 

In 1996, there was a study done that found the average engineer 
got  just  a  little  bit  over  seven  hours  of  sleep  a  night.  And  in  the 
more recent studies that we’ve looked at, they’ve shown that there’s 
another issue here—with 12 hours off, the average amount of time 
for  sleep  is  6.1  hours,  and  with  9  hours  off,  it’s  about  4.5  hours. 
In fact, it is that the more time that a person has off, the more op-
portunity  the  person  has  to  get  rest.  And  with  the  less  time,  what 
we’re  seeing  is  a  sleep  deficit  occurring.  So,  it’s  that  kind  of  sci-
entific  knowledge  that  will  help  us  determine  those  flexibilities 
with the railroads. 

The hours-of-service laws do not take time of day into account at 
this point in time. Yet, most people sleep best at night. If you quit 
at dawn, you’ve got the same amount of time off as somebody that 
gets  off  in  the  evening.  And  what  we  find,  and  what  the  scientists 
have  found  is,  that  when  you’re  done  between  5  a.m.  and  noon, 
that’s the worst possible time for you to get back to sleep. So, we’d 
like  to  see  those  kinds  of  issues  addressed  in  anything  in  the  fu-
ture. 

We, third, we know today that the circadian rhythm, or that 24- 
hour  sleep-wake  cycle,  can  be  rapid,  can  be  disrupted  with  rapid 
changes  in  assignment.  It  can  affect  your  physiological  functions— 
digestion, temperature regulation—kind of like jet lag coming from 
the West to the East. And under the current hours-of-service laws, 
it forces a sleep-wake cycle that’s less than 24 hours in its pattern, 
and  it’s  highly  unnatural,  and  it’s  difficult  to  adapt  to.  So,  we 
would want them to address that, as well, for flexibility. 

And then the fourth area that we would really want them to ad-
dress  would  be  the  kinds  of  things  that  recent  studies  have  indi-
cated  that  less  than  seven  hours  of  sleep  may  have  other  con-
sequences,  and  they’re  costly  consequences  for  everybody.  They’re 
obesity.  They’re  diabetes.  They’re  cardiovascular  and  hypertension 
problems. It’s anxiety. It’s a depressed mood (that’s what I tell my 
wife), and it’s alcohol use (and I don’t tell her that). 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. BOARDMAN. Thank you. 
Senator CARPER. Sounds like pillow talk. 
Thanks, thank you for that response. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

40 

This  is  a  question,  really,  for  Administrator  Boardman,  for  Mr., 

is it Solow? Solow. Has your name ever been mispronounced? 

Mr. SOLOW. Many times. 
Senator CARPER. All right. Well, not today. 
Mr. Hamberger, welcome. Nice to see you. 
In hearings about railroads, you know, we hear a lot about grade 
crossings,  I  used  to  hear  a  lot  about  those  when  I  served  on  the 
Amtrak Board. But, it often is seen as solely a railroad issue, even 
though  half  of  the  crossing  equation  is,  as  you  know,  is  a  road. 
And,  I  just  wondered—how  engaged  have  State  DOTs  been  in  ad-
dressing  grade  crossings  and  their  safety?  How  aggressively  have 
the States sought to invest $220 million in funding that we author-
ized in SAFETEA–LU for grade-crossing safety? 

Mr. SOLOW. Mr. Carper? 
Senator CARPER. Mr. Solow. 
Mr.  SOLOW.  Senator  Carper—we  are  very  aggressive  in  Cali-
fornia.  We  have  many  grade  crossings.  Just,  for  a  little  bit  of  the 
history,  during  the  WPA  you  spent  a  lot  of  money  on  the  East 
Coast  on  grade  separations.  We  spent  them  on  water  projects.  So, 
we have all these railroads and all these grade crossings which we 
now  have  to  address.  And  we’re  spending  a  lot  of  time  and  effort 
in  the  urban  areas,  because  we  have  very  high  vehicular  traffic, 
where  we  have  very  high  commuter  rail  and  passenger  rail  and 
freight traffic. 

So,  we’re  spending  a  lot  of  our  efforts  working  with  the  FRA,  as 
a matter of fact, to do as much in terms of new technology at grade 
crossings—median barriers, four-quad gates, predictors in the road 
surface,  those  type  of  things—to  attempt  to  improve  grade  cross-
ings  as  quickly  as  we  can.  We  know  we’re  not  going  to  get  enough 
money  for  all  of  the  grade  separations  we’d  like.  So,  we’re  putting 
all of our time and effort, beside grade separations, to make vehic-
ular  traffic  as  safe  as  possible  at  grade  crossings.  And  it’s  a—it’s 
a  strong  effort  by  both  local  agencies  in  California,  for  example, 
and the State. 

Is there enough money? No. But, we are spending as much as we 

possibly can. 

Senator CARPER. My time is expired, but if I could have just an-

other moment or so, Mr. Hamberger—could you just, quickly? 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Yes,  in  addition  to  all  of  that  good  work  that’s 
going  on,  I  did  thank  Chairman  Lautenberg  before  you  came  in, 
Senator  Carper  I  know  you,  also,  have  done  a  lot  at  the  Environ-
ment  and  Public  Works  Committee  to  fully  fund  the  Section  130 
grade-crossing program. 

Our  members  are  working  with  local  communities,  in  an  effort 
to work cooperatively where there might be 10 crossings in a town, 
to help fund a program where several of those might be closed, but 
add  quad  gates,  or  even  grade-crossing  separations  at  the  others. 
And,  so  we  take  this  very  seriously.  And,  I  think,  the  states  are 
stepping  up.  And  one  of  the,  of  course,  major  accomplishments  is 
to  get  the  word  out,  through  Operation  Lifesaver,  how  important 
it  is,  and  that  it  takes  a  mile  for  a  train  to  stop.  A  number  of  our 
members  are  putting  cameras  on  the  head-end  of  the  trains,  so 
that we can go back into the communities, and try to educate peo-
ple that, going around, and it’s just a very eerie scene to see, where 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

41 

the  third  car  in  line  at  a  crossing  all  of  a  sudden  comes  around  a 
gate that’s down. And we need to try to educate the American pub-
lic, that that is just not a smart play. And, I know that the Federal 
Railroad Administration is very involved in that, as well. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you 
to  our  witnesses  for  being  here.  I  think  I  said  at  the  last  hearing 
that this has been a concern in our state, we’ve had 9 reported fa-
talities  in  65  total  collisions  in  2005.  And  there  was  one  dev-
astating  accident  in  Minot,  North  Dakota,  right  next  door,  and  it 
brought  home  to  the  people  in  our  State,  the  devastating  impact 
this can have on a community. 

And, I’m glad that we have new technology, and that that’s going 
to help us, and I’m also glad that there has been research done on 
fatigue,  and  sleep  deprivation.  And  I’d  like  to  commend  Senator 
Lautenberg,  and  Senator  Smith  for  their  work,  for  introducing  the 
Railroad Safety Enhancement Act of 2007. 

And  so,  I  had  some  questions,  just  of  you,  Mr.  Hamberger.  I 
know  that  we  heard  at  the  rail  safety  hearing  in  May  that  the 
workforce  is  getting  older,  and  retiring,  and  I  wondered  what 
you’re  doing  to  recruit  new  workers,  and  to  ensure  that  the  work-
ers are trained adequately. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Well, it’s a major challenge, Senator, and thank 
you  for  the  question.  In  fact,  we’re  looking  at  the  need  for  80,000 
employees  over  the  next  5  years,  just  to  replace  the  attrition.  And 
so, each of our members is holding job fairs, working with colleges, 
working  with  the  military,  in  particular.  We’re  working  with  the 
Department  of  Labor  to  go  out  to  their  one-stop  labor  recruitment 
stops in urban areas. 

I  will  be  blunt,  and  tell  you  that  there  are  a  couple  of  hurdles 
to  overcome.  Number  one  is  that  we  are  a  zero-tolerance  industry. 
We have drug testing on a random basis, and we have drug testing 
when  there’s  an  accident,  and  we  have  pre-employment  drug  test-
ing. 

I  am  told  by  our  human  resources  people,  when  we  have  a  job 
fair, that’s the first thing they make clear to the pool of applicants. 
They  then  take  a  break,  and  when  they  reconvene,  about  50  per-
cent of the pool has walked out the door. And, so that is challenge 
number one. 

Challenge number two—— 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Kind  of  like  what’s  happening  with  the 

Tour de France. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Sorry. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. Point well taken. 
Challenge  number  two  is  that  we  are  a  24/7  operation.  We  do 
have people, as Mr. Tolman was indicating, you know, working the 
midnight  shift.  In  Northern  Territories,  in  South  Dakota,  where  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

42 

gets a little cold in February, and so it is sometimes difficult to re-
cruit into that environment. 

Nonetheless, we seem to be hitting our targets. We have, in fact, 
increased  employment  in  the  last  couple  of  years,  and  as  I  point 
out in my written testimony, we have very good training programs. 
I  know  that  the  bill  calls  for  training  programs.  We  think  that,  in 
fact, an engineer gets months of training, it costs between $50,000 
and  $70,000,  and  I  would  invite  any  of  the  members  of  the  Com-
mittee, all of our Class 1 railroads have very up-to-date, very mod-
ern  training  facilities,  and  we’d  love  to  have  a  field  hearing,  or 
have you come out and take a look at them. 

But,  you  have  put  your  finger  on  a  challenge  for  the  industry 

going forward. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Tolman,  maybe  you  want  to  add  to 
that?  And  could  you  also  comment  about,  I  know  in  your  written 
testimony  you  talked  about  some  of  the  workers  still  sleeping  in 
‘‘camp cars’’ and the concerns with that, if you’d like to add to that. 
Mr.  TOLMAN.  Sure.  I’d  just  like  to,  first,  I  guess,  address  the 
question  that  you  just  asked  Mr.  Hamberger.  And,  first  of  all,  I 
think  drug  testing  in  the  industry  has  absolutely  cleaned  up,  and 
over the many, many years with wonderful programs such as Oper-
ation Red Block where our peers work, and help each other, there’s 
less  than  1  percent  of  incidents  testing  positive  in  the  operating 
employees in the industry. 

The  railroad  industry  is  a  24/7  business.  And,  unfortunately,  it 
takes  a  commitment  from  both  labor  and  management  to  try  to, 
you  know,  make  it  a  desirable  place  to  work.  And,  this  is  what 
we’re doing here—is try to figure out ways it would make—not only 
the—my understanding is when they do these interviews, they end 
up  with,  after  2  years,  with  less  than  30  percent  of  the  people 
they’ve  hired.  So,  obviously,  just  from  a  business  perspective, 
there’s something wrong with the industry. 

The younger employees are more apt to look for time off with the 
family, and that’s what, you know, the social system of today’s soci-
ety  is  about.  And  that—you  need  to  find  a  way  to  get  that.  And  I 
think this bill does one thing, a step in the right direction on that, 
and  it’s  the  10-hour  calling.  And  it  allows  you  the  opportunity  to, 
number  one,  get  the  adequate  rest,  and  it  also  allows  you  to,  you 
know move, to prepare yourself for coming to work. 

As far as the camp car issue, it’s absolutely ridiculous that we’re 
even discussing this, as far as I’m concerned. When you look at the 
conditions, you actually—I guess it was measured in, comparing a, 
somebody put in prison versus a camp car—the prisoner would ac-
tually  have  more  room  to  move  around,  never  mind  the  quality  of 
sleep  of  that  individual,  living  and  having  to  deal  with  the  condi-
tions in there. I know the House has the same version, I know the 
Senate—and  thank  God  the  Senate  has  the  same.  And  hopefully, 
at the end of the day, through the leadership of the Senate and the 
House, that we eliminate those for now. And, it is only one railroad 
that currently has them, and that’s a nice thing, too. 

So, thank you. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. If I—thank you. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Yes,  you  want  to  just  quickly  add  to  that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

43 

Mr. HAMBERGER. I would just say that one railroad, in fact, does 
rely  on  camp  cars  in  remote  locations,  where  there  really  are  not 
other  accommodations  for  their  maintenance  of  way  workers.  And 
they  are  now  modernizing  their  cars,  converting  them  from  8-per-
son  to  4-person  sleepers,  putting  in  air  conditioning,  baths,  desks 
and,  in  fact,  they  have  about  44  of  these  cars  on  an  emergency 
basis, they used them during Hurricane Katrina, there are Federal 
Railroad  Administration  guidelines  governing  that  camp  car  use, 
and  it  really  is  a  way  to  provide  good  accommodations  in  remote 
locations. 

So, hopefully as this updating program gets completed, it will be 
accepted,  and—in  fact,  we  hope—embraced  and  endorsed  by  the 
employees as well. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Tolman,  do  you  have  anything  to  add? 
Mr.  TOLMAN.  I  beg  to  differ,  I  don’t  think  that’s  the  way  to  go. 
Not only the quality of sleep—sleeping beside a railroad, on a rail-
road  siding  while  a  train  goes  by.  I  guess  I  would  challenge  Mr. 
Hamberger  that  he  should  go  out  in  a  camp  car  in  a  month,  and 
then come back here and see if that’s the way to go. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. You have to compare it to what the alternatives 

are out there. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. It sounds like a CODEL trip for us. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Perhaps this will be resolved in the legisla-

tion. So, thank you. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, last week, we had two nights here in 
which—I’ll  speak  for  myself,  I  had  less  than  4  hours  sleep  each  of 
those  nights—and  I  hope  there  was  no  evidence  of  fatigue  there, 
but I sure felt it, I can tell ya. 

Senator Thune, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  A  CODEL  on  some 
of the railroads in South Dakota would be a little bumpy—on some 
of  that  FRA-accepted  track  out  there.  You  thought  we  had  a  hard 
time sleeping the other night, I think it’d be hard sleeping in those 
sleeper cars, too. 

But,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  Sub-
committee hearing on legislative matters that could strengthen the 
role  of  the  FRA  when  it  comes  to  rail  safety,  and  I  have  drawn 
some  previous  experience  as  State  rail  director  in  the  State  of 
South Dakota. Having a rail system that is both efficient and safe, 
is  critical  to  our  Nation’s  economy.  There  is  no  better  way  to  haul 
agricultural  commodities,  to  move  freight  and  that  sort  of  thing, 
than on the railroads. Our Nation has a tremendously vast rail net-
work, and with the projected increases in real traffic that we expect 
in  the  coming  years,  I  think  it’s  going  to  be  important  that  we  be 
able  to  work  together  in  the  Senate  to  ensure  that  we  assist  the 
Department of Transportation as it works to make our rail system 
even safer than it is today. 

And  I  also  think  it’s  important  as  we  evaluate  legislative  pro-
posals,  to  also  stress  the  significant  improvements  that  the  indus-
try  and  regulators  have  made  over  the  years  when  it  comes  to  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

44 

reductions in train accidents, and with the improvements in overall 
safety,  particularly  regarding  injuries  and  fatalities.  And,  while 
there’s  certainly  a  lot  more  that  can  be  done,  we  should  also,  I 
think, not forget how far we’ve come in the last few years. 

So,  I  appreciate  the  testimony  of  our  witnesses  today,  and  wel-
come  their  suggestions  as  we  go  about  the  job  of  making  our  rails 
stronger and safer. 

And,  I  would  like  to  just  pose,  I  guess,  one  question  of  our  wit-
nesses.  And  I  agree,  obviously,  that  the  improvements  that  are 
being proposed, as it relates to some of the things in your bill, Sen-
ator  Lautenberg,  that  deal  with  hours-of-service,  limbo  time,  staff-
ing issues, and some of the workplace issues are all important. Can 
you  tell  the  Committee  the  other  steps  that  you  believe  our  Na-
tion’s railroads could make to improve safety? In other words, what 
other things could the railroads be doing that would lead to safety 
improvements that perhaps are, maybe fall outside the parameters 
of this particular piece of legislation? 

Mr. BOARDMAN. Senator, I think that we recently issued—and we 
can  produce  this  and  give  it  to  you—the  National  Rail  Safety  Ac-
tion  Plan.  We  just  recently  updated  it;  it  began  on  May  16,  2005. 
And, I think it ties into many of the elements of this particular bill, 
and  all  of  the  bills  that  are  being  discussed,  on  almost  every  area. 
But,  if  you  look  at  it  from  the  standpoint  of  safety  improvement 
(and  I  know  you’re  an  old  State  rail  guy),  it’s  really  about  the 
track,  and  it’s  about  what’s  under  the  track,  and  it’s  about  the 
technology we use today, and how we apply that technology. 

But  all  of  that  technology  (whether  it  is  a  technology  that  gets 
precursor  data  for  us  to  reduce  risk  or  whether  it’s  a  technology 
that  improves  human  factors),  I  think,  ties  into  this  legislation  in 
one form or another. Because, as we talk about the elements of this 
particular  bill,  we’re  talking  about  the  critical  pieces  of  the  grade- 
crossing accidents, the trespass accidents, and understanding what 
we need to do for the future to improve those kinds of things. 

For  example,  on  the  trespass  today,  the  newest  task  force  in 
RSAC’s  Passenger  Safety  Working  Group,  today,  is  looking  at—es-
pecially—the  gap  between  a  passenger  train  and  the  station  plat-
form,  because  of  the  different  rolling  equipment,  and  the  different 
locations  of  where  it  is,  but  it  needs  to  move  quickly  to  do  some-
thing to reduce the number of people—pedestrians—that are being 
killed  as  they  try  to  get  to  that  train,  by  a  second  train.  And  we 
need a way of identifying that. 

So,  I  think—and  I  don’t  know  if  I’ve  addressed  your  question 
quite  the  way  you  really  want  it—but  what  we’ll  provide  to  you  is 
that  update  on  that  National  Rail  Safety  Action  Plan,  which  I 
think ties many of these things together. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

45 

National Rail Safety Action Plan Progress Report 2005–2007 

FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION 
United States Department of Transportation 

May 2007 

Introduction 

On May 16, 2005, the U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT) and the Federal 
Railroad  Administration  (FRA)  launched  an  aggressive  and  proactive  National  Rail 
Safety Action Plan to address important safety issues by: 

• Targeting the most frequent, highest-risk causes of train accidents; 
• Focusing FRA oversight and inspection resources more precisely; and 
• Accelerating  research  efforts  that  have  the  potential  to  mitigate  the  largest 

risks. 

The  Action  Plan  includes  initiatives  in  several  areas:  reducing  human  factor- 
caused train accidents, addressing the serious problem of fatigue among railroad op-
erating  employees,  improving  track  safety;  enhancing  hazardous  materials  safety 
and emergency preparedness, focusing FRA resources (inspections and enforcement) 
on  areas  of  greatest  safety  concern  and  consequence,  and  further  improving  high-
way-rail grade crossing safety. 

This  report  details  the  substantial  progress  made  by  FRA  to  successfully  imple-
ment the various elements of the Action Plan during the past 2 years. It also high-
lights other projects and activities FRA is tackling, which while not specifically ele-
ments of the Action Plan, nonetheless will contribute to advancing safety on the Na-
tion’s rail network. 
Achievements During the Past Year 

Below  is  a  list  of  achievements  in  the  implementation  of  the  Action  Plan  since 

the first progress report was issued in June 2006. 
August 2006 
October 2006 
November 2006 
January 2007 

Public meetings on safety at private highway-rail grade crossings begin 
Proposed rule on human factor-caused train accidents published 
Summary report on validation of fatigue measurement model issued 
Research  agreement  signed  by  FRA  and  railroad  and  chemical  industry 
leaders to strengthen rail hazmat tank car design standards 
Data collection for ‘‘Close Call’’ near accident project begins 
Two new automated track inspection vehicles begin service 

February 2007 
April 2007 

In  February  2007,  FRA  also  submitted  the  ‘‘Federal  Railroad  Safety  Account-
ability  and  Improvement  Act’’,  introduced  in  Congress  as  H.R.  1516  and  S.  918,  to 
reauthorize the agency for 4 years and strengthen its safety program. 
Anticipated Action Plan Accomplishments in 2007 

• Publish final rule to reduce human factor-caused train accidents 
• Complete research to strengthen the structural integrity of hazardous materials 

tank cars 

• Issue  final  report  on  private  highway-rail  grade  crossing  safety  with  findings 

and recommendations for further action 

Causes of Train Accidents 

The  causes  of  train  accidents  are  generally  grouped  into  five  categories:  human 
factors,  track,  equipment,  signal  and  train  control,  and  miscellaneous.  Two  cat-
egories  of  accidents—those  caused  by  human  factors  and  those  caused  by  defective 
track—comprise more than 70 percent of all reportable train accidents. Accordingly, 
both  are  the  primary  target  areas  for  improving  the  overall  train  accident  rate.  In 
recent years, the most serious events involving train collisions or derailments result-
ing in release of hazardous materials, or harm to rail passengers, have been caused 
by human factor or track causes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

46 

Fewer Train Accidents in 2006 

Preliminary statistics (as of February 2006) reveal that in 2006 railroads had 366 
fewer  train  accidents  nationwide,  or  an  11.3  percent  reduction  from  2005.  Specifi-
cally,  the  number  of  derailments  declined  7.3  percent  and  collisions  between  trains 
decreased  by  27.1  percent.  And,  the  train  accident  rate  per  one  million  train-miles 
is near a 10-year low despite significant increases in the volume of train traffic. 

The  data  for  2006  also  reveal  that  train  accidents  caused  by  human  error—the 
leading  cause  of  all  train  accidents—declined  19.0  percent.  Train  accidents  caused 
by  track  issues  decreased  4.4  percent,  and  those  caused  by  equipment  failure  and 
signal  problems  fell  by  7.6  percent  and  27.0  percent,  respectively.  In  addition,  last 
year  the  number  of  highway-rail  grade  crossing  collisions  fell  by  4.7  percent.  How-
ever,  grade  crossing  fatalities  increased  by  2.2  percent.  And,  trespass  fatalities,  the 
number one cause of all rail-related deaths, increased by 13.6 percent. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
T
P
E
R
6
2
7

.

s
p
e
1
T
P
E
R
6
2
7

47 

Reducing Human Factor Accidents 

ACTION ITEM: 
STATUS: 
NEXT STEP: 

Issue Federal rule addressing top causes of human factor train accidents 
Proposed rule published in October 2006 
Final rule to be issued in 2007 

In  October  2006,  FRA  published  a  proposed  rule  intended  to  reduce  the  number 
of  human  factor-caused  train  accidents,  which  have  consistently  constituted  the 
largest single category of train accidents. FRA believes a Federal regulation prohib-
iting common human errors that lead to train accidents will provide heightened visi-
bility  and  operational  focus  to  reduce  their  frequency  of  occurrence.  The  final  rule 
will be issued later this year. 

Analysis  of  train  accident  data  has  revealed  that  a  small  number  of  particular 
kinds of human errors account for an inordinate number of human factor-caused ac-
cidents.  The  leading  cause  is  improperly  lined  track  switches.  Other  top  causes  in-
clude  shoving  rail  cars  without  a  person  on  the  front  of  the  move  to  monitor  condi-
tions  ahead,  leaving  cars  in  a  position  that  obstructs  (fouls)  a  track,  and  failure  to 
secure a sufficient number of handbrakes. 

At  present,  few  of  these  kinds  of  mistakes  are  prohibited  by  Federal  regulations. 
Instead,  most  are  addressed  by  each  railroad’s  own  operating  rules,  which  subject 
employees who violate them to discipline, including dismissal. Currently, FRA regu-
lations  only  require  railroads  to  train  their  employees  on  these  rules  and  to  test 
them periodically on their compliance with those rules. 

The proposed rule seeks to establish greater accountability on the part of railroad 
management for the administration of railroad programs of operational tests and in-
spections, and greater accountability on the part of railroad supervisors and employ-
ees for compliance with those operating rules that are responsible for approximately 
half  of  the  train  accidents  related  to  human  factors.  FRA  believes  this  will  con-
tribute  positively  to  railroad  safety,  by  emphasizing  the  importance  of  compliance 
with  fundamental  operating  rules  and  providing  FRA  a  more  direct  means  of  pro-
moting compliance. 

The  final  rule  is  intended  to  supersede  Emergency  Order  No.  24,  which  FRA 
issued  in  October  2005,  in  response  to  an  increasing  number  of  train  accidents 
caused  by  hand-operated,  main  track  switches  in  non-signaled  territory  being  left 
in  the  wrong  position.  The  Emergency  Order  requires  special  handling,  instruction 
and  testing  of  railroad  operating  rules  pertaining  to  hand-operated  main  track 
switches in non-signaled territory, and is expected to remain in place until the final 
rule is issued and becomes effective. 

ACTION ITEM: 

Establish  ‘‘Close  Call’’  pilot  project  to  learn  from  incidents  that  could 
have caused a train accident but did not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
T
P
E
R
6
2
7

STATUS: 
NEXT STEP: 

Begin pilot project data collection February 2007 
Expand pilot project to other railroads in 2007 

48 

In  February  2007,  FRA  announced  that  employees  at  the  Nation’s  largest  rail 
yard  in  North  Platte,  Nebraska  can  now  voluntarily  and  anonymously  report  ‘‘close 
call’’  incidents  that  could  have  resulted  in  an  accident,  but  did  not,  without  fear  of 
sanction or penalty from their employer or the Federal Government as part of a new 
rail safety pilot project. 

FRA currently requires railroads to report a wide range of accidents and incidents 
that actually occur. This ‘‘close call’’ information will be analyzed to determine areas 
of  potential  risk  and  to  develop  solutions  to  prevent  accidents  in  the  future.  The 
aviation industry has a similar program. 

The  Confidential  Close  Call  Reporting  Pilot  Project  involves  Union  Pacific  Rail-
road (UP), the Brotherhood of Locomotive Engineers and Trainmen (BLET) and the 
United Transportation Union (UTU). Each has ratified an agreement with the FRA 
to  allow  railroad  employees  to  anonymously  contact  the  U.S.  Department  of  Trans-
portation’s  Bureau  of  Transportation  Statistics,  to  report  on  such  potentially  dan-
gerous situations. 

Examples of ‘‘close calls’’ could be as minor as employees lifting objects that place 
them  at  risk  for  minor  injuries,  or  more  serious  events,  such  as  a  train  operating 
in non-signaled dark territory proceeding beyond its track authority, or a train crew 
member’s  failure  to  properly  test  an  air  brake  before  leaving  a  yard,  which  could 
lead to a runaway train. 

‘‘Close  call’’  reports  will  be  taken  for  5  years  to  permit  researchers  enough  time 
to  collect  a  sufficient  number  of  incidents  for  thorough  analysis.  Importantly,  a  re-
view  team  will  evaluate  the  reports  as  they  are  received  in  order  to  make  safety 
recommendations for those that require immediate attention. 

FRA plans to extend this pilot project to other rail yards, including BNSF Railway 
in Lincoln, NE and Canadian Pacific in Portage, WI, and is also currently in discus-
sion with commuter railroads to launch another pilot location. 
Addressing Fatigue 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 
NEXT STEP: 

Accelerate  research  on  railroad  crew  work  history  to  validate  a  fatigue 
model for possible use to improve crew scheduling 
Final report issued October 2006 
FRA seeking authority to regulate railroad worker hours-of-service based 
on current scientific research February 2007 

In November 2006, FRA announced the release of a study which provides a strong 
scientific rationale for evaluating railroad employee work schedules to address work-
er fatigue. 

Fatigue  has  long  been  a  fact  of  life  for  many  railroad  operating  employees,  given 
their  long  and  often  unpredictable  work  hours  and  fluctuating  schedules.  FRA 
knowledge  of  the  industry’s  work  patterns  and  the  developing  science  of  fatigue 
mitigation,  combined  with  certain  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  investiga-
tions  indicating  employee  fatigue  as  a  major  factor  of  some  train  accidents,  have 
persuaded  FRA  that  fatigue  plays  a  role  in  one  out  of  every  four  human  factor- 
caused accidents. 

The  goal  of  the  FRA  research  was  to  determine  if  a  fatigue  model  can  accurately 
and  reliably  predict  an  increased  risk  of  human  error  that  could  contribute  to  the 
occurrence  of  a  train  accident.  A  model  for  detecting  the  point  at  which  the  risk  of 
fatigue  becomes  hazardous  could  become  an  important  part  of  a  railroad’s  fatigue 
management  plan.  FRA  expects  this  information  will  aid  the  railroad  industry  and 
labor  organizations  in  improving  crew  scheduling  practices  in  order  to  reduce  that 
risk. A similar approach is currently utilized by the Department of Defense. 

Under the study, researchers analyzed the 30-day work schedule histories of loco-
motive crews preceding approximately 1,400 train accidents and found a strong sta-
tistical correlation between the crew’s estimated level of alertness and the likelihood 
that  they  would  be  involved  in  an  accident  caused  by  human  factors.  In  fact,  the 
relationship  is  so  strong  that  the  level  of  fatigue  associated  with  some  work  sched-
ules  was  found  to  be  equivalent  to  being  awake  for  21  hours  following  an  8-hour 
sleep period the previous night. At this level, train accidents consistent with fatigue, 
such as failing to stop for red signals, were more likely to occur. 

This  research  provides  the  basis  for  an  important  component  of  the  Administra-
tion’s  rail  safety  reauthorization  proposal  submitted  to  Congress  in  February  2007 
that  would  grant  the  FRA  statutory  authority  to  regulate  railroad  worker  hours-of- 
service  based  upon  the  most  current  scientific  knowledge  available  on  fatigue  man-
agement and mitigation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

Improving Track Safety 

49 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 

NEXT STEP: 

Demonstrate  vehicle-mounted  photo  imaging  technology  to  detect  cracks 
in joint bars that can lead to derailments 
Field testing began in October 2005 
Enhanced technology tested in 2006 
Test additional enhancements to increase operating speeds and make the 
defect detection technology more robust in 2007 

Track has consistently been the second leading cause of train accidents accounting 
for  about  one-third  of  all  train  accidents  from  2001  to  2006.  Broken  joint  bars,  for 
example, are a leading cause, but the kinds of cracks in those bars that foreshadow 
a derailment-causing break are very hard to spot with the naked eye. Similarly, bro-
ken rails account for some of the most serious accidents, but the internal flaws that 
lead to many of those breaks can be detected only by specialized equipment. 

FRA is developing an automated high-resolution video joint bar inspection system 
that can be deployed on a hi-rail maintenance vehicle that will detect visual cracks 
in joint bars without having to stop the vehicle. In October 2005, a prototype system 
that  inspects  joint  bars  on  both  sides  of  each  rail  was  successfully  demonstrated. 
Testing  showed  that  the  high-resolution  video  system  detected  visual  cracks  that 
were missed by the traditional visual inspections. 

The  system  was  then  enhanced  with  new  features  to  improve  the  reliability  of 
joint  bar  detection  and  to  add  capabilities  to  include  the  global  positioning  system 
coordinates for each joint to facilitate future inspection and identification. Addition-
ally,  software  was  developed  to  scan  the  images  automatically,  detect  the  cracked 
joint bar, and then send a message to the operator with an image of the broken joint 
bar.  The  new  features  were  implemented  and  the  system  was  tested  and  dem-
onstrated in the summer of 2006. 

Additional enhancements were made to the system to further improve joint detec-
tion reliability and were tested at participating railroads during the spring of 2007. 
This year, FRA intends to make additional enhancements to increase the operating 
speed and implement a more rugged, simple, and robust defect detection system. 

ACTION ITEM: 
STATUS: 

NEXT STEP: 

Deploy two additional automated track geometry inspection vehicles 
T–19  and  T–20  track  geometry  inspection  vehicles  in  operation  April 
2007 
Ongoing Implementation 

In  late  April  2007,  FRA  began  operating  its  two  newest  automated  track  inspec-
tion  vehicles  equipped  with  state-of-the-art  technology  to  prevent  train  derailments 
by detecting subtle track flaws that are difficult to identify by regular means. 

The  addition  of  the  new  equipment  increases  the  FRA  fleet  of  automated  inspec-
tion vehicles to five, and when fully integrated into the Federal inspection program, 
will  allow  this  agency  to  inspect  nearly  100,000  track-miles  each  year,  tripling  the 
current capacity. In particular, FRA will be better able to focus its automated track 
inspection  activities  on  high-volume  rail  lines  that  carry  hazardous  materials  and 
passenger  trains  as  well  as  improve  its  ability  to  follow  up  more  quickly  on  routes 
where safety performance by a railroad is substandard. 

The  new  vehicles,  known  as  the  T–19  and  the  T–20,  use  a  variety  of  technology 
to  measure  track  geometry  flaws  such  as  whether  the  two  rails  are  level,  if  the 
width  between  the  rails  is  acceptable,  and  if  the  shape  of  each  rail  meets  Federal 
standards so to avoid derailments. The measurements are recorded in real-time and 
at  operating  speed.  Problem  areas  are  identified  by  global  positioning  system  loca-
tion and shared immediately with the railroad so appropriate corrective actions can 
be taken in a timely manner. 

In May 2005, FRA added the T–18 to its fleet of automated track inspection vehi-
cles  that  measures  for  weaknesses  in  the  track  structure  such  as  bad  crossties  or 
poor  connections  between  the  rail  and  crosstie  that  could  cause  the  rails  to  dan-
gerously widen. 
Improving  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  and  Emergency  Response 

Capability 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 
NEXT STEP: 

Identify  technology  to  improve  safety  in  dark  (non-signaled)  track  terri-
tory 
Switch Point Monitoring System pilot project November 2005 
Use success of pilot project to encourage other railroads to install switch 
position monitoring technology in other dark track territory 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

50 

In  November  2005,  FRA  partnered  with  BNSF  Railway  in  a  $1  million  Switch 
Point  Monitoring  System  pilot  project.  The  main  objective  of  the  project  was  to  de-
velop  a  low-cost  system  that  electronically  monitors,  detects,  and  reports  a  mis-
aligned  switch  on  the  mainline  track  located  in  dark,  or  non-signaled,  track  terri-
tory. 

The  project  involved  the  installation  of  wireless  communication  devices  at  49 
switches  along  a  174-mile  section  of  non-signaled  BNSF  track  between  Tulsa  and 
Avard,  Oklahoma.  Train  dispatchers  at  an  operations  center  in  Fort  Worth,  Texas, 
monitor  the  devices  to  identify  when  the  hand-operated  switches  are  set  in  the 
wrong position. If a switch is misaligned, the dispatcher directs a train to stop until 
railroad  crews  in  the  field  check  the  switch  and  confirm  it  is  safe  to  proceed.  No 
unsafe failures of the system have been reported to date. 

As  a  result  of  the  successful  pilot  project,  BNSF  has  now  developed  technology 
so dispatchers can remotely control the operation of the switch in addition to simply 
monitoring  it.  And,  the  railroad  has  installed  the  switch  monitoring  technology  on 
at  least  one  other  of  its  dark  territory  lines  and  has  plans  to  expand  it  use  else-
where on its rail network. 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 

NEXT STEP: 

Ensure emergency responders have access to key information about haz-
ardous materials transported by rail 
Rail hazmat lists available to first responders March 2005 
Rail hazmat accident pilot project with major railroad July 2005 
Monitor  new  rail  hazmat  pilot  project  with  short  line  and  regional  rail-
roads December 2006 

Emergency responders have access to a wide variety of information regarding haz-
ardous materials transport by rail. The Association of American Railroads (AAR) of-
fers  hazardous  materials  incident  response  training  and  the  American  Chemistry 
Council  has  a  program  that  familiarizes  local  emergency  responders  with  railroad 
equipment and product characteristics. In addition, the U.S. DOT Pipeline and Haz-
ardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  publishes  the  Emergency  Response  Guide-
book and distributes Federal grants to states to train emergency personnel. 

In  March  2005,  with  FRA  encouragement,  the  AAR  amended  its  Recommended 
Operating  Practices  for  Transportation  of  Hazardous  Materials  (Circular  No.  OT– 
55–G)  to  expressly  provide  that  local  emergency  responders,  upon  written  request, 
will be provided with a ranked listing of the top 25 hazardous materials transported 
by  rail  through  their  community.  This  is  an  important  step  to  allow  emergency  re-
sponders  to  plan,  and  better  focus  their  training,  for  the  type  of  rail-related  haz-
ardous materials incident that they would be more likely to encounter. 

In  July  2005,  again  with  FRA  encouragement,  CSX  Transportation  and 
CHEMTREC  (the  chemical  industry’s  24-hour  resource  center  for  emergency  re-
sponders)  entered  into  an  agreement  to  conduct  a  pilot  project  designed  so  that  if 
an  actual  hazardous  materials  rail  accident  or  incident  occurs,  CHEMTREC  will 
have immediate access to CSX computer files regarding that specific train, including 
the  type  of  hazardous  materials  being  carried  and  their  exact  position  within  the 
train. During the 6-month pilot project there was minimal opportunity to effectively 
test the program so all parties agreed to continue the arrangement for an additional 
18-month period. 

In December 2006, another pilot project began to evaluate the use of Railinc Cor-
poration’s  Freightscope,  a  program  that  provides  equipment  search  capabilities  for 
hazmat shipments. The system was installed at CHEMTREC, and it has the poten-
tial  to  more  rapidly  provide  information  about  hazmat  shipments  on  short  line  and 
regional  railroads  to  CHEMTREC  to  improve  information  availability  and  reduce 
delays in emergency response. 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 

NEXT STEP: 

Accelerate research into hazardous materials rail tank car structural in-
tegrity 
Funding added to complete research in 2007 rather than 2008 
Tank  car  research  agreement  with  rail  and  chemical  industry  January 
2007 
Research to be completed in Fall 2007 

In  January  2007,  FRA  executed  a  formal  Memorandum  of  Cooperation  (MOC) 
with rail and chemical industry leaders to share research data and resources to aid 
in developing new Federal design standards for stronger and safer hazardous mate-
rials tank cars in 2008. The goal is to move beyond incremental design changes and 
apply  the  latest  research  and  advanced  technology  to  provide  increased  safety  for 
rail shipments posing the greatest potential safety risk. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

51 

The  MOC  with  Dow  Chemical  Company,  Union  Pacific  Railroad  and  the  Union 
Tank  Car  manufacturing  company  provides  for  extensive  information  sharing  and 
cooperation  between  ongoing  FRA  and  industry  research  programs  to  improve  the 
safety  of  rail  shipments  of  hazardous  commodities  such  as  toxic  inhalation  hazards 
and high-risk gases and liquids. 

The  focus  of  FRA  is  to  strengthen  the  structural  integrity  of  the  tank  car  includ-
ing  evaluating  the  type  of  material  and  thickness  of  the  outer  shell  and  the  type 
and design of the insulation material located between the outer shell and the inner 
tank  that  contains  the  hazardous  material.  This  is  intended  to  reduce  the  prob-
ability that a collision, such as a side impact, will result in release of the hazardous 
commodity. 

In addition, FRA is closely evaluating technology such as push-back couplers, en-
ergy  absorbers,  and  anti-climbing  devices  designed  to  prevent  a  derailment  of  the 
tank car by keeping it upright and on the tracks after an accident. 

Also, in collaboration with the railroad industry through the Association of Amer-
ican  Railroads  Tank  Car  Committee,  FRA  is  conducting  research  involving  three 
major activities: (1) modeling of dynamic forces acting on hazmat tank cars in acci-
dents and assessing the subsequent damage, (2) material testing to determine frac-
ture behavior of tank car steels, and (3) risk ranking to prioritize the tank cars that 
are  perceived  to  be  most  vulnerable  to  catastrophic  failure.  Originally  scheduled  to 
be  finished  in  2008,  FRA  has  provided  an  additional  $400,000  to  move  the  target 
completion date for this research forward to August 2007. 

The  first  project,  modeling  of  dynamic  forces  in  train  accidents,  is  ongoing  and 
will assess items including train makeup, train speed, configuration of rail car pile-
up,  the  effect  of  having  different  types  of  impacting  objects  (i.e.,  couplers  and 
wheels)  strike  different  parts  of  various  tank  car  models,  and  the  effect  of  various 
levels  of  pressurization,  among  other  elements.  It  is  expected  to  be  completed  Au-
gust 2007. 

The second project, material testing for dynamic fracture toughness, is testing the 
amount  of  stress  required  to  propagate  an  existing  flaw  on  the  tank  car  steel  and 
evaluating  the  ability  of  the  steel  to  resist  fracture.  Researchers  at  the  Southwest 
Research  Institute  laboratories  in  San  Antonio,  Texas  are  testing  34  steel  samples 
from  tank  cars  segregated  by  decades  of  manufacture  (e.g.,  1960s,  1970s,  and 
1980s). This work is expected to be completed in July 2007. 

The  third  project,  ranking  the  vulnerability  of  hazardous  materials  tank  cars  to 
catastrophic  failure,  represents  the  end  purpose  of  this  research.  Risk  is  a  complex 
concept,  and  therefore  the  methods  used  to  rank  the  factors  that  affect  risk  vary 
in complexity. Preliminary low-level analyses are ongoing. Higher-level analysis can 
be conducted after the research on dynamic forces and testing for fracture toughness 
has  been  completed.  The  final  hazardous  materials  tank  car  risk  analysis  is  to  be 
completed by September 2007. 

And, since May 2006, FRA has held three public meetings in cooperation with the 
Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  (PHMSA)  to  comprehen-
sively review design and operational factors that affect hazmat rail tank car safety. 
The  two  agencies  will  utilize  a  risk  management  approach  to  identify  ways  to  en-
hance  the  safe  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  including,  tank  car  design, 
manufacture,  and  requalifications  to  keep  a  tank  car  in  service;  operational  issues 
such as human factors, track conditions and maintenance, wayside hazard detectors, 
and signals and train control systems; and emergency response. 

In addition, in December 2006, PHMSA issued a proposed rule that would require 
railroads  to  perform  a  safety  and  security  risk  analysis  to  determine  the  most  ap-
propriate  route  for  shipping  certain  high-risk  hazardous  materials.  Under  the  pro-
posed rule, rail carriers would be required to compile annual data clearly identifying 
the total number and type of hazardous materials shipments transported over each 
route and use the information to select the route that provides the highest possible 
degree  of  safety  and  security.  The  proposed  rule  would  require  shippers  to  develop 
consistent plans for safely and securely storing hazardous materials while en route, 
and ensure that within a specified time period a rail carrier informs the final recipi-
ent that it has delivered a hazardous materials rail car. 

Further,  in  September  2006,  FRA  began  a  project  to  test  sample  tank  car  panels 
with  various  coatings  to  determine  their  ability  to  prevent  penetration  from  small 
arms  fire,  as  well  as  their  ability  to  self-seal  and,  thereby,  mitigate  the  severity  of 
any incident. FRA developed the project in coordination with the AAR and the U.S. 
Department of Homeland Security, which came up with the idea of applying to tank 
cars  a  protective  coating  like  that  used  to  enhance  the  armor  protection  of  military 
vehicles in Iraq. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

52 

Strengthening the FRA Compliance Program 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 

NEXT STEP: 

Make  better  use  of  data  to  direct  FRA  safety  inspectors  and  other  re-
sources to where problems are likely to arise 
New National Inspection Plan fully implemented March 2006 
Proposal to increase civil penalty guideline amounts December 2006 
Ongoing implementation and refinement of NIP process 

The  National  Inspection  Plan  (NIP)  is  a  strategic  inspection  resource  allocation 
program  that  uses  predictive  indicators  to  assist  FRA  in  conducting  inspection  and 
enforcement  activities  within  a  given  geography  or  on  a  particular  railroad.  In  es-
sence,  it  makes  use  of  existing  inspection  and  accident  data  in  such  a  way  to  iden-
tify  potential  safety  ‘‘hot  spots’’  so  they  can  be  corrected  before  a  serious  accident 
occurs. 

In April 2005, the FRA safety disciplines of Operating Practices (i.e., Human Fac-
tors),  Track,  and  the  Motive  Power  &  Equipment  began  operating  under  the  NIP 
since combined, these factors account for over 80 percent of all train accidents. The 
two  other  safety  disciplines  of  Signal  &  Train  Control  and  Hazardous  Materials 
started  in  March  2006.  A  reduction  in  both  the  number  of  accidents  and  the  acci-
dent  rate  is  expected  once  the  NIP  has  had  time  to  take  its  full  effect  and  FRA  re-
fines its application to real-world experience. 

The  first  year  under  the  NIP  was  a  time  of  learning  by  FRA  regional  offices  and 
field  inspectors  on  how  to  understand  and  use  the  information.  During  the  second 
year, there has been a noticeable increase in sophistication and initiative by the re-
gions and they are making adjustments to the NIP where needed and managing re-
sources in a proactive manner to meet the targets in the plan. There is an increased 
willingness to break with past inspections patterns and to focus more effort on rail-
roads  with  the  most  safety  problems.  And,  FRA  has  improved  the  planning  phase 
of the NIP by implementing a mid-year review process. 

Regarding  enforcement  efforts,  FRA  announced  in  December  2006  that  the  civil 
penalty guideline amounts assessed against railroads for violating Federal rail safe-
ty  regulations  would  at  least  double  for  most  violations.  FRA  evaluated  each  of  the 
more  than  2,000  regulations  using  a  five-point  severity  scale.  The  measure  takes 
into  consideration  the  likelihood  that  a  rail  accident  or  graver  consequences  will 
occur  as  a  result  of  failing  to  comply  with  a  particular  section  of  the  regulations. 
The  more  severe  the  potential  outcome  of  violating  a  rule,  the  higher  the  fine.  The 
agency’s new civil penalty guidelines are to become effective later this year. 
Fostering Further Improvements in Highway-Rail Grade-Crossing Safety 

ACTION ITEM: 

STATUS: 

NEXT STEP: 

Build  partnerships  with  state/local  agencies  and  emphasize  railroad  re-
sponsibilities concerning safety at highway-rail grade crossings 
Safety advisory issued May 2005 
Public meetings on private grade crossings safety begin August 2006 
Final public meeting on private grade crossing safety July 2007 

Deaths  in  highway-rail  grade  crossing  accidents  are  the  second-leading  category 
of  fatalities  associated  with  railroading  (trespasser  fatalities  are  the  leading  cat-
egory). The number of grade crossing deaths has declined substantially and steadily 
over time. However, the growth in rail and motor vehicle traffic continues to present 
challenges. 

In August 2006, FRA held the first in a series of public meetings across the coun-
try  (MN,  NC,  LA,  and  CA)  to  foster  a  national  discussion  on  improving  safety  at 
the  Nation’s  largely  unregulated  private  highway-rail  grade  crossings.  Each  year, 
about  400  accidents,  and  from  30  to  40  fatalities,  occur  at  the  over  94,000  private 
crossings used by both freight and passenger trains. 

Private  crossings  are  owned  by  private  property  owners  primarily  to  allow  road-
way access over railroad tracks to residential, commercial, or agricultural areas not 
meant for general public use. The FRA is seeking comments on topics such as deter-
mining when a private crossing has a public purpose and whether the State or Fed-
eral Government should assume a greater role in setting safety standards. 

Establishing  responsibility  for  safety  at  private  crossings  is  one  of  the  primary 
goals of the U.S. Secretary of Transportation’s Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety 
and Trespass Prevention Action Plan issued in 2004. A final public meeting is sched-
uled for July 2007 in New York. 

In May 2005, FRA issued Safety Advisory 2005–03 describing the roles of the Fed-
eral and state governments and of the railroads in grade crossing safety. It also spe-
cifically  reminds  railroads  of  their  responsibilities  to  properly:  report  any  accident 
involving grade crossing signal failure; maintain records relating to credible reports 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

53 

of  grade  crossing  warning  system  malfunctions;  preserve  the  data  from  all  loco-
motive mounted recording devices following grade crossing collisions; and cooperate 
fully with local law enforcement authorities during their investigations of such acci-
dents.  FRA  also  offers  assistance  to  local  law  enforcement  authorities  in  the  inves-
tigation  of  highway-rail  grade  crossing  collisions  where  information  or  expertise 
within FRA control is required to complete the investigation. 

ACTION ITEM: 
STATUS: 
NEXT STEP: 

Assist Louisiana create Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety Action Plan 
Louisiana approved action plan April 2006 
Work with other states to develop grade crossing safety action plans 

In March 2005, FRA began working with the State of Louisiana in developing its 
own  action  plan  for  highway-rail  crossing  safety.  Louisiana  has  the  distinction  of 
consistently being among the top five states in the Nation with the highest number 
of grade crossing collisions and fatalities. The action plan focuses on reducing vehi-
cle-train  collisions  at  grade  crossings  where  multiple  collisions  have  occurred.  Lou-
isiana approved its action plan in April 2006. 

In  June  2006,  in  part  as  a  result  of  efforts  to  create  this  action  plan,  the  Lou-
isiana  Department  of  Transportation  and  Development  announced  an  agreement 
with  Kansas  City  Southern  Railway  to  make  safety  improvements  at  300  public 
grade crossings. Over a 5-year period, more than $16 million will be invested to up-
grade  warning  devices,  replace  cross  buck  signage,  and  close  redundant  crossings. 
FRA  is  now  working  with  Texas  to  develop  a  similar,  State-specific  action  plan, 
and  encourages  other  states  with  high  numbers  of  grade  crossing  accidents  and  fa-
talities to do the same. 
Other FRA Initiatives to Improve Rail Safety 

During the past year, FRA has undertaken several initiatives to improve rail safe-
ty above and beyond the specific elements of the Action Plan. These other activities 
include  advancing  the  development  and  deployment  of  safety  technology  such  as 
Positive  Train  Control  (PTC)  and  Electronically  Controlled  Pneumatic  (ECP)  brake 
systems, enhancing passenger rail safety, and submitting to Congress a comprehen-
sive  bill  that  seeks  to  reauthorize  FRA  for  4  years  and  strengthen  the  Federal  rail 
safety program. 
Positive Train Control (PTC) 

In  January  2007,  FRA  announced  approval  of  the  first  PTC  system  intended  for 
general use by the freight railroads capable of automatically controlling train speed 
and  movements  to  prevent  certain  accidents,  including  train  collisions.  This  is  a 
major achievement that marks the beginning of a new era of rail safety. 

FRA  approved  the  BNSF  Railway’s  Product  Safety  Plan  for  its  Electronic  Train 
Management  System  (ETMS),  an  overlay  technology  that  augments  and  supple-
ments  existing  train  control  methods.  ETMS  employs  both  digital  communications 
and a global positioning system to monitor train location and speed within track au-
thority  limits.  The  ETMS  system  includes  an  in-cab  electronic  display  screen  that 
will first warn of a problem and then automatically engage the train’s brake system 
if a locomotive engineer fails to act in accordance with operating instructions. 

The  FRA  action  allows  BNSF  to  implement  ETMS  on  35  specific  freight  lines  in 
17  states,  and  requires  appropriate  employee  training  before  it  can  be  initiated.  It 
is  expected  that  the  rail  industry  will  increasingly  embrace  and  adopt  PTC  tech-
nology  as  other  railroads—among  them,  Union  Pacific,  Norfolk  Southern,  and  CSX 
Transportation—are each making significant strides to develop PTC systems. 

In addition to its safety benefits, PTC also can support rail operations by increas-

ing the capacity of high-density rail lines, improving overall efficiency. 

In 2005, FRA revised Federal signal and train control regulations to facilitate and 

enable development and deployment of PTC technology. 
Electronically Controlled Pneumatic (ECP) Brakes 

In  August  2006,  FRA  released  a  report  on  the  business  benefits  of  Electronically 
Controlled Pneumatic (ECP) brake systems that have the capability to significantly 
improve  train  control,  reduce  derailments,  and  shorten  stopping  distances.  ECP 
brakes  are  to  trains  what  anti-lock  brakes  are  to  automobiles—they  provide  better 
control. 

ECP  brakes  apply  uniformly  and  virtually  instantaneously  on  every  rail  car 
throughout  a  train  and  not  sequentially  from  one  car  to  the  next  as  is  done  with 
conventional  air  brake  systems.  The  full  train  brake  application,  and  an  ability  to 
gradually  apply  and  release  the  brakes,  provides  for  vastly  improved  train  control 
and  enhances  safety.  FRA  believes  ECP  brake  systems  are  the  most  significant  de-
velopment in railroad brake technology since the 1870s. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

54 

ECP  brake  technology  can  help  avert  train  derailments  caused  by  sudden  emer-
gency  brake  applications,  prevent  runaway  trains  caused  by  loss  of  brake  air  pres-
sure,  and  shorten  train  stopping  distances  up  to  60  percent  under  certain  cir-
cumstances.  ECP  brake  systems  also  are  capable  of  performing  continual  electronic 
self-diagnostic ‘health checks’ of the brakes to identify maintenance needs. 

At the time the benefit report was issued, FRA announced its intention to propose 
revisions  to  the  Federal  rail  safety  regulations  in  2007  to  facilitate  use  of  ECP 
brakes.  As  FRA  continues  to  draft  the  proposed  rule  changes,  the  agency  has  en-
couraged  railroads  to  submit  their  own  plans  to  install  ECP  brakes  on  a  limited 
basis. In March 2007, FRA approved a joint request by BNSF Railway and Norfolk 
Southern Railway to install ECP brakes on trains to demonstrate the safety and ef-
ficacy of the technology in revenue service. With the approval, trains equipped with 
ECP  brakes  will  be  able  to  safely  travel  up  to  3,500  miles  without  stopping  to  un-
dergo certain routine brake inspections, more than double the distance currently al-
lowed  by  Federal  regulations.  It  is  expected  that  the  railroads  will  use  ECP  brakes 
on  container-only  trains  from  West  Coast  ports  to  Chicago  and  on  trains  carrying 
coal from the Powder River Basin fields in Wyoming to southern and eastern power 
plants. 

FRA  placed  several  conditions  on  the  approval,  including  requirements  that  the 
railroads  clearly  define  a  process  for  handling  brake  problems  discovered  en  route; 
ensure  that  ECP  brake  inspections  be  performed  by  qualified  individuals;  and  pro-
vide  appropriate  training  to  crew  members.  Proper  safeguards  will  be  in  place  and 
will  permit  FRA  to  gather  extensive  data  that  could  be  used  in  developing  its  pro-
posed rulemaking. 

In  addition,  ECP  brakes  support  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation’s  Na-
tional  Strategy  to  Reduce  Congestion  on  America’s  Transportation  Network.  Better 
brakes  mean  longer  trains  can  move  more  freight  faster  and  safer  to  help  reduce 
congestion on America’s rail system. 
Passenger Rail Safety Initiatives 

While  the  Action  Plan  focuses  on  improving  the  safety  of  freight  railroad  oper-
ations, FRA has also been making important progress on passenger rail safety dur-
ing the past 2 years. 

In  August  2006,  FRA  published  proposed  new  passenger  rail  safety  standards  to 
improve  evacuation  of  passengers  from  trains,  provide  additional  ways  for  rescuers 
to  access  the  passenger  car  in  case  of  an  emergency,  and  enhance  onboard  emer-
gency  communication  systems.  FRA  is  preparing  the  final  rule,  which  is  expected 
to be published in 2007. 

In  addition,  FRA  is  currently  developing  a  proposed  rule  focusing  on  passenger 
car  emergency  signage,  low-location  exit  path  marking,  and  emergency  lighting. 
FRA is also preparing a proposed rule to enhance structural strength requirements 
for  the  front  of  cab  cars  and  multiple  unit  locomotives.  These  enhancements  would 
include the addition of ‘‘energy deformation’’ requirements specified in revised APTA 
standards for front-end collision posts and corner posts for this equipment. 

In  February  2007,  FRA  held  the  first  meeting  of  its  Railroad  Safety  Advisory 
Committee  Task  Force  to  review  passenger  safety  at  stations  with  high-level  plat-
forms where there are gaps between passenger car doorways and the platform. FRA 
has made this issue a priority. The Task Force will also address safety concerns as-
sociated with other matters directly affecting passenger safety on or around station 
platforms,  such  as  express  trains  through  stations,  and  make  any  necessary  rec-
ommendations to FRA for regulatory action. 

In  May  2006,  FRA  unveiled  the  Passenger  Rail  Vehicle  Emergency  Evacuation 
Simulator,  or  ‘‘Rollover  Rig,’’  which  can  rotate  a  full-sized  commuter  rail  car  up  to 
180  degrees  to  simulate  passenger  train  derailment  scenarios.  It  provides  research-
ers  the  ability  to  test  new  passenger  rail  evacuation  strategies  and  safety  compo-
nents  such  as  emergency  lighting,  doors,  and  windows  and  gives  first  responders  a 
unique training tool. 

And, in March 2006, FRA successfully conducted the final in a series of full-scale 
passenger  train  collisions  at  its  testing  facility  in  Pueblo,  Colorado,  to  test  new 
Crash  Energy  Management  technology.  The  passenger  train  was  equipped  with 
crush  zones  which  absorb  the  force  of  a  crash  to  better  protect  passenger  seating 
areas  and  operators’  spaces.  The  crush  zones  have  stronger  end  frames  that  act  as 
bumpers to distribute crash forces throughout an entire train so passengers feel less 
of the impact. Other devices tested include newly designed couplers, which join two 
cars  together  and  are  built  to  retract  and  absorb  energy  to  keep  trains  upright  on 
the  tracks  during  a  crash.  New  passenger  seats  and  chairs  designed  with  special 
padding and crushable edges also were tested. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

Proposed FRA Rail Safety Legislation 

55 

In  February  2007,  FRA  submitted  to  Congress  the  ‘‘Federal  Rail  Safety  Account-
ability  and  Improvement  Act’’  (H.R.  1516  and  S.  918)  to  reauthorize  the  agency  for 
4  years  and  to  strengthen  its  safety  program.  The  proposed  bill’s  major  provisions 
include: giving FRA authority to regulate railroad worker hours-of-service; providing 
greater  emphasis  by  FRA  and  railroads  to  establish  risk  reduction  programs;  and 
improving highway-rail grade crossing safety. 

A  major  challenge  is  to  ensure  that  train  crewmembers  have  adequate  oppor-
tunity  to  rest,  are  free  of  disorders  that  can  disrupt  sleep,  and  are  fully  engaged 
in  maintaining  alertness.  The  current  statutory  provisions—first  enacted  in  1907— 
that  govern  the  hours-of-service  of  railroad  train  crews,  dispatchers,  and  signal 
maintainers  are  antiquated  and  inadequate  to  address  present  realities.  The  FRA 
proposal  would  replace  railroad  hours-of-service  laws  with  comprehensive,  scientif-
ically-based regulations and make use of a century worth of learning on sleep-wake 
cycles and fatigue-induced performance. 

Under  the  proposal,  the  maximum  on-duty  or  minimum  off-duty  hours  would  be 
established  by  FRA,  much  like  hours-of-service  standards  are  set  for  airline  pilots 
by  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  and  for  truck  drivers  by  the  Federal  Motor 
Carrier  Safety  Administration.  If  given  the  authority,  the  FRA  Railroad  Safety  Ad-
visory  Committee,  made  up  of  railroad  management,  labor  representatives  and 
other  key  stakeholders,  will  review  the  issue  and  develop  recommendations  on  new 
hours-of-service limits based on current, sound science before any changes are made. 
To  achieve  additional  safety  improvements,  the  FRA  proposal  also  will  supple-
ment  traditional  safety  efforts  with  the  establishment  of  risk  reduction  programs. 
FRA  will  place  increased  emphasis  on  developing  methods  to  systematically  evalu-
ate safety risks in order to hold railroads more accountable for improving the safety 
of  their  own  operations,  including  risk  management  strategies  and  implementing 
plans  to  eliminate  or  minimize  the  opportunity  for  workers  to  make  errors  which 
can result in accidents. 

Other provisions in the FRA proposal include requiring states and railroads to up-
date the National Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Inventory on a regular basis to en-
sure current information is available for hazard analysis in determining where Fed-
eral  highway  safety  improvement  funding  is  directed.  In  addition,  the  bill  seeks  to 
encourage  the  creation  and  deployment  of  new,  cost-effective  technology  at  the  Na-
tion’s approximately 80,000 public highway-rail grade crossings that still lack active 
warning devices. 

Furthermore,  the  proposed  legislation  would  expand  the  authority  of  the  FRA  to 
disqualify any individual as unfit for safety-sensitive service for violation of Federal 
regulations related to transporting hazardous materials, among other items. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  I  think  a  lot  of  it  does  devolve  to  technology, 
the technology that we’re testing and trying to develop out of Pueb-
lo  with  rail  money,  as  well  as  Federal  Railroad  Administration 
money.  But  when  you  take  a  look  at  the  biggest  problem,  the  big-
gest  safety  issue  for  railroads,  is  grade-crossing  accidents.  And,  I 
think, that’s where we have to focus our effort. Senator Carper, you 
mentioned  it,  the  GAO  report,  I  believe  the  number  is  93  percent 
of  all  of  those  accidents  are  because  of  driver  bad  judgment.  And 
I would love to see some sort of major commitment in the next sur-
face  transportation  bill,  that  would  try  to  have  the  national  high-
way  system  become  grade-crossing  free.  The  only  really  safe  grade 
crossing is a closed grade crossing. 

Now, that’s a major goal. But it would be a worthy goal. And, as 
we  work  our  way  toward  that,  the  new  technologies  that  are  out 
there,  the  quad  gates,  or  the  mediums  that  Mr.  Solow  referred  to, 
that  are  being  implemented  in  Southern  California—we’d  really 
like  to  see  a  lot—a  major  effort—in  grade-crossing  safety.  And  I’m 
not  sure,  frankly,  Senator  Carper,  that  the  states  agree  that  that 
is as much of a priority as I see it. I do know that the former head 
of  NHTSA  testified  during  the  last  highway  bill  that  he  did  not 
want  the  Section  130  Grade  Crossing  Program  specifically  funded, 
he  wanted  a  block  grant,  because  he  thought  that  maybe  there 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

56 

were  other  higher  priority  safety  programs  than  grade  crossing. 
But,  from  our  vantage  point,  I  believe  that  that’s  where  we  could 
spend a great deal of time and resources. 

Senator THUNE. How many of the accidents occur at night versus 

day? Do you know what that percentage is? 

Mr. HAMBERGER. I do not have that. 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  I  don’t  have  it  off  the  top  of  my  head.  I  don’t 
know  if  we  keep  the  data  exactly  that  way,  but  we’ll  take  a  look. 

[The information previously referred to follows:] 
Please see the following charts, which show the agency’s highway-rail crossing ac-
cident  statistics,  based  on  railroads’  required  reports  to  FRA  on  Form  FRA  F 
6180.57, for the more than 7 years from 2000 through June of 2007: 

All Highway-Rail Crossing Incidents 

Total 

Dawn 

Day 

Dusk 

Dark 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

3,502 
3,237 
3,077 
2,977 
3,077 
3,053 
2,923 
1,311 

15.1 
14.0 
13.3 
12.9 
13.3 
13.2 
12.6 
5.7 

97 
74 
63 
70 
64 
79 
72 
26 

2.8 
2.3 
2.0 
2.4 
2.1 
2.6 
2.5 
2.0 

2,209 
2,083 
1,973 
1,902 
1,909 
1,908 
1,837 
812 

63.1  112 
64.3 
91 
64.1 
98 
63.9  119 
62.0  107 
93 
62.5 
75 
62.8 
61.9 
44 

3.2 
2.8 
3.2 
4.0 
3.5 
3.0 
2.6 
3.4 

1,084 
989 
943 
886 
997 
973 
939 
429 

31.0 
30.6 
30.6 
29.8 
32.4 
31.9 
32.1 
32.7 

23,157 

100.0  545 

2.4 

14,633 

63.2  739 

3.2 

7,240 

31.3 

All Highway-Rail Crossing Incidents 

Total 

Dawn/Dusk 

Day 

Dark 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

Nbr 

% 

3,502 
3,237 
3,077 
2,977 
3,077 
3,053 
2,923 
1,311 

15.1 
14.0 
13.3 
12.9 
13.3 
13.2 
12.6 
5.7 

209 
165 
161 
189 
171 
172 
147 
70 

6.0 
5.1 
5.2 
6.3 
5.6 
5.6 
5.0 
5.3 

2,209 
2,083 
1,973 
1,902 
1,909 
1,908 
1,837 
812 

63.1 
64.3 
64.1 
63.9 
62.0 
62.5 
62.8 
61.9 

1,084 
989 
943 
886 
997 
973 
939 
429 

31.0 
30.6 
30.6 
29.8 
32.4 
31.9 
32.1 
32.7 

23,157 

100.0 

1,284 

5.5 

14,633 

63.2 

7,240 

31.3 

2000 
2001 
2002 
2003 
2004 
2005 
2006 
2007 

Total 

2000 
2001 
2002 
2003 
2004 
2005 
2006 
2007 

Total 

Note  that  the  figures  for  2007  are  for  only  January  through  June  and  very  pre-
liminary. A copy of the FRA reporting form is also provided for the record; see item 
22  ‘‘Visibility,’’  which  is  highlighted.  The  first  chart  breaks  down  the  more  than 
23,000  crossing  accidents  reported  to  FRA  into  four  groups,  according  to  whether 
the accident occurred at dawn, in daytime (‘‘day’’), at dusk, or at nighttime (‘‘dark’’). 
The second chart breaks down the accidents into three groups, combining accidents 
at  dawn  with  accidents  at  dusk,  because  dawn  and  dusk  are  both  periods  of  low 
light. As you can see from both charts, the broken-down percentages are fairly con-
stant  across  the  multiple-year  time  period:  about  63  percent  of  the  crossing  acci-
dents  happen  during  daylight  hours;  31  percent,  during  periods  of  darkness;  and 
about 6 percent, during the low-light periods of dawn and dusk. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

57 

ATTACHMENT 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2
A
R
F
6
2
7

58 

Mr.  TOLMAN.  Senator,  I  applaud  you  for  that  question,  because 
I’m  sitting  here,  and  there  are  about  a  million  different  ideas  pop-
ping into my head. 

But  I  sincerely  think  that,  you  know,  if  you  look  at  the  history 
of  the  railroad  industry,  it’s  been  one  of  the  oldest  around,  oldest 
businesses around. And for years when I first hired out in the rail-
road in, you know, 1971, it was a wonderful place to work, and you 
have  a  camaraderie  between  management  and  labor.  And  every-
body  worked  together  for  the  goal  to  move  a  commodity  from  one 
end to another. 

And over the years, that’s all changed. And it changed for a vari-
ety  of  reasons,  and  there’s  nothing  that  you  can  pinpoint  on  it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

3
A
R
F
6
2
7

59 

However,  that  needs  to  swing  back  the  other  way.  It  needs  to— 
management  and  labor  need  to  work  cooperatively  together,  and 
thoughtfully together, and you know, in Mr. Boardman’s testimony, 
he says that we’re talking about the fatigue abatement issues, and 
he says in his, something to the statement that, you know, they’ve 
had  an  opportunity  to  work  on  this  issue  for  the  last  12,  13  years, 
and  none  of  us  have  done  that.  Why  haven’t  we  done  it?  Because 
there’s  not  a  commitment.  You  know  why  we  have  a  commitment? 
And  you  know  why  we’re  talking  about  this  today?  Because  Con-
gress  has  stepped  up  to  the  plate  and  said,  ‘‘Something  needs  to 
be  done.’’  And  thank  God  it  did,  you  have.  Because  it’s  time  to  do 
something about safety. 

It’s  not  only  a  culture  change,  I  mean,  we’re  talking  about,  you 
know, issues of—grade-crossing issues. It’s not only the, a thousand 
deaths  or  accidents  or  incidents  which  happen  each  year—almost 
a  thousand,  it’s  a  nine  hundred  and  some-odd  number.  But,  what 
do  we  do  about  the  locomotive  engineer  and  train  crew  that’s  in-
volved  in  that  accident?  We’re  not  discussing  this.  This  should  be 
part of this legislation. 

What happens, some railroads you have a critical incidents stress 
debriefing programs that help the engineer and the conductor, and 
any other crew members that has to deal with the trauma involved 
there.  A  lot  of  our  engineers  and  train  crews  are  dealing  with 
PTSD,  Post  Traumatic  Stress  Disorder,  brought  on,  you  know,  it 
goes back to the Vietnam War, that’s when it was first, you know, 
brought on. 

Senator CARPER. We need to be fair. 
Mr. TOLMAN. Absolutely. Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. We have a vote that’s started here. I want 
to  thank  Senator  Thune.  I  want  to  ask  one  question  to  Mr. 
Boardman and Mr. Hamberger—what’s, what’s going to be done by 
the  Administration  to  achieve  interoperability  for  Positive  Train 
Control systems? 

And, for Mr. Hamberger, what steps, if any, is the industry going 

to do to develop it? If you can, in fairly short form, please. 

Mr. BOARDMAN. Well, I think we’ve made progress, Senator, with 
BNSF and the ETMS system that they believe works as a business 
model. We’re going to the second element of that—it was approved 
in  their  Product  Safety  Plan  in  January  of  this  year,  and  the  re-
quirement  here  is  that  it  has  to  be  interoperable  with  the  other 
railroads. We see CSX, we see Norfolk Southern, we see UP, doing 
just that. So, we believe that’s going to happen. 

Ed? 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Mr.  Chairman,  our  technical  people  are  work-
ing  very  closely  together,  making  sure  that  as  these  systems  come 
online, they are interoperable, there are some technical challenges, 
that  is  one  of  the  reasons  I’m  not  sure  we’re  comfortable  with  a 
specific deadline in the legislation, but we are committed to making 
sure that happens. 

I  would  just  ask  you  to  take  a  look  at  my  written  testimony, 
where  I  do  point  out  that  one  of  the  challenges  is  having  enough 
spectrum to run these systems, and make sure that that spectrum 
goes  throughout  the  entire  ribbon  of  the  network.  But  we’re  work-
ing on that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

60 

And,  finally,  I’d  ask  your  consent  to  put  into  the  record  a  com-
pendium of fatigue management efforts that the industry has been 
undertaking, we have not been sitting on our hands for the last 10 
years with the employees. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Without objection. 
[The information referred to is retained in Committee files.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And to say thanks to all of you, if Senator 

Carper has another question, please feel free to ask. 

Just  to  close,  by  saying  that  we’re  expecting  so  much  from  the 
railroad  industry,  from  the  freight  industry,  in  the  future.  That, 
when  I  hear  that  80,000  people  are  sought  for  jobs  over  the  next 
several  years,  that’s  incredible.  But,  we’re  going  to  need  your  help 
to keep this country running. 

I conclude my remarks, Senator Carper, you’re in charge. 
Senator CARPER. Thanks very much. 
I’d like to call up Senate bill number—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator CARPER. Just kidding. 
I  do  have  a  statement  I’d  like  to  offer  for  the  record,  if  I  could. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Carper follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this  hearing  on  this  very  important  issue. 
I  have  watched  over  the  last  decade  with  great  pleasure  as  people,  businesses, 
and policymakers have turned their attention back to rail as an affordable and effi-
cient transportation alternative. 

As  we  try  to  reduce  highway  congestion  and  address  air  pollution  that  threatens 
public  health  and  the  environment,  rail  has  arisen  as  an  effective  way  to  address 
our transportation needs. 

However, increased rail traffic has resulted in increased accidents, some of which 

have received a great deal of attention in the press. 

In Delaware, there has been a fair amount of attention given to rail safety issues 
by our papers in recent months. And the concern that more rail service brings more 
accidents  has  generated  some  opposition  to  additional  investment  in  rail.  This  is 
something none of us wants to see. 

Addressing these concerns early is important both for public safety and to ensure 
that we continue to invest in this very important part of our national transportation 
system. 

Senator  CARPER.  And  also  I  had  one  last  quick  question.  This  is 
more  of  a  local  question  for  Delaware.  And  I  have  only  one  major 
statewide  newspaper  in  our  small  State,  and  they  ran  a  series  of 
articles not long ago about rail safety. And I just want to touch on 
that, if I may, and then we’ll run and vote. 

One  of  the  concerns  that  I  have  heard  expressed  by  residents  of 
my State—after the series of articles ran, has to do with the park-
ing  of  rail  cars  containing  hazardous  materials  near  residential 
communities. 

I guess my question is, what are railroads doing about that now? 
What  more  could  be  done?  And,  what  if  anything,  should  our  gov-
ernment  do?  Whether  it’s  Federal,  State  and/or  local  governments 
do—to  address,  or  reduce  the  concerns  that  surround  that  kind  of 
practice? 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Senator,  the  Transportation  Security  Adminis-
tration  has  promulgated  a  regulation,  and  we  have  also  taken— 
while  that  is  pending—voluntary  action  to  reduce  the  amount  of 
time  that  a  loaded  hazardous  material  tank  car  sits  in  a  yard,  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

61 

25 percent each year. And that we have also committed to making 
sure  that  those  tank  cars  will  be  attended,  that  is  to  say,  not  just 
sitting out there, and that they will be placed, within the rail yard, 
in  as  safe  a  place  as  possible.  That  is  to  say,  if  there  is  one  end 
of  the  rail  yard  near  a  hospital,  at  the  other  end  of  the  rail  yard 
a  forest,  it’s  going  to  be  placed  up  there  by  the  forest,  not  by  the 
hospital. 

And,  of  course,  as  you  know,  we  are  committed  to  moving  haz-
ardous  materials  as  safely  as  possible,  and  we  do  have  a  pretty 
good  record  of  doing  that,  99.99  percent.  But  the  TSA  does  have 
about 24 or 25 action items that we are cooperating with them on. 

Senator CARPER. All right. Thank you. 
Anyone else like to respond to that question? No? 
Well, all right, well, fair enough. Thank you very, very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. If there is any information that any of you 
want to submit, we’d be pleased to receive it, and we thank you all 
for  being  excellent  witnesses.  This  has  been  a  very  good  hearing, 
in my judgment, thank you. 

[Whereupon, at 3:40 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN 

Question 1. In your written testimony you admonish Congress against setting spe-
cific  hours-of-service  reforms  in  statute  even  with  exceptions  which  this  legislation 
makes.  Instead,  you  recommend  that  Congress  grant  you  the  authority  to  issue 
‘‘flexible  regulations  based  on  a  modern,  scientific  understanding  of  fatigue.’’  What 
scientific  endeavors  is  the  FRA  currently  undertaking  to  better  understand  worker 
fatigue and how would you apply this to hours-of-service reform? 

Answer.  As  Appendix  B  to  my  written  testimony  describes,  research  has  shown 
that  the  quality  of  sleep  varies  with  the  time  of  day.  Because  it  is  more  difficult 
to sleep during the day, employees whose off-duty periods occur during the day aver-
age  less  sleep  than  those  who  are  predictably  off-duty  during  nighttime  hours.  Yet, 
the  current  hours-of-service  laws,  and  any  pending  proposals  to  establish  specific 
statutory  maximum  on-duty  and  minimum  off-duty  periods  across  the  board,  treat 
both groups of employees equally, without recognizing that an employee who is sub-
ject  to  unpredictable  work  schedules,  and  off-duty  periods  during  the  day,  may  re-
quire a longer period off-duty to achieve sufficient sleep than an employee who has 
a  more  predictable  schedule  and/or  whose  off-duty  period  permits  the  opportunity 
to sleep during the night. 

In addition, our scientific understanding of circadian rhythms indicates that sleep- 
wake  cycles  in  less  than  a  24-hour  period  rapidly  change  the  circadian  pattern, 
which  contributes  significantly  to  fatigue.  Under  the  current  law,  an  employee  is 
likely on a regular basis to have more than one cycle of sleeping and waking within 
24 hours. This is even more detrimental to employees who may be less able to effec-
tively use their off-duty period to obtain sufficient sleep. Fatigue models using crew 
scheduling data also reveal a positive correlation between the time of day and circa-
dian pattern, and the risk of a human-factor accident, with that risk being greatest 
between midnight and 3 a.m. 

Over  the  past  two  decades,  significant  progress  has  been  made  in  sleep  science 
and  in  our  understanding  of  the  role  of  fatigue  in  our  daily  lives.  The  NTSB  has 
played a salutary role in calling out fatigue as a factor in at least 18 rail accidents 
since  1984.  FRA-funded  research  has  used  an  integrated  strategic  planning  and 
evaluation strategy of field data collection, laboratory simulations, and analysis and 
evaluation  of  Fatigue  Management  Systems  to  enrich  our  knowledge  of  fatigue  as 
it  affects  employees  in  a  wide  range  of  railroad  occupations.  This  multi-faceted  re-
search  has  resulted  in  a  strategic  fatigue  roadmap  for  FRA  that  identifies  work 
scheduling  as  one  of  the  top  policy  issues,  and  a  key  starting  point  for  addressing 
the fatigue problem in the rail industry today. 

FRA’s  analysis  of  data  gathered  by  our  Switching  Operations  Fatality  Analysis 
(SOFA)  Working  Group  indicates  that  fatigue  (largely  related  to  biological  rhythms 
or time of day) was likely responsible for more than 22 percent of the risk of SOFA 
severe  incidents  from  1997  through  2003.  In  July  of  2006,  FRA  released  the  Colli-
sion Analysis Report, which identified compromised alertness as a likely significant 
factor in 29 percent of the collisions reviewed in detail by a panel of railroad subject 
matter experts representing labor, management, and the Federal Government. 

On November 29, 2006, we announced the release of an important new study enti-
tled  Validation  and  Calibration  of  a  Fatigue  Assessment  Tool  for  Railroad  Work 
Schedules (the Validation Study), which confirmed the applicability of a Department 
of  Defense  fatigue  model  to  railroad  operations.  The  Summary  Report  from  that 
study  described  the  relationship  between  fatigue  and  human-factor  train  accidents. 
The  study  is  the  largest  and  most  rigorous  of  its  kind,  based  on  review  of  30-day 
work  histories  of  locomotive  crews  involved  in  400  human-factor  and  1,000  other 
train  accidents.  The  data  from  the  model  validation  study  showed  that  there  is  a 
reliable relationship between the time of day of human-factor accidents and the ex-
pected, normal circadian rhythm. This circadian pattern was not reliably present for 
accidents not caused by human factors. 

(63) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

64 

tives. 

The  results  of  this  accident  analysis  study  indicated  that  a  fatigue  model  could 
predict  an  increased  risk  of  human-factor  accidents  under  certain  conditions  that 
cause fatigue. A bio-mathematical fatigue model, known as SAFTE (Sleep, Activity, 
Fatigue,  and  Task  Effectiveness),  was  used  to  estimate  crew  cognitive  effectiveness 
based  entirely  on  work  schedule  information  and  opportunities  to  obtain  sleep.  Ef-
fectiveness  is  a  metric  that  tracks  speed  of  performance  on  a  simple  reaction-time 
test and is strongly related to overall cognitive speed, vigilance, and the probability 
of  lapses.  The  model  rates  effectiveness  on  a  scale  from  0  to  100.  There  was  a  reli-
able  linear  relationship  between  crew  effectiveness  (fatigue)  and  the  risk  of  a 
human-factor  accident:  as  crew  effectiveness  declined,  human-factor  accident  risk 
went up. No such relationship was found for accidents not caused by human factors. 
This result satisfied the criteria for model validation. The risk of human-factor acci-
dents  was  elevated  at  any  effectiveness  score  below  90  and  increased  progressively 
with reduced effectiveness. There was a reliable time-of-day variation in human-fac-
tor accidents, but not in accidents not caused by human factors. Human-factor acci-
dent  risk  increased  reliably  when  effectiveness  was  below  70,  a  value  that  is  the 
rough equivalent of a 0.08 blood alcohol level or being awake for 21 hours following 
an  eight-hour  sleep  period  the  previous  night.  Below  an  effectiveness  score  of  70, 
accident cause codes (codes defined by FRA that indicate the factors that caused the 
accident,  such  as  passing  a  stop  signal  or  exceeding  authorized  speed)  were  of  the 
sort  expected  in  situations  involving  fatigue,  confirming  that  the  relationship  be-
tween accident risk and effectiveness was meaningful. If an individual had an effec-
tiveness  score  of  less  than  or  equal  to  50,  his  or  her  chance  of  having  a  human- 
factor accident was increased 65 percent. 

When  we  released  the  report  on  validation  of  the  SAFETE  model  last  November, 
we  also  released  a  White  Paper  summarizing  the  results  of  research  to  date.  This 
information  can  be  accessed  on  our  website  at  http://www.fra.dot.gov/us/content/ 
1737. 

We would be glad to provide a further briefing on these and other research initia-

For these reasons, FRA believes that in order to take maximum advantage of the 
scientific  learning  on  fatigue,  the  hours-of-service  laws  must  have  sufficient  flexi-
bility  to  take  into  account  the  predictability  or  lack  of  predictability  of  shifts  (espe-
cially since collective bargaining agreements provide only 2 hours notice prior to the 
next on-duty period), time of day, and other factors, in determining the appropriate 
maximum  on-duty  and  minimum  off-duty  periods  that  will  give  an  employee  the 
best opportunity to obtain the necessary sleep, which may not be the same for every 
employee or group of employees performing the same job functions. 

In  addition,  a  more  flexible  approach  to  the  hours-of-service  laws  would  allow 
FRA  to  address,  where  necessary,  crew  scheduling  practices,  using  existing  re-
search,  and  the  railroads’  own  experiences  with  fatigue  management  policies,  to  al-
leviate  the  working  conditions  that  contribute  to  fatigue.  Some  areas  that  could  be 
addressed  include  requirements  of  periods  of  undisturbed  rest,  the  use  of  call  win-
dows,  and  automatic  markup  procedures  for  employees  returning  from  extended 
leave.  All  of  these  policies  would  increase  the  predictability  of  employees’  work 
schedules, which would enable employees to maximize the opportunity to obtain suf-
ficient sleep during off-duty periods. 

Question 2. Wouldn’t you agree that workers are better off getting 8 hours of sleep 

each night versus 5 or 6? 

Answer.  I  certainly  agree  that  getting  8  hours  of  sleep  each  night  is  preferable 
to  getting  only  5  or  6  hours  of  sleep,  as  research  shows  that  most  people  need  7 
to  8  hours  of  sleep  per  night  to  function  at  peak  effectiveness.  Under  the  current 
hours-of-service  laws,  it  is  unlikely,  if  not  impossible,  for  some  employees  to  get  7 
or  8  hours  sleep,  as  they  get  only  8  or  10  hours  off  before  they  can  be  required  to 
return to duty. However, simply increasing the minimum off-duty period, while giv-
ing  the  appearance  of  providing  this  opportunity,  will  not  be  sufficient  to  ensure 
that all employees truly have the opportunity to obtain sufficient sleep, if we do not 
also  address  other  aspects  of  their  working  conditions  that  inhibit  their  ability  to 
get enough sleep. 

As  was  discussed  in  Appendix  B  to  my  written  testimony,  and  in  response  to 
Question 1 above, the time of day in which employees work or try to sleep, and the 
corresponding  circadian  patterns,  have  an  effect  on  the  ability  to  get  proper  sleep. 
Research  has  shown  that  locomotive  engineers  whose  shifts  ended  between  5  a.m. 
and noon obtained the least sleep during their off-duty period, even if its length was 
the  same  as  employees  working  at  other  times  of  the  day.  Thus,  these  employees 
might  benefit  from  even  more  time  off  than  other  employees,  to  have  a  greater  op-
portunity to get enough sleep before returning to duty. Requirements tailored to the 
specific scheduling practices and other factors that affect different groups of employ-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

ees,  as  borne  out  by  research,  would  be  more  effective  in  ensuring  that  employees 
have the opportunity to get the optimal amount of sleep during off-duty time. 

65 

Question  3.  Don’t  you  think  this  would  have  a  dramatic  effect  on  safety,  given 

that worker fatigue accounts for 1 out of every 4 train accidents? 

Answer. As I indicated in my testimony, human factors cause roughly 40 percent 
of all train accidents and fatigue is at least a contributing factor in one out of every 
four  serious  human  factor-caused  train  accidents.  This  does  not  include  accidents 
caused  by  track  or  equipment  defects,  or  other  causes.  In  addition,  fatigue  is  often 
a  factor  in  employee  injuries  not  related  to  train  accidents.  Certainly,  railroad  em-
ployees  who  get  more  sleep  will  be  less  likely  to  suffer  the  consequences  of  fatigue, 
including  the  risk  of  accidents  caused  or  contributed  to  by  fatigue.  However,  as  I 
have  pointed  out  in  my  testimony  and  the  responses  above,  simply  increasing  min-
imum  off-duty  periods  may  be  insufficient  to  achieve  the  goal  of  having  employees 
who get more sleep, if the other factors in the work environment that affect employ-
ees’ ability to get enough sleep are not also addressed. In particular, it is important 
for  employees  to  know  approximately  when  they  will  be  expected  to  report  for  an 
assignment  so  that  they  can  plan  to  take  rest.  In  the  railroad  industry,  many  em-
ployees  in  road  service  work  in  rotating  pool  assignments  and  on  ‘‘extra  boards.’’ 
These  employees  will  often  know  when  they  are  available  to  be  called  (i.e.,  when 
their statutory rest will end), but not when they will actually be called. 

Question  4.  Assuming  this  bill  passes  and  we  conference  with  the  House,  when 
do you think the hours-of-service reforms would be implemented by the government 
and then the rail industry? What is the timeline? 

Answer.  The  Senate  bill  gives  FRA  180  days  from  the  date  of  enactment  to  pro-
mulgate  regulations  requiring  railroads  to  keep  records  that  comply  with  the  new 
requirements  in  the  bill,  to  provide  for  electronic  recordkeeping,  and  to  require 
training  of  employees,  and  the  Senate  bill  provides  that  the  amendments  to  the 
hours-of-service  laws  themselves  are  effective  1  year  from  the  date  of  enactment. 
The House bill would become effective immediately upon enactment. 

FRA  could  likely  draft  the  required  regulations  within  the  180  days  provided  in 
the Senate bill, although the required levels of review might be more difficult. These 
regulations  would  be  one  of  the  first  steps  to  inform  the  regulated  community  of 
what  is  expected.  Training  would  also  be  required,  not  only  for  the  regulated  com-
munity, but also for FRA inspectors who would be enforcing the new law. Once the 
new provisions are understood and FRA’s hours-of-service recordkeeping regulations 
are revised to require records that comply with the new law, the railroads will need 
time to adapt the records they are currently using to be in compliance. 

Under  either  the  House  or  Senate  bill,  a  railroad  of  any  size  will  likely  need  to 
use  an  electronic  recordkeeping  system  in  order  to  determine  the  current  avail-
ability  of  employees  and  to  verify  compliance  with  the  law.  Whether  or  not  a  rail-
road currently has an electronic recordkeeping system, programming to comply with 
the  new  law  will  involve  extensive  work.  In  the  case  of  existing  systems,  for  in-
stance,  the  proposed  legislation  would  require  revision  to  the  logic  through  which 
the  electronic  programs  use  data  entered  by  employees  to  calculate  maximum  and 
minimum  periods  and  other  limitations  so  that  it  addresses  new  limitations  added 
to the law, such as maximum hours per month. In addition, the new law would re-
quire  changes  to  some  of  the  screens  presented  to  the  employees  for  input  and  to 
FRA for the inspection of records. 

An  example  may  be  illustrative  of  some  of  the  changes  in  railroad  practices  and 
electronic  recordkeeping  programs  that  will  be  required.  Time  spent  completing 
hours-of-service records is administrative duty that is ‘‘other service for the carrier’’ 
under the law, which commingles with the employee’s covered service and is consid-
ered  part  of  an  employee’s  time  on-duty.  FRA  has  allowed  railroads  to  structure 
their  programs  so  that  employees  who  are  approaching  or  have  exceeded  the  max-
imum  allowed  time  on-duty  are  presented  a  ‘‘quick  tie  up’’  screen,  on  which  they 
enter  only  their  relieved  and  released  times,  a  phone  number  at  which  they  can  be 
reached  if  different  from  that  on  record,  and  a  ‘‘board  placement  time’’  which  is  a 
collective  bargaining  issue.  Employees  complete  the  record,  entering  deadhead 
transportation and other activities, the next time they return to duty. This practice 
would  have  to  change  under  the  new  law,  as  railroads  would  need  the  information 
about  employees’  time  spent  awaiting  and  in  deadhead  transportation  to  final  re-
lease  before  an  employee  begins  a  statutory  off-duty  period,  to  determine  whether 
and  in  what  amount  an  employee  may  be  entitled  to  additional  off-duty  time,  and 
the  employee  would  likely  need  to  request  any  additional  time  to  which  he  or  she 
is  entitled  at  that  time.  This  will  require  a  change  not  only  in  railroad  practices, 
but in programming, so that the electronic program presents the full record for com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

66 

pletion,  and  the  railroad  ensures  that  employees  have  enough  time  to  complete  the 
full record within the limitations of the statute. 

In  spite  of  the  many  challenges,  FRA  and  the  industry  would  work  diligently  to 

meet the one-year deadline for implementation in the Senate bill. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

EDWARD R. HAMBERGER 

Question.  Assuming  this  bill  passes  and  we  conference  with  the  House,  when  do 
you  think  the  hours-of-service  reforms  would  be  implemented  by  the  government 
and then the rail industry? What is the timeline? 

Answer. The timeline would depend upon the requirements of the final legislation. 
For  instance,  the  Senate  bill  would  make  some  Hours-of-Service  changes  effective 
‘‘one  year  after  the  date  of  enactment  of  this  Act.’’  In  this  case,  the  exact  effective 
date  would  depend  upon  the  date  the  President  signs  the  final  legislation  into  law. 
The Senate bill would grant additional authority for Hours-of-Service changes to the 
Secretary  of  Transportation.  The  effective  date  for  these  changes  might  have  to  be 
phased-in  over  a  longer  period  of  time,  depending  upon  existing  labor  agreements 
and other factors. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:57 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75738.TXT JACKIE

